10-K 1 spg-20181231x10k.htm 10-K
Table of Contents
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10‑K
ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15 (d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
  
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(State of incorporation
or organization)001‑14469
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
001-36110
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(Commission File No.)04‑6268599
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
34-1755769
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
225 West Washington Street
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (ZIP Code)
(317) 636‑1600
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
    
Title of each className of each exchange on which registered
Simon Property Group, Inc. Common stock, $0.0001 par value New York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, Inc. 8/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock,
$0.0001 par valueNew York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, L.P. 2.375% Senior Unsecured Notes due 2020 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well‑known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒     No ☐ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
  
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☐     No ☒ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ☐     No ☒
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months
(or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒     No ☐ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S‑T (§232.405 of this
chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit such files). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒     No ☐ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ☒     No ☐
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of Registrant’s knowledge, in
definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See
the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act (check one):
Simon Property Group, Inc.:    
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non‑accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
    
Emerging growth company ☐
Simon Property Group, L.P.:    
Large accelerated filer ☐ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☒ Smaller reporting company ☐
    
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the Registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting
standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. 
 Simon Property Group, Inc.    ☐  Simon Property Group, L.P.    ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in rule 12‑b of the Act).
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☐     No ☒ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ☐     No ☒
The aggregate market value of shares of common stock held by non‑affiliates of Simon Property Group, Inc. was approximately $52,260 million based on the closing sale price on the
New York Stock Exchange for such stock on June 30, 2018.
As of January 31, 2019, Simon Property Group, Inc. had 308,961,608 and 8,000 shares of common stock and Class B common stock outstanding, respectively.
Simon Property Group, L.P. had no publicly-traded voting equity as of June 30, 2018.  Simon Property Group, L.P. has no common stock outstanding.
Documents Incorporated By Reference
Portions of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement in connection with its 2019 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference in Part III.
 
 
 
 3
Table of Contents
EXPLANATORY NOTE
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10‑K for the annual period ended December 31,
2018 of Simon Property Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and Simon Property Group, L.P., a
Delaware limited partnership. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to
“Simon” mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the “Operating Partnership” mean Simon
Property Group, L.P. References to “we,” “us” and “our” mean collectively Simon, the Operating
Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the Operating
Partnership.
Simon is a real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. We are structured as an umbrella partnership REIT under
which substantially all of our business is conducted through the Operating Partnership, Simon’s
majority‑owned partnership subsidiary, for which Simon is the general partner. As of December 31,
2018, Simon owned an approximate 86.8% ownership interest in the Operating Partnership, with the
remaining 13.2% ownership interest owned by limited partners. As the sole general partner of the
Operating Partnership, Simon has exclusive control of the Operating Partnership’s day‑to‑day
management.
We operate Simon and the Operating Partnership as one business. The management of Simon
consists of the same members as the management of the Operating Partnership. As general partner
with control of the Operating Partnership, Simon consolidates the Operating Partnership for financial
reporting purposes, and Simon has no material assets or liabilities other than its investment in the
Operating Partnership. Therefore, the assets and liabilities of Simon and the Operating Partnership are
the same on their respective financial statements.
We believe that combining the annual reports on Form 10‑K of Simon and the Operating
Partnership into this single report provides the following benefits:
·enhances investors’ understanding of Simon and the Operating Partnership by enabling
investors to view the business as a whole in the same manner as management views and
operates the business;
·eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined presentation since
substantially all of the disclosure in this report applies to both Simon and the Operating
Partnership; and
·creates time and cost efficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two
separate reports.
We believe it is important for investors to understand the few differences between Simon and the
Operating Partnership in the context of how we operate as a consolidated company. The primary
difference is that Simon itself does not conduct business, other than acting as the general partner of the
Operating Partnership and issuing equity or equity‑related instruments from time to time. In addition,
Simon itself does not incur any indebtedness, as all debt is incurred by the Operating Partnership or
entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by the Operating Partnership.
The Operating Partnership holds, directly or indirectly, substantially all of our assets, including our
ownership interests in our joint ventures. The Operating Partnership conducts substantially all of our
business and is structured as a partnership with no publicly traded equity. Except for the net proceeds
from equity issuances by Simon, which are contributed to the capital of the Operating Partnership in
exchange for, in the case of common stock issuances by Simon, common units of partnership interest in
the Operating Partnership, or units, or, in the case of preferred stock issuances by Simon, preferred
units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, the Operating Partnership,
directly or indirectly, generates the capital required by our business through its operations, the
incurrence of indebtedness, proceeds received from the disposition of certain properties and joint
ventures and the issuance of units or preferred units to third parties.
The presentation of stockholders’ equity, partners’ equity and noncontrolling interests are the main
areas of difference between the consolidated financial statements of Simon and those of the Operating
Partnership. The differences between stockholders’ equity and partners’ equity result from differences in
the equity issued at the Simon and Operating Partnership levels. The units held by limited partners in
the Operating Partnership are accounted for as partners’ equity in the Operating Partnership’s financial
statements and as noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial statements. The noncontrolling interests
in the Operating Partnership’s financial statements include the interests of unaffiliated partners in
various consolidated partnerships. The noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial statements include
the same noncontrolling interests at the Operating Partnership level and, as previously stated, the units
held by limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Although classified differently, total equity of
Simon and the Operating Partnership is the same.
To help investors understand the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, this
report provides:
·separate consolidated financial statements for Simon and the Operating Partnership;
2
 
Table of Contents
·a single set of notes to such consolidated financial statements that includes separate
discussions of noncontrolling interests and stockholders’ equity or partners’ equity, accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) and per share and per unit data, as applicable;
·a combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations section that also includes discrete information related to each entity; and
·separate Part II, Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters
and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities sections related to each entity.
This report also includes separate Part II, Item 9A. Controls and Procedures sections and
separate Exhibits 31 and 32 certifications for each of Simon and the Operating Partnership in order to
establish that the requisite certifications have been made and that Simon and the Operating Partnership
are each compliant with Rule 13a‑14(a) or Rule 15d‑14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and
18 U.S.C. §1350. The separate discussions of Simon and the Operating Partnership in this report
should be read in conjunction with each other to understand our results on a consolidated basis and
how management operates our business.
In order to highlight the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, the separate
sections in this report for Simon and the Operating Partnership specifically refer to Simon and the
Operating Partnership. In the sections that combine disclosure of Simon and the Operating Partnership,
this report refers to actions or holdings of Simon and the Operating Partnership as being “our” actions or
holdings. Although the Operating Partnership is generally the entity that directly or indirectly enters into
contracts and joint ventures, holds assets and incurs debt, we believe that references to “we,” “us” or
“our” in this context is appropriate because the business is one enterprise and we operate substantially
all of our business through the Operating Partnership.
 
3
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Annual Report on Form 10‑K
December 31, 2018
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Item No.    Page No.
Part I 
1.  Business 5
1A. Risk Factors 11
1B.  Unresolved Staf f Comments 21
2.  Properties 22
3.  Legal Proceedings 49
4.  Mine Safety Disclosures 49
Part II 
5.  Market for the Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 50
6.  Selected Financial Data 52
7.  Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 54
7A.  Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosure About Market Risk 73
8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 74
9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 125
9A.  Controls and Procedures 125
9B.  Other Information 127
Part III 
10.  Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 127
11.  Executive Compensation 127
12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 127
13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 127
14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services 127
Part IV 
15.  Exhibits, and Financial Statement Schedules 128
16.  Form 10-K Summary 128
    
Signatures  134
 
 
4
 
Table of Contents
Part I
Item 1.Business
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and
self-managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate
income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon
Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires,
references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating Partnership"
mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the
Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the
Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating
Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use
destinations, which consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets, and The Mills. As of December 31,
2018, we owned or held an interest in 206 income‑producing properties in the United States, which
consisted of 107 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 12 other retail properties
in 37 states and Puerto Rico. In addition, we have redevelopment and expansion projects, including the
addition of anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants, underway at several properties in the United
States, Canada, Europe and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2018, we had ownership interests
in nine Premium Outlets in Japan, four Premium Outlets in South Korea, three Premium Outlets in
Canada, two Premium Outlets in Malaysia, and one Premium Outlet in Mexico. We also own an interest
in eight Designer Outlet properties in Europe, of which six properties are consolidated, and one
Designer Outlet property in Canada. Of the eight properties in Europe, two are located in Italy, two are
located in the Netherlands and one each is located in Austria, Germany, France and the United
Kingdom. We also have three international outlet properties under development. As of December 31,
2018, we also owned a 21.3% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris‑based
real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 16 countries in
Europe.
For a description of our operational strategies and developments in our business during 2018, see
Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of
this Form 10‑K.
Other Policies
The following is a discussion of our investment policies, financing policies, conflict of interest
policies and policies with respect to certain other activities. One or more of these policies may be
amended or rescinded from time to time without a stockholder vote.
Investment Policies
While we emphasize equity real estate investments, we may also provide secured financing to or
invest in equity or debt securities of other entities engaged in real estate activities or securities of other
issuers consistent with Simon’s qualification as a REIT. However, any of these investments would be
subject to the percentage ownership limitations and gross income tests necessary for REIT qualification.
These REIT limitations mean that Simon cannot make an investment that would cause its real estate
assets to be less than 75% of its total assets. Simon must also derive at least 75% of its gross income
directly or indirectly from investments relating to real property or mortgages on real property, including
“rents from real property,” dividends from other REITs and, in certain circumstances, interest from
certain types of temporary investments. In addition, Simon must also derive at least 95% of its gross
income from such real property investments, and from dividends, interest and gains from the sale or
dispositions of stock or securities or from other combinations of the foregoing.
Subject to Simon’s REIT limitations, we may invest in the securities of other issuers in connection
with acquisitions of indirect interests in real estate. Such an investment would normally be in the form of
general or limited partnership or membership interests in special purpose partnerships and limited
liability companies that own one or more properties. We may, in the future, acquire all or substantially all
of the securities or assets of other REITs, management companies or similar entities where such
investments would be consistent with our investment policies.
5
 ® ®
Table of Contents
Financing Policies
Because Simon’s REIT qualification requires us to distribute at least 90% of its REIT taxable
income, we regularly access the debt markets to raise the funds necessary to finance acquisitions,
develop and redevelop properties, and refinance maturing debt. We must comply with the covenants
contained in our financing agreements that limit our ratio of debt to total assets or market value, as
defined. For example, the Operating Partnership’s lines of credit and the indentures for the Operating
Partnership’s debt securities contain covenants that restrict the total amount of debt of the Operating
Partnership to 65%, or 60% in relation to certain debt, of total assets, as defined under the related
agreements, and secured debt to 50% of total assets. In addition, these agreements contain other
covenants requiring compliance with financial ratios. Furthermore, the amount of debt that we may incur
is limited as a practical matter by our desire to maintain acceptable ratings for the debt securities of the
Operating Partnership. We strive to maintain investment grade ratings at all times for various business
reasons, including their effect on our ability to access attractive capital, but we cannot assure you that
we will be able to do so in the future.
If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to seek additional capital, we may raise such capital by
offering equity or incurring debt, creating joint ventures with existing ownership interests in properties,
entering into joint venture arrangements for new development projects, retaining cash flows or a
combination of these methods. If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to raise equity capital, it may,
without stockholder approval, issue additional shares of common stock or other capital stock. Simon’s
Board of Directors may issue a number of shares up to the amount of our authorized capital or may
issue units in any manner and on such terms and for such consideration as it deems appropriate. We
may also raise additional capital by issuing common units of partnership interest in the Operating
Partnership, or units. Such securities also may include additional classes of Simon’s preferred stock or
preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, which may be
convertible into common stock or units, as the case may be. Existing stockholders and unitholders have
no preemptive right to purchase shares or units in any subsequent issuances of securities by us. Any
issuance of equity could dilute a stockholder’s investment in Simon or a limited partner’s investment in
the Operating Partnership.
We expect most future borrowings will be made through the Operating Partnership or its
subsidiaries. We might, however, incur borrowings through other entities that would be reloaned to the
Operating Partnership. Borrowings may be in the form of bank borrowings, publicly and privately placed
debt instruments, or purchase money obligations to the sellers of properties. Any such indebtedness
may be secured or unsecured. Any such indebtedness may also have full or limited recourse to the
borrower or be cross‑collateralized with other debt, or may be fully or partially guaranteed by the
Operating Partnership. We issue unsecured debt securities through the Operating Partnership, but we
may issue other debt securities which may be convertible into common or preferred stock or be
accompanied by warrants to purchase common or preferred stock. We also may sell or securitize our
lease receivables. Although we may borrow to fund the payment of dividends, we currently have no
expectation that we will regularly do so.
The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility.
The Credit Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion during its
term. The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is June 30, 2021 and can be extended for an
additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms
thereof. The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an additional
facility fee of 10 basis points. The Operating Partnership also has a $3.5 billion supplemental unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit Facility, the Credit
Facilities. On February 15, 2018, the Operating Partnership amended and extended the Supplemental
Facility. The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5
billion during its term. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was extended to June 30,
2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to our
continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the Supplemental Facility was
reduced to LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points from LIBOR plus 80 basis points, with an additional facility fee
of 10 basis points. The Credit Facilities provide for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen,
Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.
The Operating Partnership also has available a global unsecured commercial paper note
program, or Commercial Paper program. On November 14, 2018, the Operating Partnership increased
the maximum aggregate program size of its Commercial Paper program from $1.0 billion to $2.0 billion,
or the non‑U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial
paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non‑U.S.
currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed
by the Operating Partnership. Notes are sold under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial
paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above) pari
passu with the Operating Partnership’s other unsecured senior indebtedness. The Commercial Paper
program is supported by the Credit Facilities and, if
6
 
Table of Contents
necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either Credit Facility to pay amounts
outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program.
We may also finance our business through the following:
·issuance of shares of common stock or preferred stock or warrants to purchase the same;
·issuance of additional units;
·issuance of preferred units;
·issuance of other securities, including unsecured notes and mortgage debt;
·draws on our Credit Facilities;
·borrowings under the Commercial Paper program; or
·sale or exchange of ownership interests in properties.
The Operating Partnership may also issue units to contributors of properties or other partnership
interests which may permit the contributor to defer tax gain recognition under the Internal Revenue
Code.
We do not have a policy limiting the number or amount of mortgages that may be placed on any
particular property. Mortgage financing instruments, however, typically limit additional indebtedness on
such properties. Additionally, the Credit Facilities, our unsecured note indentures and other contracts
may limit our ability to borrow and contain limits on mortgage indebtedness we may incur as well as
certain financial covenants we must maintain.
Typically, we invest in or form special purpose entities to assist us in obtaining secured permanent
financing at attractive terms. Permanent financing may be structured as a mortgage loan on a single
property, or on a group of properties, and generally requires us to provide a mortgage lien on the
property or properties in favor of an institutional third party, as a joint venture with a third party, or as a
securitized financing. For securitized financings, we create special purpose entities to own the
properties. These special purpose entities, which are common in the real estate industry, are structured
so that they would not be consolidated in a bankruptcy proceeding involving a parent company. We
decide upon the structure of the financing based upon the best terms then available to us and whether
the proposed financing is consistent with our other business objectives. For accounting purposes, we
include the outstanding securitized debt of special purpose entities owning consolidated properties as
part of our consolidated indebtedness.
Conflict of Interest Policies
We maintain policies and have entered into agreements designed to reduce or eliminate potential
conflicts of interest. Simon has adopted governance principles governing the function, conduct,
selection, orientation and duties of its subsidiaries and Simon’s Board of Directors and the Company, as
well as written charters for each of the standing Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors. In addition,
Simon’s Board of Directors has a Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, which applies to all of its
officers, directors, and employees and those of its subsidiaries. At least a majority of the members of
Simon’s Board of Directors must qualify, and do qualify, as independent under the listing standards of
the New York Stock Exchange, or NYSE, and cannot be affiliated with the Simon family, who are
significant stockholders in Simon and/or unitholders in the Operating Partnership. In addition, the Audit
and Compensation Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors are comprised entirely of independent
members who meet the additional independence and financial expert requirements of the NYSE. Any
transaction between us and the Simon family, including property acquisitions, service and property
management agreements and retail space leases, must be approved by a majority of Simon’s non-
affiliated directors.
The sale by the Operating Partnership of any property that it owns may have an adverse tax
impact on the Simon family or other limited partners of the Operating Partnership. In order to avoid any
conflict of interest, the Simon charter requires that at least three-fourths of Simon’s independent
directors must authorize and require the Operating Partnership to sell any property it owns. Any such
sale is subject to applicable agreements with third parties. Noncompetition agreements executed by
David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President and Herbert Simon, Simon’s
Chairman Emeritus, as well as David Simon's employment agreement, contain covenants limiting their
ability to participate in certain shopping center activities.
7
 
Table of Contents
Policies With Respect To Certain Other Activities
We intend to make investments which are consistent with Simon’s qualification as a REIT, unless
Simon’s Board of Directors determines that it is no longer in Simon’s best interests to so qualify as a
REIT. Simon’s Board of Directors may make such a determination because of changing circumstances
or changes in the REIT requirements. Simon has authority to issue shares of its capital stock or other
securities in exchange for property. We also have authority to repurchase or otherwise reacquire
Simon’s shares, the Operating Partnership’s units, or any other securities. On February 13, 2017,
Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously authorized $2.0 billion
common stock repurchase plan, or the Repurchase Program, through March 31, 2019 and on February
11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the new
program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period
ending February 11, 2021. Under the Repurchase Program, Simon may repurchase the shares in the
open market, or in privately negotiated transactions. At December 31, 2018, we had remaining authority
to repurchase $640.6 million of common stock. Simon may also issue shares of its common stock, or
pay cash at its option, to holders of units in future periods upon exercise of such holders’ rights under
the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. Our policy prohibits us from making any loans
to the directors or executive officers of Simon for any purpose. We may make loans to the joint ventures
in which we participate. Additionally, we may make or buy interests in loans secured by real estate
properties owned by others or make investments in companies that own real estate assets.
Competition
The retail real estate industry is dynamic and competitive. We compete with numerous
merchandise distribution channels, including malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and
other shopping centers in the United States and abroad. We also compete with internet retailing sites
and catalogs which provide retailers with distribution options beyond existing brick and mortar retail
properties. The existence of competitive alternatives could have a material adverse effect on our ability
to lease space and on the level of rents we can obtain. This results in competition for both the tenants to
occupy the properties that we develop and manage as well as for the acquisition of prime sites
(including land for development and operating properties). We believe that there are numerous factors
that make our properties highly desirable to retailers, including:
·the quality, location and diversity of our properties;
·our management and operational expertise;
·our extensive experience and relationships with retailers, lenders and suppliers; and
·our marketing initiatives and consumer focused strategic corporate alliances.
Certain Activities
During the past three years, we have:
·issued 5,614,062 shares of Simon common stock upon the exchange of units in the Operating
Partnership;
·issued 191,740 restricted shares of Simon common stock and 586,720 long‑term incentive
performance units, or LTIP units, net of forfeitures, under The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan, as amended, or the 1998 Plan;
·purchased 6,153,021 shares of Simon common stock in the open market for $1.02 billion
pursuant to our Repurchase Program;
·issued 475,183 units in the Operating Partnership in exchange for the remaining interest in a
former joint venture property;
·redeemed 454,704 units in the Operating Partnership at an average price of $179.25 per unit in
cash;
·amended the Supplemental Facility in April 2016 to increase our borrowing capacity, and
amended and extended the Supplemental Facility in February 2018 to further increase our
borrowing capacity, extend its term and reduce its base interest rate;
·amended and extended the Credit Facility in March 2017 to extend its term and reduce its base
interest rate;
8
 
Table of Contents
·borrowed a maximum amount of $423.1 million under the Credit Facilities; the outstanding
amount of borrowings under the Credit Facility as of December 31, 2018 was $125.0 million and
no borrowings were outstanding under the Supplemental Facility;
·increased the borrowing capacity of the Commercial Paper program from $1.0 billion to
$2.0 billion in November 2018; the outstanding amount of Commercial Paper notes as of
December 31, 2018 was $758.7 million; and
·provided annual reports containing financial statements audited by our independent registered
public accounting firm and quarterly reports containing unaudited financial statements to our
security holders.
Employees
At December 31, 2018, we and our affiliates employed approximately 5,000 persons at various
properties and offices throughout the United States, of which approximately 1,700 were part‑time.
Approximately 1,000 of these employees were located at our corporate headquarters in Indianapolis,
Indiana.
Corporate Headquarters
Our corporate headquarters are located at 225 West Washington Street, Indianapolis, Indiana
46204, and our telephone number is (317) 636‑1600.
Available Information
Simon is a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b‑2 of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, or the Exchange Act) and is required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S‑K, to
provide certain information regarding our website and the availability of certain documents filed with or
furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission, or the SEC. Our Internet website address is
www.simon.com. Our annual reports on Form 10‑K, quarterly reports on Form 10‑Q, current reports on
Form 8‑K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the
Exchange Act are available or may be accessed free of charge through the “About Simon/Investor
Relations” section of our Internet website as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file
such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our Internet website and the information contained therein
or connected thereto are not, and are not intended to be, incorporated into this Annual Report on
Form 10‑K.
The following corporate governance documents are also available through the “About
Simon/Investor Relations/ Governance” section of our Internet website or may be obtained in print form
by request of our Investor Relations Department: Governance Principles, Code of Business Conduct
and Ethics, Audit Committee Charter, Compensation Committee Charter, and Governance and
Nominating Committee Charter.
In addition, we intend to disclose on our Internet website any amendments to, or waivers from, our
Code of Business Conduct and Ethics that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the
SEC and the NYSE.
Executive Officers
The following table sets forth certain information with respect to Simon’s executive officers as of
February 22, 2019.
   
Name     Age    Position
David Simon  57 Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Of ficer and
President
John Rulli  62 President of Malls and Chief Administrative Of ficer
Steven E. Fivel  58 General Counsel and Secretary
Brian J. McDade  39 Executive V ice President, Chief Financial Of ficer and
Treasurer
Alexander L. W . Snyder  49 Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary
Adam J. Reuille  44 Senior V ice President and Chief Accounting Of ficer
The executive officers of Simon serve at the pleasure of Simon’s Board of Directors, except for
David Simon who is subject to an employment agreement which may call for certain payments upon
termination.
Mr. Simon has served as the Chairman of Simon’s Board of Directors since 2007, Chief Executive
Officer of Simon or its predecessor since 1995 and assumed the position of President in 2019.
Mr. Simon has also been a director of Simon or its predecessor since its incorporation in 1993.
Mr. Simon was the President of Simon’s predecessor from 1993 to 1996. From 1988 to 1990, Mr. Simon
was Vice President of Wasserstein Perella & Company. From 1985 to 1988, he was an Associate at
First Boston Corp. He is the son of the late Melvin Simon and the nephew of Herbert Simon.
9
 
Table of Contents
Mr. Rulli serves as Simon’s President of Malls and Chief Administrative Officer. Mr. Rulli joined
Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or MSA, in 1988 and held various positions with MSA and Simon
thereafter. Mr. Rulli became Chief Administrative Officer in 2007 and was promoted to Senior Executive
Vice President in 2011. Mr. Rulli was promoted to President of Malls in 2017.
Mr. Fivel serves as Simon’s General Counsel and Secretary. Prior to rejoining Simon in 2011 as
Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary, Mr. Fivel served as Executive Vice President,
General Counsel and Secretary of Brightpoint, Inc. Mr. Fivel was previously employed by MSA from
1988 until 1993 and then by Simon from 1993 to 1996.  Mr. Fivel was promoted to General Counsel and
Secretary in 2017.
Mr. McDade serves as Simon’s Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer.
Mr. McDade joined Simon in 2007 as the Director of Capital Markets and was promoted to Senior Vice
President of Capital Markets in 2013. Mr. McDade became Treasurer in 2014 and was promoted to
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in 2018.
Mr. Snyder serves as Simon’s Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary. Mr. Snyder
joined Simon in 2016 as Senior Deputy General Counsel. Immediately prior to joining Simon, Mr. Snyder
was Managing Partner of the Crimson Fulcrum Strategic Institute. Mr. Snyder previously served as
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary for Beechcraft Corporation as well
as Chief Counsel Mergers & Acquisitions for Koch Industries, Inc.  Mr. Snyder was promoted to
Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary in 2017.
Mr. Reuille serves as Simon’s Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer and prior to that
as Simon’s Vice President and Corporate Controller. Mr. Reuille joined Simon in 2009 and was
promoted to Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer in 2018.
10
 
Table of Contents
Item 1A.  Risk Factors
The following factors, among others, could cause our actual results to differ materially from those
expressed or implied in forward‑looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K and
presented elsewhere by our management from time to time. These factors may have a material adverse
effect on our business, financial condition, liquidity, results of operations, funds from operations, or FFO,
and prospects, which we refer to herein as a material adverse effect on us or as materially and
adversely affecting us, and you should carefully consider them. Additional risks and uncertainties not
presently known to us or which are currently not believed to be material may also affect our actual
results. We may update these factors in our future periodic reports.
Risks Relating to Retail Operations
Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and
adversely affect us.
Our concentration in the retail real estate market – our primary source of revenue is retail tenants
– means that we could be materially and adversely affected by conditions that materially and adversely
affect the retail environment generally, including, without limitation:
·levels of consumer spending, changes in consumer confidence, income levels, and fluctuations
in seasonal spending in the United States and internationally;
·consumer perceptions of the safety, convenience and attractiveness of our properties;
·the impact on our retail tenants and demand for retail space at our properties from the
increasing use of the Internet by retailers and consumers;
·the creditworthiness of our retail tenants and the availability of new creditworthy tenants and the
related impact on our occupancy levels and rental revenues;
·local real estate conditions, such as an oversupply of, or reduction in demand for, retail space or
retail goods, decreases in rental rates and declines in real estate values;
·the willingness of retailers to lease space in our properties at attractive rents, or at all;
·changes in economic conditions, which can result from global events such as international trade
disputes, a foreign debt crisis, foreign currency volatility, natural disasters, war, civil unrest and
terrorism, as well as from domestic issues, such as government policies and regulations, tariffs,
energy prices, market dynamics, rising interest rates and limited growth in consumer income;
·increased operating costs and capital expenditures, whether from redevelopments, replacing
tenants or otherwise; and
·changes in applicable laws and regulations, including tax, environmental, safety and zoning.
Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized
tenants to attract shoppers and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss
of one or more of these anchors or tenants.
Our properties are typically anchored by department stores and other large nationally recognized
tenants. Certain of our anchors and other tenants have ceased their operations, downsized their brick-
and-mortar presence or failed to comply with their contractual obligations to us and others. 
For example, among department stores and other national retailers — often referred to as “big
box” stores — corporate merger activity typically results in the closure of duplicate or geographically
overlapping store locations. Further, sustained adverse pressure on the results of our department stores
and other national retailers may have a similarly sustained adverse impact upon our own results.
Certain department stores and other national retailers have experienced, and may continue to
experience for the foreseeable future (given current macroeconomic uncertainty and less-than-desirable
levels of consumer confidence), considerable decreases in customer traffic in their retail stores,
increased competition from alternative retail options such as those accessible via the Internet and other
forms of pressure on their business models. As pressure on these department stores and other national
retailers increases, their ability to maintain their stores, meet their obligations both to us and to their
external lenders and suppliers, withstand takeover attempts or avoid bankruptcy and/or liquidation may
be impaired and result in closures of their stores or their seeking of a lease
11
 
Table of Contents
modification with us. Any lease modification could be unfavorable to us as the lessor and could
decrease current or future effective rents or expense recovery charges. Other tenants may be entitled to
modify the economic or other terms of, or terminate, their existing leases with us in the event of such
closures.
If a department store or large nationally recognized tenant were to close its stores at our
properties, we may experience difficulty and delay and incur significant expense in re-tenanting the
space, as well as in leasing spaces in areas adjacent to the vacant store, at attractive rates, or at all.
Additionally, department store or tenant closures may result in decreased customer traffic, which could
lead to decreased sales at our properties. If the sales of stores operating in our properties were to
decline significantly due to the closing of anchor stores or other national retailers, adverse economic
conditions, or other reasons, tenants may be unable to pay their minimum rents or expense recovery
charges. In the event of any default by a tenant, we may not be able to fully recover, and/or may
experience delays and costs in enforcing our rights as landlord to recover, amounts due to us under the
terms of our leases with such parties.
We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
Bankruptcy filings by retailers can occur regularly in the course of our operations. If a tenant files
for bankruptcy, the tenant may have the right to reject and terminate one or more of its leases with us,
and we cannot be sure that it will affirm one or more of its leases and continue to make rental payments
to us in a timely manner. A bankruptcy filing by, or relating to, one of our tenants would generally prohibit
us from evicting this tenant, and bar all efforts by us to collect pre-bankruptcy debts from that tenant, or
from their property, unless we receive an order permitting us to do so from the bankruptcy court. In
addition, we cannot evict a tenant solely because of its bankruptcy. If a lease is assumed by the tenant
in bankruptcy, all pre-bankruptcy balances due under the lease must be paid to us in full. If a lease is
rejected, the unsecured claim we hold against a bankrupt tenant might be paid only to the extent that
funds are available and only in the same percentage as is paid to all other holders of unsecured claims,
and there are restrictions under bankruptcy laws that limit the amount of the claim we can make if a
lease is rejected. As a result, it is likely that we would recover substantially less than the full value of any
unsecured claims we hold. In addition, we may make lease modifications either pre- or post-bankruptcy
for certain tenants undergoing significant financial distress in order for them to continue as a going
concern.   Furthermore, we may be required to incur significant expense in re-tenanting the space
formerly leased to the bankrupt tenant. We continually seek to re-lease vacant spaces resulting from
tenant terminations. The bankruptcy of a tenant, particularly an anchor tenant or a national tenant with
multiple locations, may require a substantial redevelopment of their space, the success of which cannot
be assured, and may make the re-tenanting of their space difficult and costly, and it also may be more
difficult to lease the remainder of the space at the affected property. Future tenant bankruptcies may
strain our resources and impact our ability to successfully execute our re-leasing strategy and could
materially and adversely affect us.
We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably.
Our properties compete with other retail properties and other forms of retailing such as e-
commerce websites. Competition may come from malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and
other shopping centers, both existing as well as future development and redevelopment/expansion
projects, as well as e-commerce. The presence of competitive alternatives affects our ability to lease
space and puts downward pressure on the rents we can charge our tenants. New construction,
redevelopments and expansions at competing sites could also negatively affect our properties.
We also compete with other major real estate investors and developers for attractive investment
opportunities and prime development sites. Competition for the acquisition of existing properties and
development sites may result in increased purchase prices and may adversely affect our ability to make
attractive investments on favorable terms, or at all. In addition, we compete with other retail property
companies for tenants and qualified management.
Excess space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
Certain of our properties have had excess space available for prospective tenants, and those
properties may continue to experience, and other properties may commence experiencing, such
oversupply in the future.  Among other causes, (1) there has been an increased number of bankruptcies
of anchor stores and other national retailers, as well as store closures, and (2) there has been lower
demand from retail tenants for space, due to certain retailers increasing their use of e-commerce
websites to distribute their merchandise.  As a result of the increased bargaining power of creditworthy
retail tenants, there is downward pressure on our rental rates and occupancy levels, and this increased
bargaining power may also result in us having to increase our spend on tenant improvements and
potentially make other lease modifications, any of which, in the aggregate, could materially and
adversely affect us.
12
 
Table of Contents
We may not be able to lease newly developed properties and renew leases and relet space
at existing properties.
We may not be able to lease new properties to an appropriate mix of tenants that generates
optimal customer traffic. Also, when leases for our existing properties expire, the premises may not be
relet or the terms of reletting, including the cost of allowances and concessions to tenants, may be less
favorable than the current lease terms. If we elect to pursue a “mixed use” redevelopment we expose
ourselves to risks associated with each non-retail use (eg. office, residential, hotel and entertainment).
To the extent that our leasing goals are not achieved, we could be materially and adversely affected.
Risks Relating to Real Estate Investments and Operations
Our international activities may subject us to different or greater risk from those
associated with our domestic operations.
As of December 31, 2018, we held interests in consolidated and joint venture properties that
operate in Austria, Canada, France, Italy, Germany, Japan, Malaysia, Mexico, the Netherlands, South
Korea, and the United Kingdom. We also have an equity stake in Klépierre, a publicly traded European
real estate company, which operates in 16 countries in Europe. Accordingly, our operating results and
the value of our international operations may be impacted by any unhedged movements in the foreign
currencies in which those operations transact and in which our net investment in the international
operation is held. We may pursue additional investment, development and redevelopment/expansion
opportunities outside the United States. International investment, ownership, development and
redevelopment/expansion activities carry risks that are different from those we face with our domestic
properties and operations. These risks include, but are not limited to:
·adverse effects of changes in exchange rates for foreign currencies;
·changes in foreign political and economic environments, regionally, nationally, and locally;
·impact from international trade disputes and the associated impact on our tenants’ supply chain
and consumer spending levels;
·challenges of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws, including corporate governance,
operations, taxes and litigation;
·differing lending practices;
·differences in cultures;
·changes in applicable laws and regulations in the United States that affect international
operations;
·changes in applicable laws and regulations in these foreign jurisdictions;
·difficulties in managing international operations; and
·obstacles to the repatriation of earnings and cash.
Our international activities represented approximately 5.1% of consolidated net income and 10.0%
of our net operating income, or NOI, for the year ended December 31, 2018. To the extent that we
expand our international activities, the above risks could increase in significance, which in turn could
have a material adverse effect on us.
We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion
of properties.
We regularly acquire and develop new properties and redevelop and expand existing properties,
and these activities are subject to various risks. We may not be successful in pursuing acquisition,
development or redevelopment/expansion opportunities. In addition, newly acquired, developed or
redeveloped/expanded properties may not perform as well as expected, impacting our anticipated return
on investment. We are subject to other risks in connection with any acquisition, development and
redevelopment/expansion activities, including the following:
·acquisition or construction costs of a project may be higher than projected, potentially making
the project unfeasible or unprofitable;
·development, redevelopment or expansions may take considerably longer than expected,
delaying the commencement and amount of income from the property;
·we may not be able to obtain financing or to refinance loans on favorable terms, or at all;
13
 
Table of Contents
·we may be unable to obtain zoning, occupancy or other governmental approvals;
·occupancy rates and rents may not meet our projections and the project may not be accretive;
and
·we may need the consent of third parties such as department stores, anchor tenants, mortgage
lenders and joint venture partners, and those consents may be withheld.
If a development or redevelopment/expansion project is unsuccessful, either because it is not
meeting our expectations when operational or was not completed according to the project planning, we
could lose our investment in the project. Further, if we guarantee the property’s financing, our loss could
exceed our investment in the project.
In the event that these risks were realized at the same time at multiple properties, we could be
materially and adversely affected.
Real estate investments are relatively illiquid.
Our properties represent a substantial portion of our total consolidated assets. These investments
are relatively illiquid. As a result, our ability to sell one or more of our properties or investments in real
estate in response to any changes in economic, industry, or other conditions may be limited. The real
estate market is affected by many factors, such as general economic conditions, availability and terms
of financing, interest rates and other factors, including supply and demand for space, that are beyond
our control. If we want to sell a property, we cannot assure you that we will be able to dispose of it in the
desired time period or at all or that the sales price of a property will be attractive at the relevant time or
exceed the carrying value of our investment. Moreover, if a property is mortgaged, we may not be able
to obtain a release of the lien on that property without the payment of the associated debt and/or a
substantial prepayment penalty, which could restrict our ability to dispose of the property, even though
the sale might otherwise be desirable.
Risks Relating to Debt and the Financial Markets
We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
As of December 31, 2018, our consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding
related premium, discount and debt issuance costs, totaled $23.4 billion. As a result of this
indebtedness, we are required to use a substantial portion of our cash flows for debt service, including
selected repayment at scheduled maturities, which limits our ability to use those cash flows to fund the
growth of our business. We are also subject to the risks normally associated with debt financing,
including the risk that our cash flows from operations will be insufficient to meet required debt service or
that we will be able to refinance such indebtedness on acceptable terms, or at all. Our debt service
costs generally will not be reduced if developments at the applicable property, such as the entry of new
competitors or the loss of major tenants, cause a reduction in the income from the property. Our
indebtedness could also have other adverse consequences on us, including reducing our access to
capital or increasing our vulnerability to general adverse economic, industry and market conditions. In
addition, if a property is mortgaged to secure payment of indebtedness and income from such property
is insufficient to pay that indebtedness, the property could be foreclosed upon by the mortgagee
resulting in a loss of income and a decline in our total asset value. If any of the foregoing occurs, we
could be materially and adversely affected.
The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose
restrictions on us that might affect our ability to operate freely.
We have a variety of unsecured debt, including the Credit Facilities, senior unsecured notes and
commercial paper, and secured property level debt. Certain of the agreements that govern our
indebtedness contain covenants, including, among other things, limitations on our ability to incur
secured and unsecured indebtedness, sell all or substantially all of our assets and engage in mergers
and certain acquisitions. In addition, certain of the agreements that govern our indebtedness contain
financial covenants that require us to maintain certain financial ratios, including certain coverage ratios.
These covenants may restrict our ability to pursue certain business initiatives or certain transactions that
might otherwise be advantageous to us. In addition, our ability to comply with these provisions might be
affected by events beyond our control. Failure to comply with any of our financing covenants could
result in an event of default, which, if not cured or waived, could accelerate the related indebtedness as
well as other of our indebtedness, which could have a material adverse effect on us.
14
 
Table of Contents
Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access
external financings for our growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
We depend on external financings, principally debt financings, to fund the growth of our business
and to ensure that we can meet ongoing maturities of our outstanding debt. Our access to financing
depends on the willingness of lending institutions and other debt investors to grant credit to us and
conditions in the capital markets in general. An economic recession may cause extreme volatility and
disruption in the capital and credit markets. We rely upon the Credit Facilities as sources of funding for
numerous transactions. Our access to these funds is dependent upon the ability of each of the
participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding commitments to us. When markets are volatile,
access to capital and credit markets could be disrupted over an extended period of time and one or
more financial institutions may not have the available capital to meet their previous commitments to us.
The failure of one or more participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding commitments to us
could have a material adverse effect on us, including as a result of making it difficult to obtain the
financing we may need for future growth and/or meeting our debt service requirements. We cannot
assure you that we will be able to obtain the financing we need for the future growth of our business or
to meet our debt service requirements, or that a sufficient amount of financing will be available to us on
favorable terms, or at all.
Adverse changes in our credit rating could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing
terms.
The Operating Partnership’s outstanding senior unsecured notes, Credit Facilities, the
Commercial Paper program, and Simon’s preferred stock are periodically rated by nationally recognized
credit rating agencies. The credit ratings are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage
ratios, financial condition and prospects, and other factors viewed by the credit rating agencies as
relevant to us and our industry and the economic outlook in general. Our credit rating can affect the
amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms of any financing we obtain. Since we depend
primarily on debt financing to fund the growth of our business, an adverse change in our credit rating,
including actual changes and changes in outlook, or even the initiation of a review of our credit rating
that could result in an adverse change, could have a material adverse effect on us.
An increase in interest rates would increase our interest costs on variable rate debt and
could adversely impact our ability to refinance existing debt on attractive terms, or at all;
our hedging interest rate protection arrangements may not effectively limit our interest rate
risk.
As of December 31, 2018, we had approximately $844 million of outstanding consolidated
indebtedness that bears interest at variable rates, and we may incur more variable rate indebtedness in
the future. If interest rates increase, then so would the interest costs on our unhedged variable rate
debt, which could adversely affect our cash flows and our ability to pay principal and interest on our debt
and our ability to make distributions to our stockholders. Further, rising interest rates could limit our
ability to refinance existing debt when it matures or significantly increase our future interest expense.
We selectively manage our exposure to interest rate risk by a combination of interest rate
protection agreements to effectively fix or cap all or a portion of our variable rate debt. In addition, we
refinance fixed rate debt at times when we believe rates and other terms are appropriate. Our efforts to
manage these exposures may not be successful.
Our use of interest rate hedging arrangements to manage risk associated with interest rate
volatility may expose us to additional risks, including a risk that a counterparty to a hedging arrangement
may fail to honor its obligations or that we could be required to fund our contractual payment obligations
under such arrangements in relatively large amounts or on short notice. Developing an effective interest
rate risk strategy is complex and no strategy can completely insulate us from risks associated with
interest rate fluctuations. There can be no assurance that our hedging activities will have the desired
beneficial impact on our results of operations, liquidity and financial condition. Termination of these
hedging agreements typically involves costs, such as transaction fees or breakage costs. 
Risks Relating to Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as
REITs in the United States and certain international operations also are structured to be
taxed in a manner similar to the REIT structure. The failure to maintain Simon’s or these
subsidiaries’ qualifications as REITs or changes in local tax laws or regulations in certain
of our international operations could result in adverse tax consequences.
We are subject to certain income-based taxes, both domestically and internationally, and other
taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, and withholding taxes on dividends from certain
of our international investments. We
15
 
Table of Contents
currently follow local tax laws and regulations in various domestic and international jurisdictions. Should
these laws or regulations change, the amount of taxes we pay may increase accordingly.
In the United States, Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to
be taxed as REITs under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code. We believe Simon
and these subsidiaries have been organized and operated in a manner which allows them to qualify for
taxation as REITs under the Internal Revenue Code. We intend to continue to operate in this manner.
However, qualification and taxation as REITs depend upon the ability of Simon and these subsidiaries to
satisfy several requirements (some of which are outside our control), including tests related to our
annual operating results, asset diversification, distribution levels and diversity of stock ownership. The
various REIT qualification tests required by the Internal Revenue Code are highly technical and
complex. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that Simon or any of these subsidiaries has operated
in accordance with these requirements or will continue to operate in a manner so as to qualify or remain
qualified as a REIT.
If Simon or any of these subsidiaries fail to comply with those provisions, Simon or any such
subsidiary may be subject to monetary penalties or ultimately to possible disqualification as REITs. If
such events occur, and if available relief provisions do not apply:
·Simon or any such subsidiary will not be allowed a deduction for distributions to stockholders in
computing taxable income;
·Simon or any such subsidiary will be subject to corporate-level income tax on taxable income at
the corporate rate; and
·unless entitled to relief under relevant statutory provisions, Simon or any such subsidiary will
also be disqualified from treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the year during
which qualification was lost.
Any such corporate tax liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash
available for, among other things, our operations and distributions to stockholders. In addition, if Simon
fails to qualify as a REIT, it will not be required to make distributions to our stockholders. Moreover, a
failure by any subsidiary of the Operating Partnership that has elected to be taxed as a REIT to qualify
as a REIT would also cause Simon to fail to qualify as a REIT, and the same adverse consequences
would apply to it and its stockholders. Failure by Simon or any of these subsidiaries to qualify as a REIT
also could impair our ability to expand our business and raise capital, which could materially and
adversely affect us.
The tax imposed on REITs engaging in “prohibited transactions” may limit our ability to
engage in transactions which would be treated as sales for U.S. federal income tax
purposes.
A REIT’s net income from prohibited transactions is subject to a 100% penalty tax. In general,
prohibited transactions are sales or other dispositions of property, other than foreclosure property, held
primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course of business. Although we do not intend to hold any
properties that would be characterized as held for sale to customers in the ordinary course of our
business, unless a sale or disposition qualifies under certain statutory safe harbors, such
characterization is a factual determination and no guarantee can be given that the Internal Revenue
Service, or the IRS, would agree with our characterization of our properties or that we will always be
able to make use of the available safe harbors.
REIT distribution requirements could adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to
execute our business plan.
In order for Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership to qualify to be taxed as
REITs, and assuming that certain other requirements are also satisfied, Simon and each such subsidiary
generally must distribute at least 90% of their respective REIT taxable income, determined without
regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding any net capital gains, to their respective equity
holders each year. To this point, Simon and each such subsidiary have historically distributed at least
100% of taxable income and thereby avoided income tax altogether. To the extent that Simon or any
such subsidiary satisfies this distribution requirement and qualifies for taxation as a REIT, but distributes
less than 100% of its REIT taxable income, Simon or any such subsidiary will be subject to U.S. federal
corporate income tax on its undistributed net taxable income and could be subject to a 4%
nondeductible excise tax if the actual amount that is distributed to equity holders in a calendar year is
less than “the required minimum distribution amount” specified under U.S. federal income tax laws. We
intend to make distributions to the equity holders of Simon and the aforementioned subsidiaries of the
Operating Partnership to comply with the REIT requirements of the Internal Revenue Code.
From time to time, Simon and the aforementioned subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership might
generate taxable income greater than their respective cash flow as a result of differences in timing
between the recognition of taxable income and the actual receipt of cash or the effect of nondeductible
capital expenditures, the creation of reserves, or required debt
16
 
Table of Contents
or amortization payments. If Simon and these subsidiaries do not have other funds available in these
situations, Simon and these subsidiaries could be required to access capital on unfavorable terms (the
receipt of which cannot be assured), sell assets at disadvantageous prices, distribute amounts that
would otherwise be invested in future acquisitions, capital expenditures or repayment of debt, or make
taxable distributions of capital stock or debt securities to make distributions sufficient to enable them to
pay out enough of their respective REIT taxable income to satisfy the REIT distribution requirement and
avoid corporate income tax and the 4% excise tax in a particular year. These alternatives could increase
costs or reduce our equity. Further, amounts distributed will not be available to fund the growth of our
business. Thus, compliance with the REIT requirements may adversely affect our liquidity and our ability
to execute our business plan.
Complying with REIT requirements might cause us to forego otherwise attractive
acquisition opportunities or liquidate otherwise attractive investments.
To qualify to be taxed as REITs for U.S. federal income tax purposes, Simon and certain
subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership must ensure that, at the end of each calendar quarter, at least
75% of the value of their respective assets consist of cash, cash items, government securities and “real
estate assets” (as defined in the Internal Revenue Code), including certain mortgage loans and
securities. The remainder of their respective investments (other than government securities, qualified
real estate assets and securities issued by a taxable REIT subsidiary, or TRS) generally cannot include
more than 10% of the outstanding voting securities of any one issuer or more than 10% of the total
value of the outstanding securities of any one issuer.
Additionally, in general, no more than 5% of the value of Simon’s and these subsidiaries’ total
assets (other than government securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS)
can consist of the securities of any one issuer, and no more than 20% of the value of their respective
total assets can be represented by securities of one or more TRSs. If Simon or any of these subsidiaries
fails to comply with these requirements at the end of any calendar quarter, Simon or any such subsidiary
must correct the failure within 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter or qualify for certain
statutory relief provisions to avoid losing its REIT qualification and suffering adverse tax consequences.
As a result, we might be required to liquidate or forego otherwise attractive investments. These actions
could have the effect of reducing our income and amounts available for distribution to equity holders.
In addition to the asset tests set forth above, to qualify to be taxed as REITs, Simon and these
subsidiaries must continually satisfy tests concerning, among other things, the sources of their
respective income, the amounts they distribute to equity holders and the ownership of their respective
shares. We might be unable to pursue investments that would be otherwise advantageous to us in order
to satisfy the source-of-income or asset-diversification requirements for qualifying as REITs. Thus,
compliance with the REIT requirements may hinder our ability to make certain attractive investments.
Partnership tax audit rules could have a material adverse effect on us.
The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 changes the rules applicable to U.S. federal income tax audits
of partnerships. Under the rules, among other changes and subject to certain exceptions, any audit
adjustment to items of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a partnership (and any partner’s
distributive share thereof) is determined, and taxes, interest, or penalties attributable thereto could be
assessed and collected, at the partnership level. Absent available elections, it is possible that a
partnership in which we directly or indirectly invest, could be required to pay additional taxes, interest
and penalties as a result of an audit adjustment, and we, as a direct or indirect partner of these
partnerships, could be required to bear the economic burden of those taxes, interest, and penalties even
though Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership, as REITs, may not otherwise have
been required to pay additional corporate-level taxes had they owned the assets of the partnership
directly. The partnership tax audit rules apply to the Operating Partnership and its subsidiaries that are
classified as partnerships for U.S. federal income tax purposes.  The changes created by these rules
are sweeping and, accordingly, there can be no assurance that these rules will not have a material
adverse effect on us. 
Legislative, administrative, regulatory or other actions affecting REITs, including positions
taken by the IRS, could have a material adverse effect on us and our investors.
The rules dealing with U.S. federal income taxation are constantly under review by persons
involved in the legislative process, and by the IRS and the U.S. Department of the Treasury, or the
Treasury. Changes to the tax laws or interpretations thereof by the IRS and the Treasury, with or without
retroactive application, could materially and adversely affect us and our investors. New legislation
(including the recently enacted Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or the TCJA, and any technical corrections
legislation), Treasury regulations, administrative interpretations or court decisions could significantly and
negatively affect the ability of Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership to qualify to
be taxed as REITs and/or the U.S. federal income tax consequences to us and our investors of such
qualification.
17
 
Table of Contents
The TCJA has significantly changed the U.S. federal income taxation of U.S. businesses and their
owners, including REITs and their stockholders. A change made by the TCJA that could affect us and
our stockholders is that it generally limits the deduction for net business interest expense in excess of
30% of a business’s adjusted taxable income except for taxpayers that engage in certain real estate
businesses and elect out of this rule (provided that such electing taxpayers must use an alternative
depreciation system for certain property).
Risks Relating to Joint Ventures
We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or
managed by third parties, which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
As of December 31, 2018, we owned interests in 99 income-producing properties with other
parties. Of those, 18 properties are included in our consolidated financial statements. We account for
the other 81 properties, or the joint venture properties, as well as our investments in Klépierre (a publicly
traded, Paris-based real estate company), Aéropostale, Authentic Brands Group, LLC, or ABG, and HBS
Global Properties, or HBS, using the equity method of accounting. We serve as general partner or
property manager for 57 of these 81 joint venture properties; however, certain major decisions, such as
approving the operating budget and selling, refinancing, and redeveloping the properties, require the
consent of the other owners. Of the joint venture properties for which we do not serve as general partner
or property manager, 20 are in our international joint ventures. These international properties are
managed locally by joint ventures in which we share control of the properties with our partner. The other
owners have participating rights that we consider substantive for purposes of determining control over
the joint venture properties’ assets. The remaining joint venture properties, Klépierre, and our joint
ventures with Aéropostale, ABG, and HBS, are managed by third parties.
These investments, and other future similar investments, could involve risks that would not be
present were a third party not involved, including the possibility that partners or other owners might
become bankrupt, suffer a deterioration in their creditworthiness, or fail to fund their share of required
capital contributions. Partners or other owners could have economic or other business interests or goals
that are inconsistent with our own business interests or goals, and could be in a position to take actions
contrary to our policies or objectives.
These investments, and other future similar investments, also have the potential risk of creating
impasses on decisions, such as a sale or financing, because neither we nor our partner or other owner
has full control over the partnership or joint venture. Disputes between us and partners or other owners
might result in litigation or arbitration that could increase our expenses and prevent Simon’s officers
and/or directors from focusing their time and efforts on our business. Consequently, actions by, or
disputes with, partners or other owners might result in subjecting properties owned by the partnership or
joint venture to additional risk. In addition, we risk the possibility of being liable for the actions of our
partners or other owners. 
The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of
joint venture properties.
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by a mortgage on the
joint venture property, which is non-recourse to us. Nevertheless, the joint venture’s failure to satisfy its
debt obligations could result in the loss of our investment therein. As of December 31, 2018, the
Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture related mortgage indebtedness of $216.1 million (of
which we have a right of recovery from our joint venture partners of $10.8 million). A default by a joint
venture under its debt obligations would expose us to liability under a guaranty. We may elect to fund
cash needs of a joint venture through equity contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our
ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although such fundings are not typically required
contractually or otherwise.
Risks Relating to Environmental Matters
As owners of real estate, we can face liabilities for environmental contamination.
U.S. federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment may
require us, as a current or previous owner or operator of real property, to investigate and clean up
hazardous or toxic substances or petroleum product releases at a property or at impacted neighboring
properties. These laws often impose liability regardless of whether the property owner or operator knew
of, or was responsible for, the presence of hazardous or toxic substances. These laws and regulations
may require the abatement or removal of asbestos containing materials in the event of damage,
demolition or renovation, reconstruction or expansion of a property and also govern emissions of and
exposure to asbestos fibers in the air. Those laws and regulations also govern the installation,
maintenance and removal of underground storage
18
 
Table of Contents
tanks used to store waste oils or other petroleum products. Many of our properties contain, or at one
time contained, asbestos containing materials or underground storage tanks (primarily related to auto
service center establishments or emergency electrical generation equipment). We may be subject to
regulatory action and may also be held liable to third parties for personal injury or property damage
incurred by the parties in connection with any such laws and regulations or hazardous or toxic
substances. The costs of investigation, removal or remediation of hazardous or toxic substances, and
related liabilities, may be substantial and could materially and adversely affect us. The presence of
hazardous or toxic substances, or the failure to remediate the related contamination, may also adversely
affect our ability to sell, lease or redevelop a property or to borrow money using a property as collateral.
Our efforts to identify environmental liabilities may not be successful.
Although we believe that our portfolio is in substantial compliance with U.S. federal, state and
local environmental laws and regulations regarding hazardous or toxic substances, this belief is based
on limited testing. Nearly all of our properties have been subjected to Phase I or similar environmental
audits. These environmental audits have not revealed, nor are we aware of, any environmental liability
that we believe is reasonably likely to have a material adverse effect on us. However, we cannot assure
you that:
·previous environmental studies with respect to the portfolio reveal all potential environmental
liabilities;
·any previous owner, occupant or tenant of a property did not create any material environmental
condition not known to us;
·the current environmental condition of the portfolio will not be affected by tenants and
occupants, by the condition of nearby properties, or by other unrelated third parties; or
·future uses or conditions (including, without limitation, changes in applicable environmental laws
and regulations or the interpretation thereof) will not result in environmental liabilities.
We face risks associated with climate change.
To the extent climate change causes changes in weather patterns, our properties in certain
markets could experience increases in storm intensity and rising sea levels. Over time, these conditions
could result in volatile or decreased demand for retail space at certain of our properties or, in extreme
cases, our inability to operate the properties at all. Climate change may also have indirect effects on our
business by increasing the cost of (or making unavailable) insurance on favorable terms, or at all,
increasing the cost of energy at our properties or requiring us to spend funds to repair and protect our
properties against such risks. Moreover, compliance with new laws or regulations related to climate
change, including compliance with “green” building codes, may require us to make improvements to our
existing properties or increase taxes and fees assessed on us or our properties.
Other Factors Affecting Our Business
Some of our potential losses may not be covered by insurance.
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage
for specific layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended
coverage and rental loss insurance on all of our properties in the United States. The initial portion of
coverage not provided by third-party carriers is either insured through our wholly-owned captive
insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us. A third party carrier has, in turn,
agreed to provide, if required, evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the terms and
conditions of the carrier’s policy. A similar policy either written through our captive insurance company or
other financial arrangements controlled by us also provides initial coverage for property insurance and
certain windstorm risks at the properties located in coastal windstorm locations.
There are some types of losses, including lease and other contract claims, which generally are not
insured or are subject to large deductibles. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits
occurs, we could lose all or a portion of the capital we have invested in a property, as well as the
anticipated future revenue it could generate but may remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other
financial obligation related to the property.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the
United States on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this
insurance coverage, any threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could materially and
adversely affect us.
19
 
Table of Contents
We face risks associated with security breaches through cyber‑attacks, cyber intrusions or
otherwise, as well as other significant disruptions of our information technology (IT)
networks and related systems.
Our IT networks and related systems are essential to the operation of our business and our ability
to perform day-to-day operations and, in some cases, may be critical to the operations of certain of our
tenants. We face risks associated with security breaches, whether through cyber-attacks or cyber
intrusions over the Internet, malware, computer viruses,  hardware or software corruption or failure or
poor product or vendor/developer selection (including a failure of security controls incorporated into or
applied to such hardware or software), service provider error or failure, intentional or unintentional
actions by employees (including the failure to follow our security protocols), and other significant
disruptions of our IT networks and related systems. Although we make efforts to maintain the security
and integrity of these types of IT networks and related systems, and we have implemented various
measures to manage the risk of a security breach or disruption, there can be no assurance that our
security efforts and measures will be effective or that attempted security breaches or disruptions would
not be successful or damaging. Even the most well protected information, networks, systems and
facilities remain potentially vulnerable because the techniques used in such attempted security
breaches evolve and generally are not recognized until launched against a target, and in some cases
are designed not to be detected and, in fact, may not be detected. Accordingly, we may be unable to
anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate security barriers or other preventative measures,
and thus it is impossible for us to entirely mitigate this risk.
A breach or significant and extended disruption in the functioning of our systems, including our
primary website, could damage our reputation and cause us to lose customers, tenants and revenues,
generate third party claims, result in the unintended and/or unauthorized public disclosure or the
misappropriation of proprietary, personal identifying and confidential information, and require us to incur
significant expenses to address and remediate or otherwise resolve these kinds of issues, and we may
not be able to recover these expenses in whole or in any part from our service providers or responsible
parties, or their or our insurers.
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to attract and retain talented employees, and
the loss of any one of our key personnel could adversely impact our business.
The success of our business depends, in part, on the leadership and performance of our
executive management team and key employees, and our ability to attract, retain and motivate talented
employees could significantly impact our future performance. Competition for these individuals is
intense, and we cannot assure you that we will retain our executive management team and other key
employees or that we will be able to attract and retain other highly qualified individuals for these
positions in the future. Losing any one or more of these persons could have a material adverse effect on
us.
Provisions in Simon’s charter and by‑laws and in the Operating Partnership’s partnership
agreement could prevent a change of control.
Simon’s charter contains a general restriction on the accumulation of shares in excess of 8% of its
capital stock. The charter permits the members of the Simon family and related persons to own up to
18% of Simon’s capital stock. Ownership is determined by the lower of the number of outstanding
shares, voting power or value controlled. Simon’s Board of Directors may, by majority vote, permit
exceptions to those levels in circumstances where Simon’s Board of Directors determines that Simon’s
ability to qualify as a REIT will not be jeopardized. These restrictions on ownership may have the effect
of delaying, deferring or preventing a transaction or a change in control that might otherwise be in the
best interest of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s unitholders or preferred unitholders.
Other provisions of Simon’s charter and by-laws could have the effect of delaying or preventing a
change of control even if some of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s unitholders or
preferred unitholders deem such a change to be in their best interests. These include provisions
preventing holders of Simon’s common stock from acting by written consent and requiring that up to four
directors in the aggregate may be elected by holders of Class B common stock. In addition, certain
provisions of the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement could have the effect of delaying or
preventing a change of control. These include a provision requiring the consent of a majority in interest
of units in order for Simon, as general partner of the Operating Partnership, to, among other matters,
engage in a merger transaction or sell all or substantially all of its assets.
The United Kingdom’s pending departure from the European Union could have a material
adverse effect on us.
Following a national referendum in June 2016, the United Kingdom formally notified the European
Council on March 29, 2017 of its intention to withdraw from the European Union (“EU”) (commonly
referred to as “Brexit”).  The timing of the proposed exit is currently scheduled for March 29, 2019, with
a transition period running through December 2020.  A
20
 
Table of Contents
withdrawal plan was presented to the UK parliament in January 2019 and rejected, creating further
uncertainty in negotiations and the process of withdrawal.  The terms governing the future relationship
between the United Kingdom and the EU, as well as the legal and economic consequences of those
terms, remain unclear. This continues to create political and economic uncertainty, which has affected,
and may continue to affect, market and macro-economic conditions in both the United Kingdom and EU
economies. In particular, there may be ongoing and increased volatility in financial and foreign exchange
markets in the United Kingdom and EU, including a fall in gross domestic product and volatility in the
value of Pounds Sterling. Further, financial and other markets may suffer losses as a result of any other
countries determining to withdraw from the EU or from any future significant changes to the EU’s
structure and/or regulations.
We currently hold, and may acquire additional, equity interests in properties located in the United
Kingdom and Europe, as well as other investments that are denominated in Pounds Sterling and Euro.
In addition, our Operating Partnership and its subsidiaries have issued, and may issue in the future,
senior unsecured notes denominated in Euro. Any of the effects of Brexit described above, and others
we cannot anticipate, could have a material adverse effect on us, including the value of our properties
and investments and our potential growth in Europe, as well as on our tenants’ businesses, and could
amplify the currency risks faced by us.
Item 1B.  Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
 
21
 
Table of Contents
Item 2.  Properties
United States Properties
Our U.S. properties primarily consist of malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and
other retail properties. These properties contain an aggregate of approximately 181.1 million square feet
of gross leasable area, or GLA.
Malls typically contain at least one department store anchor or a combination of anchors and big
box retailers with a wide variety of smaller stores connecting the anchors. Additional stores are usually
located along the perimeter of the parking area. Our 107 malls are generally enclosed centers and
range in size from approximately 260,000 to 2.7 million square feet of GLA.
Premium Outlets generally contain a wide variety of designer and manufacturer stores located in
open‑air centers. Our 69 Premium Outlets range in size from approximately 150,000 to 900,000 square
feet of GLA. The Premium Outlets are generally located within a close proximity to major metropolitan
areas and/or tourist destinations.
The 14 properties in The Mills generally range in size from 1.2 million to 2.3 million square feet of
GLA and are located in major metropolitan areas. They have a combination of traditional mall, outlet
center, and big box retailers and entertainment uses.
We also have interests in four lifestyle centers and 12 other retail properties. The lifestyle centers
range in size from 170,000 to 930,000 square feet of GLA. The other retail properties range in size from
approximately 160,000 to 850,000 square feet of GLA and are considered non‑core to our business
model.
As of December 31, 2018, approximately 95.9% of the owned GLA in malls and Premium Outlets
was leased and approximately 97.6% of the owned GLA for The Mills was leased.
We wholly own 135 of our properties, effectively control 12 properties in which we have a joint
venture interest, and hold the remaining 59 properties through unconsolidated joint venture interests.
We are the managing or co‑managing general partner or member of 202 properties in the United States.
Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy‑sell provisions, put
and call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real estate
partnership agreements and the industry. We and our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these
provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions) which may result in either the sale of
our interest or the use of available cash or borrowings, or the use of Operating Partnership units, to
acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
   
 
 
22
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
The following property table summarizes certain data for our malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and
other retail properties located in the United States, including Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2018.
             
       Ownership           
       Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
 Malls                 
1.Apple Blossom Mall  VA Winchester  Fee  49.1 % (4) Acquired
1999 93.7 % 472,802  Belk, JCPenney , Sears, AMC Cinemas
2.Auburn Mall  MA  Auburn  Fee  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 98.4 % 583,739  Macy's, Sears, Reliant Medical Group
3.Aventura Mall (1)  FL  Miami Beach
(Miami) Fee  33.3 % (4) Built 1983  97.3 % 2,079,715  Bloomingdale's, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Nordstrom,
Equinox Fitness Clubs, AMC Theatres
4.Avenues, The  FL  Jacksonville  Fee  25.0 % (4)
(2)Built 1990  96.9 % 1,111,812  Belk, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, Forever 21
5.Barton Creek Square  TX  Austin  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1981  95.3 % 1,430,122  Nordstrom, Macy' s, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC
Theatre
6.Battlefield Mall  MO  Springfield  Fee and Ground Lease
(2056) 100.0 %  Built 1970  92.1 % 1,202,116  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears
7.Bay Park Square  WI  Green Bay  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1980  87.6 % 724,373  Kohl's, ShopKo, Marcus Cinema 16
8.Brea Mall  CA  Brea (Los
Angeles) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.0 % 1,319,599  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , (6)
9.Briarwood Mall  MI  Ann Arbor  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.6 % 978,672  Macy's, JCPenne y, Von Maur , Hilton Garden Inn
(15), Towne Place Suites by Marriott (15)
10.Brickell City Centre  FL  Miami  Fee  25.0 % (4) Built 2016  81.7 % 476,799  Saks Fifth Avenue, Cinemex, EAST Miami Hotel
(15), La Centrale
11.Broadway Square  TX  Tyler  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1994 98.2 % 626,926  Dillard's, JCPenney , (6)
12.Burlington Mall  MA  Burlington
(Boston) Fee and Ground Lease
(2026) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.0 % 1,264,825  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Nordstrom, Crate & Barrel,
Primark, Arhaus Furniture
13.Cape Cod Mall  MA  Hyannis  Fee and Ground Leases
(2029-2073) (7) 56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 95.0 % 723,605  Macy's (8), Best Buy, Marshalls, Barnes & Noble,
Regal Cinema, Target (6)
14.Castleton Square  IN Indianapolis  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1972  96.0 % 1,381,533  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
15.Cielo V ista Mall  TX  El Paso  Fee and Ground Lease
(2027) (7) 100.0 %  Built 1974  97.8 % 1,245,359  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Cinemark
Theatres
16.Coconut Point  FL  Estero  Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2006  90.6 % 1,205,436  Dillard's, Barnes & Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond, Best
Buy, DSW , Office Max, PetSmart, Ross, T.J. Maxx,
Hollywood Theatre s, Super Target, Michael's, Total
Wine & More, Tuesday Morning, Hyatt Place
Coconut Point (15), TownePlace Suites by Marriott
(15)
17.College Mall  IN Bloomington  Fee and Ground Lease
(2048) (7) 100.0 %  Built 1965  88.7 % 610,256  Macy's, Target, Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed Bath &
Beyond, Ulta, Fresh Thyme
18.Columbia Center  WA Kennewick  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1987 97.4 % 762,585  Macy's (8), JCPen ney, Barnes & Noble, DSW , Home
Goods, Dick's Sporting Goods (6)
19.Copley Place  MA  Boston  Fee  94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2002 93.6 % 1,259,063  Neiman Marcus, Barneys New York, Boston Marriott
Copley Place (15), The W estin Copley Place (15)
20.Coral Square  FL  Coral Springs
(Miami) Fee  97.2 %  Built 1984  99.4 % 943,873  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Kohl's
21.Cordova Mall  FL  Pensacola  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 98.1 % 929,685  Dillard's, Belk, Best Buy, Bed Bath & Beyond, Cost
Plus W orld Market, Ross, Dick's Sporting Goods
22.Crystal Mall  CT  Waterford  Fee  78.2 % (4) Acquired
1998 85.5 % 782,995  Macy's, JCPenney , Bed Bath & Beyond, Christmas
Tree Shops
23.Dadeland Mall  FL  Miami  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
1997 99.2 % 1,497,002  Saks Fifth Avenue, Nordstrom , Macy's (8),
JCPenney , AC Hotel by Marriott (6)
24.Del Amo Fashion Center  CA  Torrance (Los
Angeles) Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 94.4 % 2,517,765  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Marshalls,
Barnes & Noble, JoAnn Fabrics, AMC Theatres,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Dave & Buster's
25.Domain, The  TX  Austin  Fee  100.0 %  Built 2006  91.8 % 1,234,252  Neiman Marcus, Macy's, Dillard's, Dick's Sporting
Goods, iPic Theat ers, Arhaus Furniture, Punch Bowl
Social, W estin Austin at The Domain, (16)
26.Dover Mall  DE  Dover  Fee and Ground Lease
(2041)  (7) 68.1 % (4) Acquired
2007 85.3 % 927,414  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, AMC Cinemas, Dick's
Sporting Goods
27.Emerald Square  MA  North
Attleboro
(Providence,
RI) Fee  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 87.4 % 1,022,295  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears
28.Empire Mall  SD  Sioux Falls  Fee and Ground Lease
(2033) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1998 94.3 % 1,124,235  Macy's, JCPenney , Gordmans, Hy-V ee, Dick's
Sporting Goods
23
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
           
       Ownership           
       Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
29.Falls, The  FL  Miami  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.8 % 839,967  Bloomingdale's (13), Macy's, Rega l Cinema, The
Fresh Market
30.Fashion Centre at Pentagon
City, The VA Arlington
(Washington,
DC) Fee  42.5 % (4) Built 1989  99.6 % 1,037,360  Nordstrom, Macy's, The Ritz-Carlton (15)
31.Fashion Mall at Keystone, The IN Indianapolis  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1997 97.5 % 716,555  Saks Fifth Avenu e, Crate & Barrel, Nordstrom,
Keystone Art Cinema
32.Fashion V alley  CA  San Diego  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2001 98.3 % 1,727,070  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's,
JCPenney , AMC Theatres, Forever 21
33.Firewheel Town Center  TX  Garland
(Dallas) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2005  97.7 % 995,806  Dillard's, Macy's, Barnes & Noble, DSW , Cost Plus
World Market, AMC Theatres, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Fairfield Inn by Marriott (14), (16)
34.Florida Mall, The  FL  Orlando  Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 1986  99.4 % 1,717,740  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears , H&M, Forever
21, Zara, American Girl, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Crayola Experience, The Florida Hotel and
Conference Center (16)
35.Forum Shops at Caesars
Palace, The NV  Las V egas  Ground Lease (2050)  100.0 %  Built 1992  95.8 % 663,877  Caesars Palace Las V egas Hotel and Casino (15)
36.Galleria, The  TX  Houston  Fee  50.4 % (4) Acquired
2002 96.8 % 2,016,838  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom,
Macy's, The Westin Galleria (15), The Westin Oaks
(15), Life Time Tennis
37.Greenwood Park Mall  IN Greenwood
(Indianapolis) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1979 99.2 % 1,260,340  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Regal Cinema
38.Haywood Mall  SC  Greenville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.6 % 1,237,411  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, Belk
39.Ingram Park Mall  TX  San Antonio  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1979  96.7 % 1,118,942  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Bealls
40.King of Prussia  PA King of
Prussia
(Philadelphia) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2003 97.6 % 2,667,143  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Lord &
Taylor , Macy's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Primark
41.La Plaza Mall  TX  McAllen  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7) 100.0 %  Built 1976  98.2 % 1,273,019  Macy's (8), Dillard's, JCPenney
42.Lakeline Mall  TX  Cedar Park
(Austin) Fee  100.0 %  Built 1995  95.2 % 1,099,420  Dillard's (8), Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres
43.Lehigh V alley Mall  PA Whitehall  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003 98.3 % 1,166,990  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, Barnes & Noble
44.Lenox Square  GA  Atlanta  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 96.6 % 1,526,475  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Macy's, JW
Marriott (15)
45.Livingston Mall  NJ  Livingston
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 93.7 % 968,820  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Sears, Barnes & Noble
46.Mall at Rockingham Park, The  NH  Salem
(Boston) Fee  28.2 % (4) Acquired
1999 97.7 % 1,024,159  JCPenney , Macy's , Lord & Taylor , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Cinemark Theatre (6)
47.Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The  OH  Dublin
(Columbus) Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 95.4 % 1,123,248  Macy's, JCPenney , Scene 75 (6)
48.Mall of Georgia  GA  Buford
(Atlanta) Fee  100.0 %  Built 1999  98.4 % 1,845,186  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Belk, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Havertys Furniture, Regal
Cinema, V on Maur
49.Mall of New Hampshire, The  NH  Manchester  Fee and Ground Lease
(2019-2027) (7) 56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 96.7 % 798,881  Macy's, JCPenney , Best Buy
50.McCain Mall  AR  N. Little Rock  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1973  93.1 % 793,630  Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, Regal Cinema
51.Meadowood Mall  NV  Reno  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.9 % 901,357  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Crunch Fitness (6), Round 1 (6)
52.Menlo Park Mall  NJ  Edison (New
York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1997 96.2 % 1,332,132  Nordstrom, Macy' s, Barnes & Noble, AMC Dine-In
Theatre
53.Miami International Mall  FL  Miami  Fee  47.8 % (4) Built 1982  97.5 % 1,082,486  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
54.Midland Park Mall  TX  Midland  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1980  98.8 % 635,788  Dillard's (8) (10) (6), JCPenney , Bealls, Ross
55.Miller Hill Mall  MN  Duluth  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1973  97.4 % 831,511  JCPenney , Barnes & Noble, DSW , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Essentia Health (6)
56.Montgomery Mall  PA North W ales
(Philadelphia) Fee  79.4 %  Acquired
2003 86.8 % 1,100,773  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Wegmans
57.North East Mall  TX  Hurst (Dallas)  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1971  99.0 % 1,667,833  Nordstrom, Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Sears,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Rave Theatre
58.Northgate  WA Seattle  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1987 95.6 % 1,045,451  Nordstrom, Macy' s (13), JCPenney (13), Barnes &
Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond, DSW , Nordstrom Rack
59.Northshore Mall  MA  Peabody
(Boston) Fee  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 95.3 % 1,385,195  JCPenney , Nordstrom, Macy's (8), Barnes & Noble,
Shaw's Grocery , The Container Store, Tesla Sales
and Service (6), Life Time Athletic (6)
24
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
            
       Ownership           
       Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
60.Ocean County Mall  NJ  Toms River
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 91.5 % 791,125  Macy's, Boscov's, JCPenney , LA Fitness (6),
HomeSense (6)
61.Orland Square  IL Orland Park
(Chicago) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1997 98.0 % 1,230,171  Macy's, JCPenney , Dave & Buster's, AMC Theatre
(6), V on Maur (6)
62.Oxford V alley Mall  PA Langhorne
(Philadelphia) Fee  85.5 %  Acquired
2003 94.0 % 1,338,569  Macy's, JCPenney , United Artists Theatre
63.Penn Square Mall  OK  Oklahoma
City Ground Lease (2060)  94.5 %  Acquired
2002 99.1 % 1,083,937  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC Theatres,
Container Store
64.Pheasant Lane Mall  NH  Nashua  -   —%
(12)Acquired
2002 97.5 % 979,427  JCPenney , Sears, Target, Macy's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
65.Phipps Plaza  GA  Atlanta  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 99.4 % 832,175  Saks Fifth Avenue, Nordstrom, AMC Theatres,
Arhaus Furniture,  Legoland Discovery Center , AC
Hotel by Marriott, Life Time Fitness (6), Nobu Hotel
and Restaurant (6), (16)
66.Plaza Carolina  PR  Carolina (San
Juan) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 85.0 % 1,158,555  JCPenney , Sears, Tiendas Capri, Econo, Best Buy,
T.J. Maxx, DSW , Caribbean Cinemas
67.Prien Lake Mall  LA  Lake Charles  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7) 100.0 %  Built 1972  98.6 % 842,640  Dillard's, JCPenney , Cinemark Theatres, Kohl's,
Dick's Sporting Goods, T.J. Maxx/HomeGoods
68.Quaker Bridge Mall  NJ  Lawrenceville  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003 96.2 % 1,081,469  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney
69.Rockaway Townsquare  NJ  Rockaway
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 95.7 % 1,246,313  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney , Sears
70.Roosevelt Field  NY  Garden City
(New York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2090) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1998 96.2 % 2,372,053  Bloomingdale's (8), Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney ,
Dick's Sporting Goods, AMC Entert ainment, XSport
Fitness, Neiman Marcus, Residence  Inn by Marriott
(6)
71.Ross Park Mall  PA Pittsburgh  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1986  98.7 % 1,236,523  JCPenney , Nordst rom, L.L. Bean, Macy's (8), Crate
& Barrel
72.Santa Rosa Plaza  CA  Santa Rosa  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.3 % 692,087  Macy's, Forever 21
73.Shops at Chestnut Hill, The  MA  Chestnut Hill
(Boston) Fee  94.4 %  Acquired
2002 94.1 % 470,067  Bloomingdale's (8)
74.Shops at Clearfork, The  TX  Fort W orth  Fee  45.0 % (4) Built 2017  86.0 % 548,426  Neiman Marcus, Arhaus Furniture , AMC Theatre,
Pinstripes
75.Shops at Crystals, The  NV  Las V egas  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2016 97.3 % 260,165  Aria Resort and Casino (15)
76.Shops at Nanuet, The  NY  Nanuet  Fee  100.0 %  Redeveloped
2013 94.8 % 757,928  Macy's (13), Fairway Market, Regal Cinema, 24
Hour Fitness, At Home (6)
77.Shops at Mission V iejo, The  CA  Mission V iejo
(Los Angeles) Fee  51.0 % (4) Built 1979  96.7 % 1,254,716  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), Forever 21
78.Shops at Riverside, The  NJ  Hackensack
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 95.9 % 654,488  Bloomingdale's, Barnes & Noble, Arhaus Furniture,
AMC Theatre
79.Smith Haven Mall  NY  Lake Grove
(New York) Fee  25.0 % (4)
(2)Acquired
1995 94.8 % 1,302,412  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, L.L. Bean
80.Solomon Pond Mall  MA  Marlborough
(Boston) Fee  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 96.3 % 886,596  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Regal Cinema
81.South Hills V illage  PA Pittsburgh  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1997 99.4 % 1,128,832  Macy's (8), Barne s & Noble, AMC Cinemas, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Target, DSW , Ulta
82.South Shore Plaza  MA  Braintree
(Boston) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.4 % 1,587,963  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Sears, Nordstrom, Target,
Primark
83.Southdale Center  MN  Edina
(Minneapolis) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 89.8 % 1,053,828  Macy's, AMC Thea tres, Dave & Buster's, Restoration
Hardware (6), Life Time Athletic (6), Life Time
Work/Sport (6), Homewood Suites by Hilton, (16)
84.SouthPark  NC  Charlotte  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (9) 100.0 %  Acquired
2002 100.0 % 1,678,376  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Macy's , Dillard's, Belk,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Crate & Barrel, The
Container Store, Reid's Fine Foods & Wine Bar (15),
(16)
85.Southridge Mall  WI  Greendale
(Milwaukee) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 94.2 % 1,220,791  JCPenney , Macy's, Marcus Cinema , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Round 1
86.Springfield Mall (1)  PA Springfield
(Philadelphia) Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2005 95.0 % 609,910  Macy's, Target
87.Square One Mall  MA  Saugus
(Boston) Fee  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999 97.9 % 930,279  Macy's, Sears, Best Buy, T.J. Maxx N More, Dick's
Sporting Goods
88.St. Charles Towne Center  MD  Waldorf
(Washington,
DC) Fee  100.0 %  Built 1990  93.6 % 979,937  Macy's (8), JCPen ney, Sears, Kohl's, Dick Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
25
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
            
       Ownership           
       Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
89.St. Johns Town Center  FL  Jacksonville  Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2005  98.9 % 1,392,198  Nordstrom, Dillard's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Barnes & Noble, Homewood
Suites by Hilton (15),
                 Target, Ashley Furniture Home Store, Ross,
Staples, DSW , JoAnn Fabrics, PetsMart
90.Stanford Shopping Center  CA  Palo Alto (San
Jose) Ground Lease (2054)  94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2003 99.3 % 1,341,792  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's (8), Crate and Barrel, The Container Store
91.Stoneridge Shopping Center  CA  Pleasanton
(San
Francisco) Fee  49.9 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.1 % 1,300,380  Macy's (8), Nordstrom, JCPenney , Arhaus
Furniture (6)
92.Summit Mall  OH  Akron  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1965  92.9 % 776,922  Dillard's (8), Macy's
93.Tacoma Mall  WA Tacoma
(Seattle) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1987 96.8 % 1,319,607  Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods
94.Tippecanoe Mall  IN Lafayette  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1973  94.7 % 831,563  Macy's, JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick's Sporting Goods
95.Town Center at Boca Raton  FL  Boca Raton
(Miami) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.1 % 1,778,818  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus,
Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's, Crate &
Barrel, The Container Store, Joseph's Classic
Market (6)
96.Town Center at Cobb  GA  Kennesaw
(Atlanta) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
1998 97.8 % 1,281,739  Belk, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears
97.Towne East Square  KS  Wichita  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1975  97.6 % 1,145,360  Dillard's, V on Maur , JCPenney
98.Treasure Coast Square  FL  Jensen Beach  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1987  91.6 % 851,079  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
99.Tyrone Square  FL  St. Petersburg
(Tampa) Fee  100.0 %  Built 1972  96.4 % 960,215  Macy's, Dillard's,  JCPenney , DSW , Cobb 10
Luxury Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods, Lucky's
Market, PetSmart
100. University Park Mall  IN Mishawaka  Fee  100.0 %  Built 1979  95.9 % 918,932  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Barnes & Noble
101. Walt Whitman Shops  NY  Huntington
Station (New
York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2032) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
1998 99.3 % 1,084,827  Saks Fifth Avenue , Bloomingdale’ s, Lord & Taylor ,
Macy’ s
102. West Town Mall  TN  Knoxville  Ground Lease (2042)  50.0 % (4) Acquired
1991 99.0 % 1,338,790  Belk (8), Dillard’ s, JCPenney , Cinebarre Theatre
103. Westchester , The  NY  White Plains
(New York) Fee  40.0 % (4) Acquired
1997 93.2 % 809,098  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Crate and Barrel
104. White Oaks Mall  IL Springfield  Fee  80.7 %  Built 1977  91.9 % 925,504  Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods, LA Fitness,
Michael's (6)
105. Wolfchase Galleria  TN  Memphis  Fee  94.5 %  Acquired
2002 97.5 % 1,151,615  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Malco Theatres,
Courtyard by Marriott (14)
106. Woodfield Mall  IL Schaumburg
(Chicago) Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012 98.9 % 2,150,333  Nordstrom, Macy 's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney ,
Sears, Arhaus Furniture, Level 257
107. Woodland Hills Mall  OK  Tulsa  Fee  94.5 %  Acquired
2002 97.6 % 1,091,888  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Holida y Inn Express
(15), Courtyard by Marriott (15)
 Total Mall GLA              120,700,674 (17) 
 
26
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
           
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
 Premium Outlets                 
1.Albertville Premium Outlets  MN  Albertville
(Minneapolis) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 84.8 % 429,551  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , The North Face, Under
Armour
2.Allen Premium Outlets  TX  Allen (Dallas)  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 96.5 % 544,769  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Giorgio Armani, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Staybridge Suites  (14), The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch
3.Aurora Farms Premium
Outlets OH  Aurora
(Cleveland) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 96.5 % 271,711  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
4.Birch Run Premium Outlets  MI  Birch Run
(Detroit) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 93.8 % 606,452  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Michae l Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn/Williams-Sonoma Outlet, Tommy
Hilfiger , The North Face, Under Armour
5.Camarillo Premium Outlets  CA  Camarillo (Los
Angeles) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.5 % 675,510  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Giorgio Armani, Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
6.Carlsbad Premium Outlets  CA  Carlsbad (San
Diego) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 96.1 % 289,367  Adidas, Barneys New York Warehouse, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Crate & Barrel, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tory
Burch, Under Armour
7.Carolina Premium Outlets  NC  Smithfield
(Raleigh) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 94.9 % 438,822  Adidas, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
8.Charlotte Premium Outlets  NC  Charlotte  Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2014  98.5 % 398,686  Adidas, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
9.Chicago Premium Outlets  IL Aurora
(Chicago) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2004  94.6 % 687,362  Adidas, Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outle t, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Restoration Hardware, Saks  Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Under Armour , Versace
10.Cincinnati Premium Outlets  OH  Monroe
(Cincinnati) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2009  97.8 % 398,752  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
11.Clarksburg Premium Outlets  MD  Clarksburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee  66.0 % (4) Built 2016  89.5 % 390,126  Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange, Adidas, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Eredi Pisano, Ermenegildo Zegna,
Express, Johnny Rockets, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Thomas Pink,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
12.Clinton Crossing Premium
Outlets CT  Clinton  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 97.3 % 276,101  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
13.Denver Premium Outlets  CO  Thornton
(Denver) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2018  82.5 % 328,090  A/X Armani Exchange, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
14.Desert Hills Premium Outlets  CA  Cabazon
(Palm
Springs) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.0 % 655,325  Agent Provocateur , Alexander McQueen, Armani
Outlet, Balenciaga , Bottega Veneta, Brioni, Brunello
Cucinelli, Burberry , Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna,
Fendi, Gucci, Jimmy Choo, Loro Piana, Marc Jacobs,
Moncler , Mulberry , Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Rober to Cavalli, Saint
Laurent Paris, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Stuart W eitzman, Tory Burch, V alentino
15.Edinburgh Premium Outlets  IN Edinburgh
(Indianapolis) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 97.7 % 377,979  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
27
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
           
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
16.Ellenton Premium Outlets  FL  Ellenton
(Tampa) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 96.0 % 476,884  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Under Armour
17.Folsom Premium Outlets  CA  Folsom
(Sacramento) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 95.0 % 297,548  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York,  Michael Kors, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
18.Gilroy Premium Outlets  CA  Gilroy (San
Jose) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 88.3 % 578,222  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Colum bia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger
19.Gloucester Premium Outlets  NJ  Blackwood
(Philadelphia) Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2015  86.9 % 369,686  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess,
Levi's, J. Crew , Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy  Hilfiger , Under
Armour
20.Grand Prairie Premium Outlets  TX  Grand Prairie
(Dallas) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2012  92.9 % 416,322  Banana Republic,  Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Kate
Spade New York, J.Crew , Michael Kors, Nike, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
21.Grove City Premium Outlets  PA Grove City
(Pittsburgh) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 93.9 % 530,771  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren , The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
22.Gulfport Premium Outlets  MS  Gulfport  Ground Lease (2059)  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 94.2 % 300,033  Banana Republic, Chico's, Coach, Gap Outlet, H&M,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
23.Hagerstown Premium Outlets  MD  Hagerstown
(Baltimore/ Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 87.3 % 485,161  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew, Kate Spade
New York, Loft Outlet, New Balance, Nike, The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
24.Houston Premium Outlets  TX  Cypress
(Houston) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2008  99.6 % 542,077  Ann Taylor , A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Calvin  Klein, Coach,
Furla, Gap Outle t, Giorgio Armani, Holiday Inn
Express (15), Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Of f 5th, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch
25.Jackson Premium Outlets  NJ  Jackson (New
York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 97.0 % 285,696  Adidas, American  Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor ,
Banana Republic , Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
26.Jersey Shore Premium Outlets  NJ  Tinton Falls
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2008  96.6 % 434,428  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Burberry ,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Cre w, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
27.Johnson Creek Premium
Outlets WI  Johnson
Creek Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 92.1 % 277,672  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Gap Outlet,
Loft Outlet, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren , Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
28.Kittery Premium Outlets  ME  Kittery  Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
2004 86.5 % 259,221  Ann Taylor, Banan a Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outle t, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Swarovski, Tommy Hilfiger
29.Las Americas Premium Outlets  CA  San Diego  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 97.2 % 554,107  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin  Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet,  Giorgio Armani,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
28
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
            
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
30.Las V egas North Premium
Outlets NV  Las V egas  Fee  100.0 %  Built 2003  99.4 % 676,324  All Saints, Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Banana Republic , Burberry , Canali, CH Carolina
Herrera, Cheeseca ke Factory , Coach, David Yurman,
Dolce & Gabbana, Etro, Jimmy Choo, John Varvatos,
Lululemon, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs,
Neiman Marcus Last Call, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Roberto Cavalli, Saks  Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Shake Shack, Tory Burch
31.Las V egas South Premium
Outlets NV  Las V egas  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.7 % 535,661  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Colum bia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
32.Lee Premium Outlets  MA  Lee  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 93.8 % 224,846  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
33.Leesburg Corner Premium
Outlets VA Leesburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.9 % 478,225  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani
Exchange, Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Coach, Kate
Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Restoration Hardware, Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard Vines, Williams-
Sonoma
34.Lighthouse Place Premium
Outlets IN Michigan City
(Chicago, IL) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 86.3 % 454,782  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The
North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
35.Merrimack Premium Outlets  NH  Merrimack  Fee  100.0 %  Built 2012  98.9 % 408,902  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Barbour ,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour , Vineyard V ines
36.Napa Premium Outlets  CA  Napa  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 94.0 % 179,354  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger
37.Norfolk Premium Outlets  VA Norfolk  Fee  65.0 % (4) Built 2017  87.8 % 332,086  A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Outlet,
H&M, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tory Burch, Under Armour
38.North Bend Premium Outlets  WA North Bend
(Seattle) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 93.6 % 223,560  Banana Republic, Coach, Gap Outlet, Levi's, Michael
Kors, Nike, Skechers, Under Armour
39.North Georgia Premium
Outlets GA  Dawsonville
(Atlanta) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 91.6 % 540,721  Ann Taylor, Arman i Outlet, Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Crew, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Micha el Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Williams-Sonoma
40.Orlando International Premium
Outlets FL  Orlando  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 97.8 % 773,823  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Coach, Invicta,
Gant, Havaianas, H&M,  J.Crew , Karl Lagerfeld, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Panera Bread,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The
North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour
41.Orlando V ineland Premium
Outlets FL  Orlando  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 99.6 % 656,895  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outlet, Bally , Bottega
Veneta, Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Carolina Herrera, Coach, Ermenegild o Zegna, Jimmy
Choo, John Varvatos, Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Lululemo n, Michael Kors, Nike, Prada, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Roberto Cavalli, Saks  Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, TAG Heuer , The North
Face, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour
42.Petaluma V illage Premium
Outlets CA  Petaluma
(San
Francisco) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 97.6 % 201,704  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger
29
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
           
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
43.Philadelphia Premium Outlets  PA Limerick
(Philadelphia) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2007  92.8 % 549,153  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
J.Crew , Loft Outle t, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Restoration Hardware, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
44.Phoenix Premium Outlets  AZ  Chandler
(Phoenix) Ground Lease (2077)  100.0 %  Built 2013  94.2 % 356,504  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Factory
Store, Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
45.Pismo Beach Premium Outlets  CA  Pismo Beach  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 98.0 % 147,430  Calvin Klein, Coach, Guess, Levi's, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger , Van Heusen
46.Pleasant Prairie Premium
Outlets WI  Pleasant
Prairie
(Chicago,
IL/Milwaukee) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 97.3 % 402,613  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outle t, Kate Spade New York, J.Crew ,
Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, St. John,  The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
47.Puerto Rico Premium Outlets  PR  Barceloneta  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 86.2 % 350,047  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Calvin Klein, Disney Store
Outlet, Gap Outlet, Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy
Hilfiger
48.Queenstown Premium Outlets  MD  Queenstown
(Baltimore) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 96.6 % 289,594  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, St. John, Tommy
Bahama, Under Armour
49.Rio Grande V alley Premium
Outlets TX  Mercedes
(McAllen) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2006  90.1 % 603,929  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani
Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Gap Outlet, H&M, Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft
Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
50.Round Rock Premium Outlets  TX  Round Rock
(Austin) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2006  97.2 % 488,698  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
51.San Francisco Premium
Outlets CA  Livermore
(San
Francisco) Fee and Ground Lease
(2021) (9) 100.0 %  Built 2012  97.5 % 696,886  All Saints, A/X Armani Exchange, Bloomingdale's The
Outlet Store, Bottega Veneta, Brunello Cucinelli,
Burberry , CH Carolina Herrera, Coach, Ermenegildo
Zegna, Etro, Furla , Gucci, H&M, Jimmy Choo, John
Varvatos, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste,
Longchamp, MaxMara, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada, Roger Vivier, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferrag amo, The North
Face, Tod's, Tory Burch, Under Armour , Versace,
Zadig et V oltaire
52.San Marcos Premium Outlets  TX  San Marcos
(Austin/San
Antonio) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 96.6 % 730,847  Armani Outlet, Banana Republic , Burberry , CH
Carolina Herrera,  Diane Von Furstenberg, Etro,
Gucci, J. Crew , Jimmy Choo, Johnn y Rockets, Kate
Spade New York, Lacoste, Lululemon, Neiman
Marcus Last Call, Michael Kors, Pandora, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Pottery Barn, Prada, Restoration Hardware,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, The
North Face, Tommy Bahama, Tory Burch, Vineyard
Vines
53.Seattle Premium Outlets  WA Tulalip
(Seattle) Ground Lease (2079)  100.0 %  Built 2005  98.7 % 554,831  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Banana
Republic, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, St. John, The
North Face, Tommy Bahama, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
54.Silver Sands Premium Outlets  FL  Destin  Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012 91.8 % 450,954  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Coach, Columbia Sportsw ear, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
55.St. Augustine Premium Outlets  FL  St. Augustine
(Jacksonville) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 96.9 % 327,691  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet,  J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
30
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
          
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
56.St. Louis Premium Outlets  MO  St. Louis
(Chesterfield) Fee  60.0 % (4) Built 2013  95.6 % 351,497  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap
Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's,
Michael Kors, Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Ugg, Under Armour
57.Tampa Premium Outlets  FL  Lutz (T ampa)  Fee  100.0 %  Built 2015  100.0 % 459,485  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, BJ's
Restaurant and Brewhouse, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.
Crew , Lucky Brand, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tumi, Under Armour
58.Tanger Outlets - Columbus (1)  OH  Sunbury
(Columbus) Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2016  94.1 % 355,255  Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Coach, Kate
Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Under
Armour
59.Tanger Outlets -
Galveston/Houston (1) TX  Texas City  Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2012  95.2 % 352,705  Banana Republic , Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap
Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Tommy Hilfiger
60.The Crossings Premium
Outlets PA Tannersville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2019) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.9 % 411,747  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Johnny
Rockets, Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
61.Tucson Premium Outlets  AZ  Marana
(Tucson) Fee  100.0 %  Built 2015  91.3 % 363,437  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Forever 21, Gap Outlet, Godiva,
Guess, J. Crew , Johnny Rockets, Levi’s, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks 5th Avenue Off
5th, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
62.Twin Cities Premium Outlets  MN  Eagan  Fee  35.0 % (4) Built 2014  97.2 % 408,930  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coac h, Gap Outlet, J.
Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Robert Graham, Saks Fifth
Avenue Of f 5th, Talbots,  Under Armour
63.Vacaville Premium Outlets  CA  Vacaville  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 95.4 % 440,263  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
64.Waikele Premium Outlets  HI Waipahu
(Honolulu) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 98.7 % 219,289  Adidas, All Saints , Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Barney's New York, Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Swarovski, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch
65.Waterloo Premium Outlets  NY  Waterloo  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 92.4 % 421,200  American Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor , Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin  Klein, Chico’ s,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M,
J.Crew , Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy  Hilfiger , Under
Armour
66.Williamsburg Premium Outlets  VA Williamsburg  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2010 96.2 % 522,450  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitte rs, Ann Taylor ,
Banana Republic,  Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Coach, J.Crew, Kate Spade New York, Levi's,
Loft Outlet, Mich ael Kors, New Balance, Nike,
Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Timberland, Tommy Bahama, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
67.Woodburn Premium Outlets  OR  Woodburn
(Portland) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2013 99.2 % 389,821  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, J. Crew , Levi's, Michael Kors,
Nike, The North Face, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
68.Woodbury Common Premium
Outlets NY  Central V alley
(New York) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 96.7 % 899,088  Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Balenciaga, Bottega Veneta,
Breitling, Brioni, Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , Canali,
Celine, Chloe, Coach, Dior, Dolce & Gabbana,
Dunhill, Fendi, Givenchy , Golden Goose, Gucci,
Jimmy Choo, Lacoste, Le Pain Quotidien, Loewe,
Longchamp, Loro Piana, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors,
Moncler , Mulberry , Nike, Oscar de la Renta, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada, Saint Laurent, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Shake Shack,
Stuart Weitzman, Theory , Tod's, Tom Ford, Tory
Burch, V alentino, V ersace, Yo! Sushi, Zegna
31
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
             
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  Or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
69.Wrentham V illage Premium
Outlets MA  Wrentham
(Boston) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2004 97.1 % 660,186  Adidas, All Saints, Ann Taylor , Arman i Outlet, Banana
Republic, Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks
Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein,  Coach, David
Yurman, J.Crew , Karl Lagerfeld, Kate Spade New
York, Lacoste, Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma, Restoration Hardware, Robert
Graham, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Theory , Tommy Hilfig er, Tory Burch,
Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
 Total U.S. Premium Outlets
GLA             30,467,844   
 
32
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
              
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
 The Mills                 
1.Arizona Mills  AZ  Tempe
(Phoenix) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 94.5 % 1,236,915  Marshalls, Burling ton Coat Factory , Ross, Harkins
Cinemas & IMAX, Sea Life Center , Conn's,
Legoland,  Forever 21, Rainforest Café
2.Arundel Mills  MD  Hanover
(Baltimore) Fee  59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007 99.9 % 1,930,820  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath & Beyond,
Best Buy, Burlington Coat Factory , Dave & Buster's,
Medieval Times, Modell's, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Off Broadway Shoe Warehous e, T.J. Maxx,
Cinemark Egyptian 24 Theatres, Maryland Live!
Casino, Forever 21, Live! Hotel (14)
3.Colorado Mills  CO  Lakewood
(Denver) Fee  37.5 % (4) Acquired
2007 89.0 % 1,414,037  Forever 21, Jumpstreet, Off Broadway Shoe
Warehouse, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Super Target,
United Artists Theatre, Burlington  Coat Factory ,
H&M, Dick's Sporting Goods
4.Concord Mills  NC  Concord
(Charlotte) Fee  59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007 99.5 % 1,362,404  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington Coat
Factory , Dave & Buster's, Nike Factory Store, T.J.
Maxx, Off Broadway Shoes, Bed Bath & Beyond,
AMC Theatres, Best Buy, Forever 21, Sea Life
Center , H&M
5.Grapevine Mills  TX  Grapevine
(Dallas) Fee  59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007 99.3 % 1,781,628  Burlington Coat Factory , Marsha lls, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, AMC Theatres, Sun & Ski Sports,
Neiman Marcus Last Call, Bass Pro Shops Outdoor
World, Legoland Discovery Center , Sea Life Center ,
Ross, H&M, Round 1 Entertainment, Fieldhouse
USA, Rainforest Café
6.Great Mall  CA  Milpitas (San
Jose) Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7) 100.0 %  Acquired
2007 99.5 % 1,365,957  Neiman Marcus Last Call, Group USA, Kohl's, Dave
& Buster's, Burlington Coat Factory , Marshalls, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nike Factory Store, Century
Theatres, Bed Bath & Beyond, Dick's Sporting
Goods
7.Gurnee Mills  IL Gurnee
(Chicago) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 83.5 % 1,936,699  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath &
Beyond/Buy Buy Baby , Burlington  Coat Factory ,
Kohl's, Marshalls Home Goods, Saks Fifth Avenue
Off 5th, Rink Side, Marcus Cinemas, Value City
Furniture, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse, Macy's,
Floor & Decor , Dick's Sporting Good s, Tilt/Rink Side
Sports & Family Entertainment Center, Rainforest
Café, The Room Place
8.Katy Mills  TX  Katy
(Houston) Fee  62.5 % (4)
(2)Acquired
2007 97.3 % 1,788,216  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington Coat
Factory , Marshalls, Neiman Marcus Last Call, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Sun & Ski Sports, AMC
Theatres, Tilt, Ross, H&M, RH Outlet, Rainforest
Café
9.Mills at Jersey Gardens, The  NJ  Elizabeth  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2015 99.8 % 1,303,423  Bed Bath & Beyond, Burlington  Coat Factory ,
Century 21 Department Store, Cohoes, Forever 21,
Last Call Neiman Marcus, Loews Theatres,
Marshalls, Nike Factory Store, Saks  5th Avenue Off
5th,
10.Ontario Mills  CA  Ontario
(Riverside) Fee  50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.8 % 1,421,108  Burlington Coat Factory , Nike Factory Store,
Marshalls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nordstrom
Rack, Dave & Buster's, Group USA, Sam Ash Music,
AMC Theatres, Forever 21, Uniqlo, Restoration
Hardware Outlet, Skechers Superstore, Rainforest
Café, Aki-Home
11.Opry Mills  TN  Nashville  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 99.8 % 1,168,641  Regal Cinema & IMAX, Dave & Buster's, Sun & Ski,
Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath & Beyond,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Madame Tussauds,
Rainforest Café, Aquarium Restaurant
12.Outlets at Orange, The  CA  Orange (Los
Angeles) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 100.0 % 866,972  Dave & Buster ’s, Vans Skatepar k, Lucky Strike
Lanes, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, AMC Theatres,
Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nordstrom Rack,
Bloomingdale's the Outlet Store
13.Potomac Mills  VA Woodbridge
(Washington,
DC) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 99.1 % 1,540,304  Marshalls, T.J. Maxx, JCPenney , Burlington Coat
Factory , Nordstrom  Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th
Outlet, Costco Warehouse, AMC Theatres,
Bloomingdale's Outlet, Buy Buy Baby/and That!
14.Sawgrass Mills  FL  Sunrise
(Miami) Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2007 99.2 % 2,273,898  Bed Bath & Beyo nd, BrandsMart USA, Burlington
Coat Factory , Marshalls, Neiman Marcus Last Call,
Nordstrom Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue  Off 5th, Super
Target, T.J. Maxx, Regal Cinema, Bloomingdale's
Outlet, Century 21 Department Store, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Primark (6), AC Hotel by Marriott (6)
 Total Mills Properties GLA              21,391,022   
 
33
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
              
       Ownership Interest    Year Built       
       (Expiration if  Legal  or       
 Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
 Lifestyle Centers                 
1.ABQ Uptown  NM  Albuquerque  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2011 98.7 % 230,061  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
2.Hamilton Town Center  IN Noblesville
(Indianapolis) Fee  50.0 % (4) Built 2008  93.4 % 672,905  JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,  Stein Mart,
Bed Bath & Beyo nd, DSW , Hamilton 16 IMAX,
Earth Fare
3.Pier Park  FL  Panama City
Beach Fee  65.6 % (4) Built 2008  96.7 % 932,721  Dillard's, JCPenney , Target, Grand Theatres,
Ron Jon Surf Shop, Margaritaville, Marshalls,
Dave & Buster's, Skywheel
4.University Park V illage  TX  Fort W orth  Fee  100.0 %  Acquired
2015 99.3 % 169,842  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
 Total Lifestyle Centers GLA              2,005,529   
                  
                  
 Other Properties                 
1 - 10. Other Properties              3,645,297   
11 - 12. TMLP          Acquired
2007   2,913,687   
 Total Other GLA              6,558,984 (17) 
 Total U.S. Properties GLA              181,124,053   
 
34
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
 
FOOTNOTES:
(1)This property is managed by a third party .
(2)Our direct and indirect interests in some of the properties held as joint venture interests are subject to preferences on distributions in favor of other partners or us.
(3)The date listed is the expiration date of the last renewal option available to the operating entity under the ground lease. In a majority of the ground leases, we have
a right to purchase the lessor ’s interest under an option, right of first refusal or other provision.  Unless otherwise indicated, each ground lease listed in this column
covers at least 50% of its respective property .
(4)Joint venture properties accounted for under the equity method.
(5)Malls - Executed leases for all company-owned GLA  in mall stores, excluding majors and anchors. Premium Outlets and The Mills - Executed leases for all
company-owned GLA  (or total center GLA).
(6)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction or has announced plans for development.
(7)Indicates ground lease covers less than 50% of the acreage of this property .
(8)Tenant has multiple locations at this center .
(9)Indicates ground lease covers outparcel only .
(10)Tenant has an existing store at this center but will move to a new location.
(11)We receive substantially all the economic benefit of the property due to a preference or advance.
(12)We own a mortgage note that encumbers Pheasant Lane Mall that entitles us to 100% of the economics of this property .
(13)Indicates anchor has announced its intent to close this location.
(14)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction by a third party .
(15)Owned by a third party .
(16)Includes multi-family tenant on-site.
(17)GLA includes of fice space.  Centers with more than 75,000 square feet of of fice space are listed below:
Auburn Mall - 85,619 sq. ft.  
Circle Centre - 130,635 sq. ft.  
Copley Place - 893,670 sq. ft.  
Domain, The - 156,240 sq. ft.  
Fashion Centre at Pentagon City, The - 169,089 sq.
ft. 
Oxford Valley Mall - 137,791 sq. ft.  
Shops at Clearfork, The - 142,684 sq. ft.  
 
 
 
35
 
Table of Contents
United States Lease Expirations
The following table summarizes lease expiration data for our U.S. malls and Premium Outlets,
including Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2018. The data presented does not consider the impact of
renewal options that may be contained in leases.
U.S. MALLS AND PREMIUM OUTLETS LEASE EXPIRATIONS (1)
     
               Avg. Base    Percentage of Gross 
  Number of   Minimum Rent Annual Rental 
Year  Leases Expiring Square Feet PSF at 12/31/18 Revenues (2)  
Inline Stores and Freestanding           
Month to Month Leases  530 1,407,824  $ 61.88  1.6%
2019  2,413  8,503,453  $ 51.65  7.7%
2020  2,368  8,085,250  $ 50.87  7.2%
2021  2,125  8,109,158  $ 49.99  7.2%
2022  2,043  8,120,171  $ 50.11  7.3%
2023  2,328  8,685,716  $ 56.79  8.7%
2024  1,673  6,678,649  $ 58.56  6.9%
2025  1,450  5,502,091  $ 65.09  6.4%
2026  1,283  4,573,797  $ 63.39  5.1%
2027  1,031  3,849,512  $ 62.90  4.3%
2028  866 3,653,830  $ 56.94  3.7%
2029 and Thereafter  447 2,797,024  $ 46.42  2.4%
Specialty Leasing Agreements w/ terms in
excess of 12 months  1,536  3,964,360  $ 19.41  1.4%
Anchors           
2019   9 1,004,555  $ 3.80  0.1%
2020  22 3,137,784  $ 4.39  0.3%
2021  12 1,422,205  $ 4.74  0.1%
2022  14 1,915,691  $ 6.37  0.2%
2023  18 2,468,058  $ 6.55  0.3%
2024  20 1,465,647  $ 9.63  0.3%
2025  15 1,404,556  $ 9.35  0.2%
2026   5 633,170  $ 4.97  0.1%
2027   6 920,224  $ 4.16  0.1%
2028   9 857,119  $ 7.43  0.1%
2029 and Thereafter  17 2,013,617  $ 6.17  0.2%
(1)Does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be contained in leases.
(2)Annual rental revenues represent domestic 2018 consolidated and joint venture combined base rental revenue. 
36
 
Table of Contents
International Properties
Our ownership interests in properties outside the United States are primarily owned through joint
venture arrangements.  With the exception of our Premium Outlets in Canada, all of our international
properties are managed by related parties. 
European Investments
At December 31, 2018, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 21.3%, of Klépierre,
which had a quoted market price of $30.86 per share. Klépierre is a publicly traded, Paris-based real
estate company, which owns, or has an interest in shopping centers located in 16 countries.  
As of December 31, 2018, we had a controlling interest in a European investee with interests in
nine Designer Outlet properties. Eight of the outlet properties are located in Europe and one outlet
property is located in Canada. Of the eight properties in Europe, two are in Italy, two are in the
Netherlands, and one each is in Austria, Germany, France and the United Kingdom. As of December 31,
2018, our legal percentage ownership interests in these entities ranged from 45% to 94%.
We own a 14.6% interest in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own and operate nine
luxury outlets throughout Europe. We also have a minority direct ownership in three of those outlets.
Other International Investments
We hold a 40% interest in nine operating joint venture properties in Japan, a 50% interest in four
operating joint venture properties in South Korea, a 50% interest in one operating joint venture property
in Mexico, a 50% interest in two operating joint venture properties in Malaysia, and a 50% interest in
three operating joint venture properties in Canada. The nine Japanese Premium Outlets operate in
various cities throughout Japan and comprise over 3.3 million square feet of GLA and were 99.7%
leased as of December 31, 2018.
The following property tables summarize certain data for our international properties as of
December 31, 2018 and do not include our equity investment in Klépierre or our investment in Value
Retail PLC and affiliated entities.
 
 
37
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
 
      
       City     Ownership     SPG Effective          Total Gross       
  COUNTR Y/Property Name  (Metropolitan area)  Interest  Ownership  Year Built  Leasable Area
(1)  Selected T enants  
  JAPAN              
 1. Ami Premium Outlets  Ami (T okyo)  Fee  40.0 %  2009  315,000
 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, McGregor ,
Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger  
2. Gotemba Premium Outlets  Gotemba City
(Tokyo) Fee  40.0 %  2000  481,500
 Adidas, Armani, Balenciaga, Bally , Beams, Bottega Veneta, Burberry ,
Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Gap Outlet, Gucci, Jill Stuart, Loro
Piana, Michael Kors, Moncler , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, United Arrows  
3. Kobe-Sanda Premium
Outlets Hyougo-ken
(Osaka) Ground
Lease
(2026) 40.0 %  2007  441,000
 Adidas, Armani, Bally, Beams, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Gap Outlet ,
Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows, V alentino  
4. Rinku Premium Outlets  Izumisano (Osaka)  Ground
Lease
(2031) 40.0 %  2000  416,500
 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Eddie
Bauer , Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Lanvin Collection,
Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore
Ferragamo, TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows  
5. Sano Premium Outlets  Sano (T okyo)  Fee  40.0 %  2003  390,800
 Adidas, Armani, Beams, Coach, Dunhill, Eddie Bauer , Etro, Furla, Gap
Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, TaylorMade  
6. Sendai-Izumi Premium
Outlets Izumi Park Town
(Sendai) Ground
Lease
(2027) 40.0 %  2008  164,200
 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tasaki, United Arrows  
7. Shisui Premium Outlets (2)  Shisui (Chiba),
Japan Ground
Lease
(2033) 40.0 %  Phase 2 -
2013 434,600
 Adidas, Beams, Citizen, Coach, Dunhill, Furla, Gap, Kate Spade New
York, Marmot, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Samsonite,
Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows  
          Phase 3 -
2018  
   
8. Toki Premium Outlets  Toki (Nagoya)  Ground
Lease
(2033) 40.0 %  2005  367,700
 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Nike,
Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger ,
United Arrows  
9. Tosu Premium Outlets  Fukuoka (Kyushu)  Fee  40.0 %  2004  290,400
 Adidas, Armani, Beams, Bose, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Furla, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows  
  Subtotal Japan          3,301,700    
 
38
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
            
       City     Ownership     SPG Effective          Total Gross       
  COUNTR Y/Property Name  (Metropolitan area)  Interest  Ownership  Year Built  Leasable Area
(1)  Selected T enants  
  MEXICO              
10. Punta Norte Premium
Outlets Mexico City  Fee  50.0 %  2004  333,000
 Adidas, Calvin Klein, CH Carolina Herrera, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana ,
Kate Spade New York, Nautica, Nike, Palacio Outlet, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Zegna  
  Subtotal Mexico          333,000    
  SOUTH KOREA              
11. Yeoju Premium Outlets  Yeoju (Seoul)  Fee  50.0 %  2007  551,600
 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Chloe, Coach, Fendi, Gucci, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, Valentino ,
Vivienne W estwood  
12. Paju Premium Outlets  Paju (Seoul)  Ground
Lease
(2040) 50.0 %  2011  442,900
 Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Jill Stuart, Lanvin Collection ,
Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tory Burch ,
Vivienne W estwood  
13. Busan Premium Outlets  Busan  Fee  50.0 %  2013  360,200
 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger  
14. Siehung Premium Outlets  Siehung  Fee  50.0 %  2017  444,400
 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo, The North Face  
  Subtotal South Korea          1,799,100    
  MALA YSIA              
15. Johor Premium Outlets  Johor (Singapore)  Fee  50.0 %  Phase 2 -
2011 309,400
 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, DKNY , Furla, Gucci, Guess,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Salvatore Ferragamo,
Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Zegna  
          Phase 3 -
2018  
  
 
16. Genting Highlands
Premium Outlets Kuala Lumpur  Fee  50.0 %  2017  277,500
 Adidas, Coach, Furla, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Padini, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma  
  Subtotal Malaysia          586,900    
  CANADA              
17. Toronto Premium Outlets
(2) Toronto (Ontario)  Fee  50.0 %  Phase 3 -
2013 500,400
 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Eddie Bauer , Gap, Gucc i,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch  
          Phase 4 -
2018  
  
 
18. Premium Outlets Montreal  Montreal (Quebec)  Fee  50.0 %  2014  366,500
 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tommy Hilfiger  
19. Premium Outlet Collection
Edmonton International
Airport Edmonton (Alberta)  Ground
Lease
(2072) 50.0 %  2018  424,000
  
 
  Subtotal Canada          1,290,900    
  TOTAL INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM OUTLETS        7,311,600    
 
39
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
           
       City     Ownership     SPG
Effective          Total
Gross       
  COUNTR Y/Property
Name  (Metropolitan
area)  Interest  Ownership  Year Built  Leasable
Area (1)  Selected T enants  
  INTERNA TIONAL  DESIGNER
OUTLETS            
  AUSTRIA                                   
1. Parndorf Designer
Outlet Vienna  Fee  90.0 %  Phase 3 — 2005  118,000  Adidas, Armani, Bally, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Furla, Geox,
Gucci, Michael Kors, Moncler , Polo Ralph Lauren, Porsche Design, Prada, Zegna  
  Phases 3 & 4        Phase 4 — 2011      
  Subtotal Austria          118,000    
  ITALY              
2. La Reggia Designer
Outlet Marcianise
(Naples) Fee  90.0 %  Phase 1 — 2010  288,000  Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Liu Jo, Michael Kors, Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Roberto Cavalli, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , Versace  
  Phases 1 & 2        Phase 2a —
2010    
 
          Phase 2b —
2011    
 
3. Noventa Di Piave
Designer Venice  Fee  90.0 %  Phase 1 — 2008  324,000  Armani, Bally, Bottega Veneta, Brioni,  Burberry , Calvin Klein, Fendi, Furla, Gucci,
Loro Piana, Michael Kors, Nike, Paul Smith, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Sergio Rossi,T ommy Hilfiger , Valentino, V ersace, Zegna  
  Outlet Phases 1,
2, 3, & 4       Phase 2 — 2010     
 
          Phase 3 — 2012      
          Phase 4a - 2016      
  Subtotal Italy          612,000    
  NETHERLANDS              
4. Roermond Designer
Outlet Phases 2 & 3 Roermond  Fee  90.0 %  Phase 2 — 2005  173,000  Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla, Gucci, Michael Kors, Moncler ,
Mulberry , Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Swarovski, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , UGG, Zegna  
          Phase 3 — 2011      
5. Roermond Designer
Outlet Phase 4 Roermond  Fee  46.1 % 2017  125,000  Adidas, Karl Lagerfield, Liu Jo, Longchamp, Tag Heuer , Tom Tailor, Woolrich
 
6. Rosada Designer
Outlet Roosendaal  Fee  94.0 % 2017  247,500  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Esprit, Guess, Nike, Puma, S. Oliver
 
  Subtotal
Netherlands         545,500   
 
  UNITED KINGDOM              
7. Ashford Designer
Outlet Kent  Fee  45.0 %  2000  183,000  Adidas, Bose, Calvin Klein, Clarks , Fossil, French Connection, Gap, Guess, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Superdry , Tommy Hilfiger  
  Subtotal England          183,000    
  CANADA              
8. Vancouver Designer
Outlets Vancouver  Ground
Lease
(2072) 45.0 %  2015  242,000  Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger
 
  Subtotal Canada          242,000    
  GERMANY              
9. Ochtrup Designer
Outlets Ochtrup  Fee  70.5 % 2016  191,500  Adidas, Lindt, Nike, Puma, Samso nite, Schiesser , Seidensticker , Steiff, Tom Tailor,
Vero Moda, W atch Station  
  Subtotal Germany          191,500    
  FRANCE              
10. Provence Designer
Outlet Miramas  Fee  90.0 % 2017  269,000  Armani, Furla, Guess, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Timberland,
Tommy Hilfiger  
  Subtotal France          269,000    
  Total International Designer
Outlets       2,161,000   
 
FOOTNOTES:
(1)All gross leasable area listed in square feet.
(2)Property is undergoing an expansion.
(3)Indicates tenant is under development/construction or has announced plans for development.
 
 
 
40
 
Table of Contents
Land
We have direct or indirect ownership interests in approximately 370 acres of land held in the
United States and Canada for future development.
Sustainability
We incorporate sustainable thinking into many of the areas of our business; from how we plan,
develop, and operate our properties, to how we do business with our customers, engage with our
communities, and create a productive and positive work environment for our employees.  Our
sustainability framework focuses on four key areas: Properties, Customers, Communities, and
Employees. 
We leverage sustainability to achieve cost efficiencies in our operations.  By implementing a range
of energy management practices and continuous energy monitoring and reporting, we have reduced our
energy consumption at comparable properties every year since 2003.  As a result, excluding new
developments, we have reduced the electricity usage over which we have direct control by 363 million
kWhs since 2003.  This represents a 37% reduction in electricity usage across a portfolio of comparable
properties. 
Our reduction in greenhouse gas emissions resulting from our energy management efforts in the
same time period is 261,169 metric tons of CO2e. This figure includes emission streams that have been
consistently tracked since 2003 including scope 1, scope 2, and for scope 3 only employee commuting
and business travel. Additional emission streams, such as emissions generated from solid waste
management, use of refrigerants and tenants’ plug-load consumptions, were included in Simon’s
sustainability disclosure since 2013 and are reported in Simon’s annual sustainability report published in
accordance with the guidelines of the Global Reporting Initiatives (GRI), the most widely used
international standard for sustainability reporting.
Simon’s sustainability performance was once again recognized by international organizations. In
2018, Simon was awarded a score of A- by CDP in the climate change questionnaire, which identifies
the company as a sustainability leader for driving significant reduction in emissions, implementing
strategies to manage climate related risks and opportunities as well as setting company-wide
sustainability goals. Simon was also awarded a Green Star ranking - the designation awarded for
leadership in sustainability performance by the Global Real Estate Sustainability Benchmark (GRESB).
Mortgages and Unsecured Debt
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the mortgages encumbering our
properties, and the properties held by our domestic and international joint venture arrangements, and
also our unsecured corporate debt. Substantially all of the mortgage and property related debt is
nonrecourse to us.
 
 
41
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
      
  Interest Face  Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name     Rate     Amount    Service (1)    Date 
Consolidated Indebtedness:                
Secured Indebtedness:                
Arizona Mills  5.76%    $152,911  $12,268  07/01/20 
Battlefield Mall  3.95%     117,500   7,118  09/01/22 
Birch Run Premium Outlets  4.21%     123,000   5,177(2) 02/06/26 
Calhoun Outlet Marketplace  4.17%     18,670(19)  1,140  06/01/26 
Carolina Premium Outlets  3.36%     44,169   2,675  12/01/22 
Domain, The  5.44%     184,739   14,085  08/01/21 
Ellenton Premium Outlets  4.30%     178,000   7,651(2) 12/01/25 
Empire Mall  4.31%     190,000   8,197(2) 12/01/25 
Florida Keys Outlet Marketplace  4.17%     17,000   709(2) 12/01/25 
Gaffney Outlet Marketplace  4.17%     30,159(19)  1,841  06/01/26 
Grand Prairie Premium Outlets  3.66%     114,013   6,596  04/01/23 
Grove City Premium Outlets  4.31%     140,000   6,032(2) 12/01/25 
Gulfport Premium Outlets  4.35%     50,000   2,174(2) 12/01/25 
Gurnee Mills  3.99%     264,582   15,736  10/01/26 
Hagerstown Premium Outlets  4.26%     75,951   4,550  02/06/26 
Ingram Park Mall  5.38%     128,060   9,746  06/01/21 
La Reggia Designer Outlet Phases 1 & 2  2.25%  (25)  148,133(30)  7,780  02/15/22 
Lee Premium Outlets  4.17%     51,701(19)  3,157  06/01/26 
Merrimack Premium Outlets  3.78%     121,753   7,247  07/01/23 
Midland Park Mall  4.35%     75,464   5,078  09/06/22 
Mills at Jersey Gardens, The  3.83%     350,000   13,405(2) 11/01/20 
Montgomery Mall  4.57%     100,000   4,570(2) 05/01/24 
Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet Phases 1, 2, 3, 4  2.00%     297,566(30)  5,942(2) 07/25/25 
Opry Mills  4.09%     375,000   15,345(2) 07/01/26 
Outlets at Orange, The  4.22%     215,000   9,067(2) 04/01/24 
Oxford Valley Mall  4.77%     61,076   4,456  12/07/20 
Parndorf Designer Outlet  1.90%     105,293(30)  2,001(2) 05/25/22 
Penn Square Mall  3.84%     310,000   11,910(2) 01/01/26 
Pismo Beach Premium Outlets  3.33%     35,360(20)  1,953  09/06/26 
Plaza Carolina  3.60%  (1)  225,000   8,106(2) 07/27/21 
Pleasant Prairie Premium Outlets  4.00%     145,000   5,793(2) 09/01/27 
Potomac Mills  3.46%     416,000   14,383(2) 11/01/26 
Provence Designer Outlet  2.50%  (33)  93,019(30)  2,325(2) 07/27/22(3)
Puerto Rico Premium Outlets  3.60%  (1)  160,000   5,764(2) 07/26/21 
Queenstown Premium Outlets  3.33%     62,119(20)  3,430  09/06/26 
Roermond Designer Outlet  1.88%     263,232(30)  4,943(2) 12/18/21 
Rosada Designer Outlets  1.85%  (24)  66,523(30)  2,947  02/25/24(3)
Shops at Chestnut Hill, The  4.69%     120,000   5,624(2) 11/01/23 
Shops at Riverside, The  3.37%     130,000   4,382(2) 02/01/23 
Southdale Center  3.84%     144,514   8,713  04/01/23 
Southridge Mall  3.85%     116,968   7,036  06/06/23 
Summit Mall  3.31%     85,000   2,817(2) 10/01/26 
42
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
           
  Interest Face  Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name  
  Rate  
  Amount  
  Service (1)  
  Date 
The Crossings Premium Outlets  3.41%     108,225   6,131  12/01/22 
Town Center at Cobb  4.76%     185,305   12,530  05/01/22 
University Park Village  3.85%     55,000   2,118(2) 05/01/28 
White Oaks Mall  5.25%  (28)  49,500   3,367  06/01/23(3)
Williamsburg Premium Outlets  4.23%     185,000   7,824(2) 02/06/26 
Wolfchase Galleria  4.15%     159,157   9,620  11/01/26 
Total Consolidated Secured Indebtedness      $6,844,662        
Unsecured Indebtedness:                
Simon Property Group, L.P.                
Global Commercial Paper - USD  2.49%  (16) $758,681  $18,891(2) 02/20/19(16)
Credit Facility - USD  3.28%  (15)  125,000   4,100(2) 06/30/22(3)
Unsecured Notes - 22C  6.75%     600,000   40,500(14) 02/01/40 
Unsecured Notes - 23A  3.16%  (18)  900,000   28,478(14) 03/01/21 
Unsecured Notes - 24B  4.13%     700,000   28,875(14) 12/01/21 
Unsecured Notes - 25B  3.38%     600,000   20,250(14) 03/15/22 
Unsecured Notes - 25C  4.75%     550,000   26,125(14) 03/15/42 
Unsecured Notes - 26B  2.75%     500,000   13,750(14) 02/01/23 
Unsecured Notes - 27A  2.20%     600,000(34)  13,200(14) 02/01/19 
Unsecured Notes - 27B  3.75%     600,000   22,500(14) 02/01/24 
Unsecured Notes - 28A  3.38%     900,000   30,375(14) 10/01/24 
Unsecured Notes - 28B  4.25%     400,000   17,000(14) 10/01/44 
Unsecured Notes - 29A  2.50%     500,000   12,500(14) 09/01/20 
Unsecured Notes - 29B  3.50%     600,000   21,000(14) 09/01/25 
Unsecured Notes - 30A  2.50%     550,000   13,750(14) 07/15/21 
Unsecured Notes - 30B  3.30%     800,000   26,400(14) 01/15/26 
Unsecured Notes - 31A  2.35%     550,000   12,925(14) 01/30/22 
Unsecured Notes - 31B  3.25%     750,000   24,375(14) 11/30/26 
Unsecured Notes - 31C  4.25%     550,000   23,375(14) 11/30/46 
Unsecured Notes - 32A  2.63%     600,000   15,750(14) 06/15/22 
Unsecured Notes - 32B  3.38%     750,000   25,313(14) 06/15/27 
Unsecured Notes - 33A  2.75%     600,000   16,500(14) 06/01/23 
Unsecured Notes - 33B  3.38%     750,000   25,313(14) 12/01/27 
Unsecured Notes - Euro 1  2.38%     858,368(8)  20,386(6) 10/02/20 
Unsecured Notes - Euro 2  1.38%     858,368(13)  11,803(6) 11/18/22 
Unsecured Notes - Euro 3  1.25%     572,245(10)  7,153(6) 05/13/25 
Total Consolidated Unsecured Indebtedness      $16,522,662        
Total Consolidated Indebtedness at Face Amounts      $23,367,324        
Premium on Indebtedness       11,822        
Discount on Indebtedness       (44,691)        
Debt Issuance Costs       (96,175)        
Other Debt Obligations       67,255(35)       
Total Consolidated Indebtedness      $23,305,535        
Our Share of Consolidated Indebtedness      $23,139,977        
43
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
          
  Interest Face  Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name  
  Rate  
  Amount  
  Service (1)  
  Date 
Joint Venture Indebtedness:                
Secured Indebtedness:                
Ami Premium Outlets  1.72%    $48,495(26) $8,441  09/25/23 
Arundel Mills  4.29%     385,000   16,509(2) 02/06/24 
Ashford Designer Outlet  2.94%  (27)  81,890(21)  2,410(2) 02/22/22 
Auburn Mall  6.02%     37,043   3,027  09/01/20 
Aventura Mall  4.12%     1,750,000   72,122(2) 07/01/28 
Avenues, The  3.60%     110,000   3,960(2) 02/06/23 
Bangkok Premium Outlets  1.90%     27,746(11)  527(2) 03/05/19 
Briarwood Mall  3.29%     165,000   5,432(2) 09/01/26 
Busan Premium Outlets  3.40%     101,897(17)  3,460(2) 06/20/22 
Cape Cod Mall  5.75%     88,612   7,003  03/06/21 
Charlotte Premium Outlets  4.27%     100,000   4,270(2) 07/01/28 
Circle Centre  5.25%  (1)  65,000   6,189  12/06/24 
Clarksburg Premium Outlets  3.95%     160,000   6,320(2) 01/01/28 
Coconut Point  3.95%     189,468   10,823  10/01/26 
Colorado Mills - 1  4.28%     133,607   5,718  11/01/24 
Colorado Mills - 2  5.04%     26,086   1,811  07/01/21 
Concord Mills  3.84%     235,000   9,015(2) 11/01/22 
Crystal Mall  4.46%     87,782   5,749  06/06/22 
Dadeland Mall  4.50%     410,211   27,361  12/05/21 
Del Amo Fashion Center  3.66%     585,000   21,396(2) 06/01/27 
Domain Westin  4.12%     66,036   4,069  09/01/25 
Dover Mall  5.57%     83,664   6,455  08/06/21 
Emerald Square Mall  4.71%     102,672   7,165  08/11/22 
Falls, The  3.45%     150,000   5,175(2) 09/01/26 
Fashion Centre Pentagon Office  5.11%     40,000   2,043(2) 07/01/21 
Fashion Centre Pentagon Retail  4.87%     410,000   19,957(2) 07/01/21 
Fashion Valley  4.30%     431,673   28,208  01/04/21 
Florida Mall, The  5.25%     321,848   24,849  09/05/20 
Galleria, The  3.55%     1,200,000   42,598(2) 03/01/25 
Genting Highland Premium Outlets  5.27%  (7)  31,776(9)  1,675(2) 02/14/24 
Gloucester Premium Outlets  4.00%  (1)  86,000   3,442(2) 03/01/23(3)
Grapevine Mills  3.83%     268,000   10,272(2) 10/01/24 
Hamilton Town Center  4.81%     79,218   5,293  04/01/22 
Johor Premium Outlets  5.02%  (7)  2,007(9)  6,725  11/01/19 
Katy Mills  3.49%     140,000   4,886(2) 12/06/22 
Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets  0.44%  (12)  30,215(26)  1,729  01/31/23 
Lehigh Valley Mall  4.06%     196,328   12,325  11/01/27 
Liberty Tree Mall  3.41%     30,984   1,866  05/06/23 
Malaga Designer Outlet  2.75%  (22)  10,529   290(2) 02/09/23 
Mall at Rockingham Park, The  4.04%     262,000   10,585(2) 06/01/26 
Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The  3.56%     118,871   6,789  05/01/23 
Mall of New Hampshire, The  4.11%     150,000   6,162(2) 07/01/25 
44
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
     
  Interest Face  Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name  
  Rate  
  Amount  
  Service (1)  
  Date 
Meadowood Mall  5.82%     112,370   8,818  11/06/21 
Miami International Mall  4.42%     160,000   7,072(2) 02/06/24 
Northshore Mall  3.30%     243,154   14,453  07/05/23 
Ochtrup Designer Outlet  2.49%  (27)  45,539(30)  2,787  06/30/21 
Ontario Mills  4.25%     304,854   20,661  03/05/22 
Paju Premium Outlets  3.56%     57,908(17)  18,203  07/13/23 
Phipps Plaza Hotel  4.50%  (1)  21,262   1,221  12/17/19 
Phipps Plaza Residential  4.25%  (1)  38,274   1,628(2) 10/16/19 
Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton IA  3.60%  (4)  96,094(5)  3,457(2) 11/10/21(3)
Premium Outlets Montréal  3.10%     88,033(5)  2,729(2) 06/01/24 
Quaker Bridge Mall  4.50%     180,000   8,100(2) 05/01/26 
Querétaro Premium Outlets  11.29%  (23)  18,932(32)  2,137(2) 12/20/33 
Rinku Premium Outlets  0.33%  (12)  9,090(26)  30(2) 07/31/22 
Roermond 4 Designer Outlet  1.30%  (36)  192,274(30)  2,500(2) 08/17/25 
Roosevelt Field Hotel  5.60%  (1)  1,206   68(2) 01/12/23 
Sano Premium Outlets  0.31%     41,358(26)  1,637(2) 02/28/25 
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 1  0.31%  (12)  25,451(26)  5,048(2) 05/31/23 
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 2  0.38%     45,448(26)  173(2) 05/29/22 
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 3  0.31%  (12)  23,633(26)  73(2) 11/30/23 
Shops at Clearfork, The  4.25%  (1)  176,358   7,500(2) 03/18/21(3)
Shops at Crystals, The  3.74%     550,000   20,592(2) 07/01/26 
Shops at Mission Viejo, The  3.61%     295,000   10,650(2) 02/01/23 
Siheung Premium Outlets  3.28%     134,667(17)  4,417(2) 03/15/23 
Silver Sands Premium Outlets  3.93%     100,000   3,930(2) 06/01/22 
Smith Haven Mall  3.70%  (1)  180,000   6,665(2) 05/29/20 
Solomon Pond Mall  4.01%     97,350   6,309  11/01/22 
Southdale Hotel  4.50%     16,696   752(2) 06/01/22 
Southdale Residential  4.46%     39,541   2,530  10/15/35 
Springfield Mall  4.45%     61,625   3,928  10/06/25 
Square One Mall  5.47%     89,563   6,793  01/06/22 
St. Johns Town Center  3.82%     350,000   13,367(2) 09/11/24 
St. Louis Premium Outlets  4.06%     95,000   3,858(2) 10/06/24 
Stoneridge Shopping Center  3.50%     330,000   11,550(2) 09/05/26 
Tanger Outlets Columbus  4.15%  (1)  85,000   3,530(2) 11/28/21(3)
Tanger Outlets - Galveston/Houston  4.15%  (1)  80,000   3,322(2) 07/01/22 
Toki Premium Outlets - Fixed  0.38%     27,269(26)  102(2) 11/29/19 
Toki Premium Outlets - Variable  0.92%  (12)  5,656(26)  52(2) 05/31/20 
Toronto Premium Outlets  3.13%     124,714(5)  3,899(2) 06/01/22 
Toronto Premium Outlets II  3.50%  (4)  82,898(5)  2,899(2) 05/25/22(3)
Tosu Premium Outlets  0.38%  (12)  10,453(26)  2,081(2) 07/31/21 
Twin Cities Premium Outlets  4.32%     115,000   4,968(2) 11/06/24 
Vancouver Designer Outlet  3.85%  (4)  83,607(5)  3,216(2) 06/19/21(3)
West Town Mall  4.37%     210,000   9,177(2) 07/01/22 
Westchester, The  6.00%     324,860   26,980  05/05/20 
45
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
           
  Interest Face  Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name  
  Rate  
  Amount  
  Service (1)  
  Date 
Woodfield Mall  4.50%     412,795   24,162  03/05/24 
Yeoju Premium Outlets  3.45%     74,519   2,570(2) 09/28/21 
Total Joint Venture Secured Indebtedness at Face Value      $14,857,111        
TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value       420,486(29)       
Total Joint Venture and TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value      $15,277,597        
Premium on Indebtedness       2,225        
Debt Issuance Costs       (44,407)        
Total Joint Venture Indebtedness      $15,235,415        
Our Share of Joint Venture Indebtedness      $7,160,392(31)       
(1)Variable rate loans based on one-month (1M) LIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 77.5 bps to 310 bps.  1M LIBOR
as of December 31, 2018 was 2.50%.Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(2)Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(3)Includes applicable extension available at the Applicable Borrower's option.
(4)Variable rate loans based on 1M CDOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 120 bps to 155 bps.  1M CDOR at December
31, 2018 was 2.30%.
(5)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  CAD equivalent is 648.0 million.
(6)Requires annual payment of interest only.
(7)Variable rate loans based on Cost of Fund plus interest rate spreads ranging from 150 bps of 175 bps. Cost of Fund as of
December 31, 2018 was 3.43%.
(8)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 750.0 million.
(9)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Ringgit equivalent is 139.7 million.
(10)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 500.0 million.
(11)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Baht equivalent is 899.0 million.
(12)Variable rate loans based on six-month (6M) TIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 17.5 bps to 35 bps.  As of
December 31, 2018, 6M TIBOR was 0.13%.
(13)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 750.0 million.
(14)Requires semi-annual payments of interest only.
(15)$4.0 Billion Credit Facility.  As of December 31, 2018, the Credit Facility - USD Currency bears interest at 1M LIBOR + 77.5
bps, the Credit Facility - Yen Currency bears interest  at 1M Yen LIBOR + 77.5 bps and the Credit Facility - Euro Currency
bears interest at 1M EURO LIBOR + 77.5 bps.  The Credit Facilities provide for different pricing based upon our investment
grade rating.  No borrowings under the $3.5 Billion Supplemental Facility were outstanding at December 31, 2018.  As of
December 31, 2018, $6.6 billion was available after outstanding borrowings and letters of credit under our Credit Facilities.
(16)Reflects the weighted average maturity date and weighted average interest rate of all outstanding tranches of commercial
paper at December 31, 2018.
(17)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Won equivalent is 411.0 billion.
(18)Through a cross currency swap agreement, $150.0 million was swapped to Euro equivalent 121.6 million at 1.37%. Through
an additional cross currency swap agreement, $200.7 million was swapped to Yen equivalent 22.3 billion at 1.19%, resulting
in an interest rate essentially fixed at the all-in rate presented.
(19)Loans secured by these three properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
46
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
(20)Loans secured by these two properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(21)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  GBP equivalent is 64.3 million.
(22)Variable rate loan based on three-month (3M) EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate spread of
275 bps.
(23)On January 9, 2019, 198.6 million Pesos of the current outstanding balance was swapped from a variable interest rate of 28
day TIIE plus 2.70% to a fixed interest rate of 8.79% resulting in an all-in interest rate of 9.60%.
(24)Variable rate loan based on 1M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 185 bps.  Through an interest rate floor agreement,
1M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(25)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 225 bps.  Through an interest rate floor agreement,
3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(26)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Yen equivalent is 29.4 billion
(27)Associated with this loan is an interest rate swap agreement that effectively fixes the interest rate on this loan at the all-in rate
presented.
(28)Variable rate loan based on 1M LIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 275 bps.  In addition, 1M LIBOR is capped at 5.00%.
(29)Consists of two properties with interest rates ranging from 5.65% to 7.32% and maturities between 2019 and 2021.
(30)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 1.1 billion.
(31)Our share of total indebtedness includes a pro rata share of the mortgage debt on joint venture properties, including
properties owned by TMLP.  To the extent total indebtedness is secured by a property, it is non-recourse to us, with the
exception of approximately $216.1 million of payment guarantees provided by the Operating Partnership (of which $10.8
million is recoverable from our venture partner under the partnership agreement).
(32)Amount shown in USD equivalent. Peso equivalent is 372.1 million.
(33)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 250 bps. Through an interest rate floor agreement,
3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. In addition, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.00%.
(34)Notes repaid at maturity on February 1, 2019.
(35)City of Sunrise Bond Liability (Sawgrass Mills)
(36)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 130 bps. Through an interest rate floor agreement,
3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. Also, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.30%.
47
 
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
The changes in consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 are as follows:
      
     2018     2017     2016  
Balance, Beginning of Year  $24,632,463  $22,977,104  $22,416,682  
Additions during period:           
New Loan Originations   7,980,569   11,764,046   14,862,637  
Loans assumed in acquisitions and consolidation   215,000   42,266   448,559  
Net (Discount)/Premium   301  (11,636)   (9,822)  
Net Debt Issuance Costs   (6,885)   (34,606)   (34,048)  
Deductions during period:           
Loan Retirements   (9,340,861)   (10,466,033)   (14,549,425)  
Amortization of Net Discounts/(Premiums)   1,618   1,357   (14,583)  
Debt Issuance Cost Amortization   21,445   21,709   21,702  
Scheduled Principal Amortization   (54,624)   (46,232)   (62,222)  
Foreign Currency Translation   (143,490)   384,488   (102,376)  
Balance, Close of Year  $23,305,535  $24,632,463  $22,977,104  
 
 
 
 
48
 
Table of Contents
Item 3.  Legal Proceedings
We are involved from time‑to‑time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the
ordinary course of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental
matters, and litigation in connection with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe
that our current proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or
results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is considered probable, and the amount can be
reasonably estimated.
Item 4.  Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
49
 
Table of Contents
Part II
Item 5.  Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities
Simon
Market Information
Simon’s common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “SPG”.
Holders
The number of holders of record of common stock outstanding was 1,066 as of February 14,
2019. The Class B common stock is subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David
Simon are the trustees. Shares of Class B common stock convert automatically into an equal number of
shares of common stock upon the occurrence of certain events and can be converted into shares of
common stock at the option of the holders.
Dividends
We must pay a minimum amount of dividends to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT. Simon’s
future dividends and future distributions of the Operating Partnership will be determined by Simon’s
Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and
results of operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner distributions, cash reserves as
deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount
required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
Common stock cash dividends during 2018 aggregated $7.90 per share. Common stock cash
dividends during 2017 aggregated $7.15 per share. In the first quarter of 2019, Simon’s Board of
Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $2.05 per share of common stock payable on
February 28, 2019 to stockholders of record on February 14, 2019.
We offer a dividend reinvestment plan that allows Simon’s stockholders to acquire additional
shares by automatically reinvesting cash dividends. Shares are acquired pursuant to the plan at a price
equal to the prevailing market price of such shares, without payment of any brokerage commission or
service charge.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
None.
Issuances Under Equity Compensation Plans
For information regarding the securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation
plans, see Item 12 of this Annual Report on Form 10‑K.
50
 
Table of Contents
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
      Total number Approximate 
       of shares  value of shares 
       purchased as that may yet 
  Total number Average part of publicly be purchased 
  of shares  price paid announced under  
Period  purchased per share  programs programs (1) 
October 1, 2018 - October 31, 2018   — $  —  — $  — 
November 1, 2018 - November 30, 2018   — $  —  — $  — 
December 1, 2018 - December 31, 2018  286,947  $163.14  286,947  $640,616,226  
  286,947  $163.14  286,947     
(1)On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion Repurchase Program through March 31, 2019 and on February 11, 2019,
Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the new
program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year
period ending February 11, 2021. Under the Repurchase Program, Simon may repurchase the
shares in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions.  As Simon repurchases shares
under this program, the Operating Partnership repurchases an equal number of units from Simon.
The Operating Partnership
Market Information
There is no established trading market for units or preferred units. 
Holders
The number of holders of record of units was 246 as of February 14, 2019.
Distributions
The Operating Partnership makes distributions on its units in amounts sufficient to maintain
Simon's qualification as a REIT. Simon is required each year to distribute to its stockholders at least
90% of its REIT taxable income after certain adjustments. Future distributions will be determined by
Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition,
liquidity and results of operations, cash available for distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary
for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the distributions that may be
required to maintain Simon's status as a REIT.
Distributions during 2018 aggregated $7.90 per unit.  Distributions during 2017 aggregated $7.15
per unit.  In the first quarter of 2019, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of
$2.05 per share.  The distribution rate on the Operating Partnership’s units is equal to the dividend rate
on Simon’s common stock.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
None.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
During the year ended December 31, 2018 the Operating Partnership redeemed 454,704 units
from eight limited partners for $81.5 million in cash.
51
 
Table of Contents
Item 6.  Selected Financial Data
The following tables set forth selected financial data. The selected financial data should be read in
conjunction with the financial statements and notes thereto and with Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. Other data we believe is important in
understanding trends in our business is also included in the tables.
          
  As of or for the Year Ended December 31
    2018    2017 (1)   2016 (2)   2015 (3)   2014 (4)
  (in thousands, except per share data)
OPERATING DATA:                
Total consolidated revenue  $5,657,919 $5,538,640 $5,435,229 $5,266,103 $4,870,818
Consolidated income from continuing operations  2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706  2,139,375  1,622,165
Consolidated net income   2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706  2,139,375  1,651,526
Net income attributable to common stockholders -
SPG Inc.   2,436,721  1,944,625  1,835,559  1,824,383  1,405,251
Net income attributable to unitholders - SPG L.P.  2,805,764  2,239,638  2,122,236  2,131,139  1,643,783
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER
SHARE/UNIT:                
Simon Property Group, Inc.                
Income from continuing operations  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 $ 5.88 $ 4.44
Discontinued operations   —  —  —  —  0.08
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 $ 5.88 $ 4.52
Basic weighted average shares outstanding   309,627  311,517  312,691  310,103  310,731
Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   309,627  311,517  312,691  310,103  310,731
Dividends per share (5)  $ 7.90 $ 7.15 $ 6.50 $ 6.05 $ 5.15
Simon Property Group, L.P.                
Income from continuing operations  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 $ 5.88 $ 4.44
Discontinued operations   —  —  —  —  0.08
Net income attributable to unitholders  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 $ 5.88 $ 4.52
Basic weighted average units outstanding   356,520  358,777  361,527  362,244  363,476
Diluted weighted average units outstanding   356,520  358,777  361,527  362,244  363,476
Distributions per unit (5)  $ 7.90 $ 7.15 $ 6.50 $ 6.05 $ 5.15
BALANCE SHEET DATA:                
Cash and cash equivalents  $514,335 $1,482,309 $560,059 $701,134 $612,282
Total assets   30,686,223  32,257,638  31,103,578  30,565,182  29,447,591
Mortgages and other indebtedness   23,305,535  24,632,463  22,977,104  22,416,682  20,768,254
Total equity   3,796,956  4,238,764  4,959,912  5,216,369  5,951,505
OTHER DATA:                
Cash flow provided by (used in):                
Operating activities  $3,750,796 $3,593,788 $3,372,694 $3,024,685 $2,730,420
Investing activities   (236,506)  (761,467)  (969,026)  (1,462,720)  (897,266)
Financing activities   (4,482,264)  (1,910,071)  (2,544,743)  (1,473,113)  (2,937,735)
Simon Property Group, Inc.                
Funds from Operations (FFO) (6)  $4,324,601 $4,020,505 $3,792,951 $3,571,237 $3,235,298
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders $3,755,784 $3,490,910 $3,280,590 $3,057,193 $2,765,819
Diluted FFO per share  $ 12.13 $ 11.21 $ 10.49 $ 9.86 $ 8.90
Simon Property Group, L.P.                
Funds from Operations (FFO) (6)  $4,324,601 $4,020,505 $3,792,951 $3,571,237 $3,235,298
(1)During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recorded a $128.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the
early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/units and diluted FFO per share
by $0.36.
52
 
Table of Contents
(2)During the year ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a $136.8 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the
early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/units and diluted FFO per share
by $0.38.
(3)During the year ended December 31, 2015, we recorded a $121.0 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the
early redemption of two series of unsecured senior notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/units and diluted FFO per
share by $0.33. We also recorded a gain on sale of marketable securities of $80.2 million, increasing diluted earnings per
share/unit and diluted FFO per share by $0.22.
(4)During the year ended December 31, 2014, we recorded a $127.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with five
unsecured note tender offers and one early unsecured note redemption, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted
FFO per share/unit by $0.35. We also recorded transaction expenses related to the spin‑off of Washington Prime Group Inc.,
or Washington Prime, of $38.2 million or $0.10 per share/unit. 2014 FFO includes results for five months of Washington
Prime of $146.2 million or $0.40 per share.
(5)Represents dividends per share of Simon common stock/distributions per unit of Operating Partnership units declared per
period.
(6)FFO is a non‑GAAP financial measure that we believe provides useful information to investors. Please refer to
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for a definition and reconciliation of
FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, FFO per share to net income per share.
53
 
Table of Contents
Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements
and notes thereto that are included in this Annual Report on Form 10‑K.
Overview
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and
self-managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate
income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon
Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. In this discussion, unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise
requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating
Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively
Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or
the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the
Operating Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use
destinations, which consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets, and The Mills. As of December 31,
2018, we owned or held an interest in 206 income‑producing properties in the United States, which
consisted of 107 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 12 other retail properties
in 37 states and Puerto Rico. In addition, we have redevelopment and expansion projects, including the
addition of anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants, underway at several properties in the United
States, Canada, Europe and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2018, we had ownership interests
in nine Premium Outlets in Japan, four Premium Outlets in South Korea, three Premium Outlets in
Canada, two Premium Outlets in Malaysia and one Premium Outlet in Mexico. We also own an interest
in eight Designer Outlet properties in Europe and one Designer Outlet property in Canada. Of the eight
properties in Europe, two are located in Italy, two are located in the Netherlands and one each is located
in Austria, Germany, France and the United Kingdom. We also have three international outlet properties
under development. As of December 31, 2018, we also owned a 21.3% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or
Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris‑based real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in,
shopping centers located in 16 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our revenues from leases with retail, dining, entertainment and other
tenants, including:
·base minimum rents,
·overage and percentage rents based on tenants’ sales volumes, and
·recoverable expenditures such as property operating, real estate taxes, repair and maintenance,
and advertising and promotional expenditures.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of
management fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We invest in real estate properties to maximize total financial return which includes both operating
cash flows and capital appreciation. We seek growth in earnings, funds from operations, or FFO, and
cash flows by enhancing the profitability and operation of our properties and investments. We seek to
accomplish this growth through the following:
·attracting and retaining high quality tenants and utilizing economies of scale to reduce operating
expenses,
·expanding and re‑tenanting existing highly productive locations at competitive rental rates,
·selectively acquiring or increasing our interests in high quality real estate assets or portfolios of
assets,
·generating consumer traffic in our retail properties through marketing initiatives and strategic
corporate alliances, and
·selling selective non‑core assets.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
·establishing our malls as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses
and consumer‑focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees
relating to the sales of
54
 ® ®
Table of Contents
bank‑issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives,
business development, sponsorship, and events,
·offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and
facility services, and the provision of energy services,
·selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or
“outparcels,” and
·generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to
related entities.
We focus on high quality real estate across the retail real estate spectrum. We expand or
redevelop properties to enhance profitability and market share of existing assets when we believe the
investment of our capital meets our risk‑reward criteria. We selectively develop new properties in
markets we believe are not adequately served by existing retail outlet properties.
We routinely review and evaluate acquisition opportunities based on their ability to enhance our
portfolio. Our international strategy includes partnering with established real estate companies and
financing international investments with local currency to minimize foreign exchange risk.
To support our growth, we employ a three‑fold capital strategy:
·provide the capital necessary to fund growth,
·maintain sufficient flexibility to access capital in many forms, both public and private, and
·manage our overall financial structure in a fashion that preserves our investment grade credit
ratings.
We consider FFO, net operating income, or NOI, portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI (NOI
for properties owned and operated in both periods under comparison) to be key measures of operating
performance that are not specifically defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States, or GAAP. We use these measures internally to evaluate the operating performance of our
portfolio and provide a basis for comparison with other real estate companies. Reconciliations of these
measures to the most comparable GAAP measure are included below in this discussion.
Results Overview
Diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit increased $1.63 during 2018 to $7.87 as
compared to $6.24 in 2017. The increase in diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit was
primarily attributable to:
·improved operating performance and solid core business fundamentals in 2018 and the impact
of our acquisition, development and expansion activity,
·2018 net gains primarily related to disposition activity of $288.8 million, or $0.81 per diluted
share/unit,
·a non-cash investment gain of $35.6 million, or $0.10 per diluted share/unit, in 2018,
·business interruption insurance proceeds from Puerto Rico of $17.9 million in 2018, or $0.05
per diluted share/unit,
·increased income related to distributions from an international investment in 2018 of $21.9
million, or $0.06 per diluted share/unit, and
·a charge on early extinguishment of debt of $128.6 million, or $0.36 per diluted share/unit, in
2017, partially offset by
·2017 gains of $21.5 million, or $0.06 per diluted share/unit, from the sales of marketable
securities,
·an unfavorable $15.2 million, or $0.04 per diluted share/unit, non-cash mark-to-market
adjustment on an equity investment, and
·our share of an early repayment charge and write-off of deferred debt issuance costs in 2018
related to refinancing at Aventura Mall, of $12.5 million, or $0.03 per diluted share/unit.
Solid core business fundamentals during 2018 were primarily driven by strong leasing activity.
Portfolio NOI grew by 3.7% in 2018 as compared to 2017. Comparable property NOI grew 2.3% for our
portfolio of U.S. Malls, Premium
55
 
Table of Contents
Outlets, and The Mills. Total sales per square foot, or psf, increased to $661 psf at December 31, 2018
from $628 psf at December 31, 2017 for our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets. Average base minimum
rent for U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets increased 2.0% to $54.18 psf as of December 31, 2018, from
$53.11 psf as of December 31, 2017. Leasing spreads in our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets were
positive as we were able to lease available square feet at higher rents, resulting in an open/close
leasing spread (based on total tenant payments — base minimum rent plus common area maintenance)
of $7.75 psf ($62.04 openings compared to $54.29 closings) as of December 31, 2018, representing a
14.3% increase. Ending occupancy for our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets increased 0.3% to 95.9% as
of December 31, 2018, from 95.6% as of December 31, 2017.
Our effective overall borrowing rate at December 31, 2018 on our consolidated indebtedness
increased 10 basis points to 3.35% as compared to 3.25% at December 31, 2017. This increase was
primarily due to an increase in the effective overall borrowing rate on variable rate debt of 98 basis
points (3.17% at December 31, 2018 as compared to 2.19% at December 31, 2017) combined with an
increase in the effective overall borrowing rate on fixed rate debt of seven basis points (3.37% at
December 31, 2018 as compared to 3.30% at December 31, 2017), partially offset by a decrease in the
amount of both fixed and variable rate debt.  The weighted average years to maturity of our
consolidated indebtedness was 6.4 years and 7.0 years at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Our financing activity for the year ended December 31, 2018 and material subsequent events
included:
·Repaying our Yen-denominated borrowings of $201.3 million (U.S. dollar equivalent) on the
Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility.
·Decreasing our borrowings under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial
paper note program, or the Commercial Paper program, by $219.8 million.
·Redeeming at par $750.0 million of senior unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 1.50%
on January 3, 2018.
·Unencumbering a property by repaying an $86.6 million mortgage loan with an interest rate of
7.79%.
·Refinancing the $1.2 billion mortgage loan and $200.8 million construction loan at Aventura
Mall, in which we have a 33.3% noncontrolling interest, with a $1.75 billion mortgage loan at a
fixed interest rate of 4.12% that matures on July 1, 2028.
·Refinancing the €110.0 million, 1.68% variable rate mortgage loan maturing in 2020 at Noventa
di Piave Designer Outlet, in which we have a 90.0% interest, with a €260.0 million, 2.00% fixed
rate mortgage loan that matures in 2025.
·Repaying at maturity $600.0 million of senior unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of
2.20% on February 1, 2019.
United States Portfolio Data
The portfolio data discussed in this overview includes the following key operating statistics: ending
occupancy, average base minimum rent per square foot, and total sales per square foot for our
domestic assets. We include acquired properties in this data beginning in the year of acquisition and
remove disposed properties in the year of disposition. For comparative information purposes, we
separate the information related to The Mills from our other U.S. operations. We also do not include any
information for properties located outside the United States.
56
 
Table of Contents
The following table sets forth these key operating statistics for the combined U.S. Malls and
Premium Outlets:
·properties that are consolidated in our consolidated financial statements,
·properties we account for under the equity method of accounting as joint ventures, and
·the foregoing two categories of properties on a total portfolio basis.
          
     %/Basis Point    %/Basis Point    
     2018 Change (1) 2017 Change (1) 2016 
U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets:               
Ending Occupancy               
Consolidated   95.9 %  10bps  95.8 %  -130 bps  97.1 %
Unconsolidated   95.8 %  70bps 95.1 %  -70bps  95.8 %
Total Portfolio   95.9 %  30bps 95.6 %  -120 bps  96.8 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per Square
Foot               
Consolidated  $52.51  2.3%  $51.34  2.8%  $49.94  
Unconsolidated  $58.59  1.2%  $57.88  3.0%  $56.19  
Total Portfolio  $54.18  2.0%  $53.11  2.9%  $51.59  
Total Sales per Square Foot               
Consolidated  $641 4.6%  $613 2.2%  $600 
Unconsolidated  $719 7.2%  $671 1.7%  $660 
Total Portfolio  $661 5.3%  $628 2.3%  $614 
The Mills:               
Ending Occupancy   97.6 %  -80bps  98.4 %  0bps 98.4 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per Square
Foot  $32.63  5.3%  $30.98  6.6%  $29.07  
Total Sales per Square Foot  $614 4.6%  $587 3.8%  $565 
(1)Percentages may not recalculate due to rounding. Percentage and basis point changes are representative of the change
from the comparable prior period.
Ending Occupancy Levels and Average Base Minimum Rent per Square Foot.  Ending
occupancy is the percentage of gross leasable area, or GLA, which is leased as of the last day of the
reporting period. We include all company owned space except for mall anchors, mall majors, mall
freestanding and mall outlots in the calculation. Base minimum rent per square foot is the average base
minimum rent charge in effect for the reporting period for all tenants that would qualify to be included in
ending occupancy.
Total Sales per Square Foot.  Total sales include total reported retail tenant sales on a trailing
12‑month basis at owned GLA (for mall stores with less than 10,000 square feet) in the malls and The
Mills and stores with less than 20,000 square feet in the Premium Outlets. Retail sales at owned GLA
affect revenue and profitability levels because sales determine the amount of minimum rent that can be
charged, the percentage rent realized, and the recoverable expenses (common area maintenance, real
estate taxes, etc.) that tenants can afford to pay.
Current Leasing Activities
During 2018, we signed 900 new leases and 1,183 renewal leases (excluding mall anchors and
majors, new development, redevelopment and leases with terms of one year or less) with a fixed
minimum rent across our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets portfolio, comprising approximately 7.1 million
square feet, of which 5.3 million square feet related to consolidated properties. During 2017, we signed
849 new leases and 1,302 renewal leases with a fixed minimum rent, comprising approximately 6.7
million square feet, of which 5.0 million square feet related to consolidated properties. The average
annual initial base minimum rent for new leases was $57.29 per square foot in 2018 and $58.60 per
square foot in 2017 with an average tenant allowance on new leases of $54.21 per square foot and
$50.53 per square foot, respectively.
57
 
Table of Contents
Japan Data
The following are selected key operating statistics for our Premium Outlets in Japan. The
information used to prepare these statistics has been supplied by the managing venture partner.
      December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,  
   2018  Change 2017  Change 2016  
Ending Occupancy       99.7%  -20 bps    99.9%      40 bps      99.5%  
Total Sales per Square Foot   ¥107,265     2.02%  ¥105,138   5.17%  ¥ 99,971  
Average Base Minimum Rent per
Square Foot  ¥    5,156   1.86%   ¥   5,062    0.48%  ¥   5,038  
 
Critical Accounting Policies
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles, or GAAP, requires management to use judgment in the application of accounting policies,
including making estimates and assumptions. We base our estimates on historical experience and on
various other assumptions believed to be reasonable under the circumstances. These judgments affect
the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the dates
of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting
periods. If our judgment or interpretation of the facts and circumstances relating to various transactions
had been different, it is possible that different accounting policies would have been applied resulting in a
different presentation of our financial statements. From time to time, we reevaluate our estimates and
assumptions. In the event estimates or assumptions prove to be different from actual results,
adjustments are made in subsequent periods to reflect more current information. Below is a discussion
of accounting policies that we consider critical in that they may require complex judgment in their
application or require estimates about matters that are inherently uncertain. For a summary of our
significant accounting policies, see Note 3 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements.
·We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment
properties and account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue minimum rents on a
straight‑line basis over the terms of their respective leases. Substantially all of our retail tenants
are also required to pay overage rents based on sales over a stated base amount during the
lease year. We recognize overage rents only when each tenant’s sales exceed its sales
threshold.
·We review investment properties for impairment on a property‑by‑property basis whenever
events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of investment properties
may not be recoverable. These circumstances include, but are not limited to, a decline in a
property’s cash flows, occupancy or comparable sales per square foot. We measure any
impairment of investment property when the estimated undiscounted operating income before
depreciation and amortization plus its residual value is less than the carrying value of the
property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying
value of the property over its estimated fair value. We may decide to sell properties that are held
for use and the sale prices of these properties may differ from their carrying values. We also
review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated entities, if events or
circumstances change indicating that the carrying amount of our investments may not be
recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine that a decline in the fair value
of the investments below carrying value is other‑than‑temporary. Changes in economic and
operating conditions that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment property
and other investments could impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result
in future charges to earnings if assumptions regarding those investments differ from actual
results.
·To maintain Simon’s status as a REIT, we must distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income in
any given year and meet certain asset and income tests. We monitor our business and
transactions that may potentially impact Simon’s REIT status. In the unlikely event that we fail to
maintain Simon’s REIT status, and available relief provisions do not apply, we would be required
to pay U.S. federal income taxes at regular corporate income tax rates during the period Simon
did not qualify as a REIT. If Simon lost its REIT status, it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT
for four taxable years following the year during which qualification was lost unless its failure was
due to reasonable cause and certain other conditions were met. As a result, failing to maintain
REIT status would result in a significant increase in the income tax expense recorded and paid
during those periods.
·We make estimates as part of our valuation of the purchase price of asset acquisitions
(including the components of excess investment in joint ventures) to the various components of
the acquisition based upon the relative fair
58
 
Table of Contents
value of each component. The most significant components of our valuations are typically the
determination of relative fair value to the buildings as‑if‑vacant, land and market value of
in‑place leases. In the case of the fair value of buildings and fair value of land and other
intangibles, our estimates of the values of these components will affect the amount of
depreciation or amortization we record over the estimated useful life of the property acquired or
the remaining lease term. In the case of the market value of in‑place leases, we make our best
estimates of the tenants’ ability to pay rents based upon the tenants’ operating performance at
the property, including the competitive position of the property in its market as well as sales psf,
rents psf, and overall occupancy cost for the tenants in place at the acquisition date. Our
assumptions affect the amount of future revenue that we will recognize over the remaining lease
term for the acquired in‑place leases.
·A variety of costs are incurred in the development and leasing of properties. After determination
is made to capitalize a cost, it is allocated to the specific component of a project that is
benefited. Determination of when a development project is substantially complete and
capitalization must cease involves judgment. The costs of land and buildings under
development include specifically identifiable costs. The capitalized costs include
pre‑construction costs essential to the development of the property, development costs,
construction costs, interest costs, real estate taxes, salaries and related costs and other costs
incurred during the period of development. We consider a construction project as substantially
completed and held available for occupancy and cease capitalization of costs upon opening.
Results of Operations
In addition to the activity discussed above in the “Results Overview” section, the following
acquisitions, dispositions, and openings of consolidated properties affected our consolidated results in
the comparative periods:
·On September 27, 2018, we opened Denver Premium Outlets, a 330,000 square foot center in
Thornton (Denver), Colorado. We own a 100% interest in this center.
·On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the previously
unconsolidated The Outlets at Orange in Los Angeles, California from our joint venture partner.
·During 2018, we disposed of two retail properties.
·On April 21, 2017, through our European investee, we acquired Rosada Designer Outlet, a
247,500 square foot center in Roosendaal, Netherlands. We have a 94% interest in this center.
·On April 13, 2017, through our European investee, we opened Provence Designer Outlet, a
269,000 square foot center in Miramas, France. We have a 90% interest in this new center.
·During 2016, we disposed of three retail properties.
·During the first quarter of 2016, we consolidated two Designer Outlet properties in Europe that
had previously been accounted for under the equity method. During the third quarter of 2016,
we consolidated two more Designer Outlet properties in Europe, which were previously
accounted for under the equity method.
In addition to the activities discussed above and in “Results Overview”, the following acquisitions,
dispositions, and openings of joint venture properties affected our income from unconsolidated entities
in the comparative periods:
·During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the 41 German department store properties
owned through our investment in HBS Global Properties, or HBS, was sold, as further
discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements.
·During 2018, we contributed our interest in the licensing venture of Aéropostale for additional
interests in Authentic Brands Group LLC, or ABG.  Our noncontrolling interest in ABG is 5.4%.
·On May 2, 2018, we and our partner opened Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton International
Airport, a 424,000 square foot shopping center in Edmonton (Alberta), Canada. We have a 50%
noncontrolling interest in this new center.
·During 2017, we disposed of our interest in one retail property.
·On September 14, 2017, we and our partner opened The Shops at Clearfork, a 500,000 square
foot center in Fort Worth, Texas. We have a 45% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
59
 
Table of Contents
·On June 29, 2017, we and our partner opened Norfolk Premium Outlets, a 332,000 square foot
center in Norfolk, Virginia. We have a 65% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
·On June 15, 2017, we and our partner opened Genting Highlands Premium Outlets in Kuala
Lumpur, Malaysia. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this 278,000 square foot center.
·On April 6, 2017, we and our partner opened Siheung Premium Outlets, a 444,400 square foot
center in Siheung (Seoul), South Korea. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this new
center.
·During 2016, we disposed of our interests in four retail properties.
·On November 3, 2016, we and our partner opened a 500,000 square foot retail component of
Brickell City Centre in Miami, Florida. We have a 25% noncontrolling interest in the retail
component of this center.
·On October 27, 2016, we and our partner opened Clarksburg Premium Outlets, a 392,000
square foot outlet center in Clarksburg, Maryland. We have a 66% noncontrolling interest in this
new center.
·On September 15, 2016, we were part of a consortium that completed the acquisition of
Aéropostale out of bankruptcy. Our noncontrolling interest in the retail operations venture is
49.05%.
·On June 24, 2016, we and our partner opened a 355,000 square foot outlet center in Columbus,
Ohio. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
·On April 14, 2016, we acquired a 50% noncontrolling interest in The Shops at Crystals, a
262,000 square foot mall in Las Vegas, Nevada.
·On February 1, 2016, through our European investee, we and our partner acquired a 75%
noncontrolling interest in an outlet center in Ochtrup, Germany.
For the purposes of the following comparisons between the years ended December 31, 2018 and
2017 and the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, the above transactions are referred to as the
property transactions. In the following discussions of our results of operations, “comparable” refers to
properties we owned and operated in both years in the year to year comparisons.
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico
sustained significant damage as a result of Hurricane Maria.  For purposes of the below comparisons,
these properties are also included in the property transactions due to the fact they were not open for
business during the entirety of the periods being compared. 
Year Ended December 31, 2018 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2017
Minimum rents increased $48.5 million during 2018, of which the comparable rents increased
$54.7 million, or 1.6%, primarily attributable to an increase in base minimum rents, offset partially by a
$6.2 million decrease related to the property transactions.  Overage rents increased $14.7 million, or
10.0%, as a result of an increase in tenant sales. 
Total other income increased $73.6 million, primarily due to a $35.6 million increase related to a
non-cash gain associated with our contribution of our interest in the Aéropostale licensing venture for
additional interests in ABG, a $21.9 million increase in income related to distributions from an
international investment, a $17.9 million increase related to business interruption insurance proceeds
received in connection with two of our Puerto Rico properties as a  result of hurricane damages, a $13.2
million increase in Simon Brand Venture and gift card revenues and a $6.5 million increase in net other
revenues, partially offset by a $21.5 million decrease related to the sale of marketable securities during
2017.
Real estate tax expense increased $17.7 million as a result of higher tax assessments in 2018.
General and administrative expense decreased $5.4 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense decreased $22.2 million primarily related to a decrease in legal fees and expenses
of $25.1 million and the write off of pre-development costs and other investments in 2017 of $11.3
million, partially offset by an unfavorable $15.2 million non-cash mark-to-market adjustment on an
investment in equity securities.
During 2017, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $128.6 million as a result of an
early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes.
60
 
Table of Contents
Income and other taxes increased $13.6 million as a result of higher tax expense due to higher
net income from improved performance on our share of results in the retail operations venture of
Aéropostale as compared to 2017, and increased withholding and income taxes related to certain of our
international investments.
Income from unconsolidated entities increased $75.0 million primarily due to the stronger
operations of the retail operations venture of Aéropostale and favorable results of operations from our
international joint venture investments and our acquisition and development activity, offset partially by
our share of an early repayment charge at one of our joint venture properties.
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $12.5 million related to property insurance recoveries of
previously depreciated assets and $276.3 million primarily related to our disposition of two retail
properties, as well as the disposal of our interest in the German department stores owned through our
investment in HBS, as further discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements. 
During 2017, we recorded a $5.0 million gain related to Klépierre’s sale of certain assets, partially offset
by the disposition of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property that resulted in a loss of $1.3
million.
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests increased $85.3 million due to an
increase in the net income of the Operating Partnership. 
Year Ended December 31, 2017 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2016
Minimum rents increased $81.5 million during 2017, of which the property transactions accounted
for $30.2 million of the increase. Comparable rents increased $51.3 million, or 1.6%, primarily
attributable to an increase in base minimum rents as well as incremental revenue from our
redevelopment and expansion activity.  Overage rent decreased $14.0 million primarily as a result of an
increase in the overage breakpoints as compared to 2016.
Tenant reimbursements increased $38.1 million, due to a $10.0 million increase attributable to the
property transactions and a $28.1 million, or 2.0%, increase in the comparable properties due to annual
fixed contractual increases related to common area maintenance and real estate tax recoveries.
Management fees and other revenues decreased $22.6 million related to final fees from
Washington Prime Group, Inc. in 2016 and lower development fees as compared to 2016.
Total other income increased $20.4 million, primarily due to a $23.0 million increase in lease
settlement income, gains on the sales of marketable securities of $21.5 million, an $8.4 million increase
in Simon Brand Venture and gift card revenues, a $3.0 million increase in dividend and net other
revenue, and a $2.7 million increase in land and other non-retail real estate sales, partially offset by a
$38.2 million pre-tax gain during 2016 on the sale of our interests in two multi-family residential
investments.
Depreciation and amortization expense increased $22.8 million primarily due to the additional
depreciable assets related to the property transactions and our continued redevelopment and expansion
activities.
Provision for credit losses increased $4.0 million as a result of an increase in tenant bankruptcies
as compared to 2016.
Home and regional office costs decreased $23.3 million as a result of expense management and
lower personnel expenses, including executive compensation.
General and administrative expenses decreased $13.1 million due to expense management and
lower personnel expenses, including executive compensation.
Other expenses increased $14.5 million primarily due to an increase in legal fees and expenses.
Interest expense decreased $48.2 million primarily due to the net impact of our financing activities
during 2017 and 2016 and the reduction in our effective overall borrowing rate.
During 2017, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $128.6 million as a result of an
early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes.  During 2016, we recorded a loss on
extinguishment of debt of $136.8 million as a result of an early redemption of senior unsecured notes.
Income and other taxes decreased $6.3 million primarily as a result of a taxable gain on the sale
of a multi-family residential investment during 2016. 
61
 
Table of Contents
Income from unconsolidated entities increased $46.9 million primarily as a result of favorable
results of operations from our international joint venture investments, our investment in Aéropostale and
our acquisition and development activity.
During 2017, we recorded a $5.0 million gain related to Klépierre’s sale of certain assets, partially
offset by the disposition of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property that resulted in a loss of
$1.3 million.  During 2016, we recorded a gain related to Klépierre’s sale of certain assets, our sale of
three consolidated retail properties and disposition of our interests in four unconsolidated retail
properties. The aggregate gain on the transactions was $43.2 million.  We also recorded a non-cash
remeasurement gain of $41.4 million related to the change in control of our interest in the European
outlet properties as further discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements. 
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Because we own long‑lived income‑producing assets, our financing strategy relies primarily on
long‑term fixed rate debt. Floating rate debt comprised only 3.5% of our total consolidated debt at
December 31, 2018. We also enter into interest rate protection agreements from time to time to manage
our interest rate risk. We derive most of our liquidity from positive net cash flow from operations and
distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities that totaled $4.2 billion in the aggregate during 2018.
The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion Credit Facility, and a $3.5 billion supplemental unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit Facility, the Credit
Facilities. The Credit Facilities and the Commercial Paper program provide alternative sources of
liquidity as our cash needs vary from time to time. Borrowing capacity under these sources may be
increased as discussed further below.
Our balance of cash and cash equivalents decreased $968.0 million during 2018 to $514.3 million
as of December 31, 2018 as further discussed in “Cash Flows” below.
On December 31, 2018, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of approximately $6.6
billion under the Credit Facilities, net of outstanding borrowings of $125.0 million, amounts outstanding
under the Commercial Paper program of $758.7 million and letters of credit of $11.3 million. For the year
ended December 31, 2018, the maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit Facilities was
$423.1 million and the weighted average outstanding balance was $238.1 million. The weighted
average interest rate was 1.80% for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Simon has historically had access to public equity markets and the Operating Partnership has
historically had access to private and public, short and long-term unsecured debt markets and access to
secured debt and private equity from institutional investors at the property level.
Our business model and Simon’s status as a REIT require us to regularly access the debt markets
to raise funds for acquisition, development and redevelopment activity, and to refinance maturing debt.
Simon may also, from time to time, access the equity capital markets to accomplish our business
objectives. We believe we have sufficient cash on hand and availability under the Credit Facilities and
the Commercial Paper program to address our debt maturities and capital needs through 2019.
Cash Flows
Our net cash flow from operating activities and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities
totaled $4.2 billion during 2018. In addition, we had net repayments from our debt financing and
repayment activities of $1.1 billion in 2018. These activities are further discussed below under
“Financing and Debt.” During 2018, we also:
·paid stockholder dividends and unitholder distributions totaling approximately $2.8 billion and
preferred unit distributions totaling $5.3 million,
·funded consolidated capital expenditures of $781.9 million (including development and other
costs of $86.8 million, redevelopment and expansion costs of $418.9 million, and tenant costs
and other operational capital expenditures of $276.2 million),
·funded investments in unconsolidated entities of $63.4 million,
·received insurance proceeds from third-party carriers for property restoration, remediation, and
business interruption from hurricane damages in Puerto Rico of $56.6 million,
·received proceeds on the sale of certain assets related to our noncontrolling interest in a joint
venture of $183.2 million, and
62
 
Table of Contents
·funded the repurchase of $354.1 million of Simon’s common stock and the redemption of $81.5 million of the Operati
Partnership’s units.
In general, we anticipate that cash generated from operations will be sufficient to meet operating
expenses, monthly debt service, recurring capital expenditures, and dividends to stockholders and/or
distributions to partners necessary to maintain Simon’s REIT qualification on a long‑term basis. In
addition, we expect to be able to generate or obtain capital for nonrecurring capital expenditures, such
as acquisitions, major building redevelopments and expansions, as well as for scheduled principal
maturities on outstanding indebtedness, from:
·excess cash generated from operating performance and working capital reserves,
·borrowings on the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program,
·additional secured or unsecured debt financing, or
·additional equity raised in the public or private markets.
We expect to generate positive cash flow from operations in 2019, and we consider these
projected cash flows in our sources and uses of cash. These cash flows are principally derived from
rents paid by our tenants. A significant deterioration in projected cash flows from operations could cause
us to increase our reliance on available funds from the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program,
curtail planned capital expenditures, or seek other additional sources of financing as discussed above.
Financing and Debt
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2018, our unsecured debt consisted of $15.6 billion of senior unsecured notes of
the Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Credit Facility, and $758.7 million
outstanding under the Commercial Paper program. 
On December 31, 2018, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.6 billion under
the Credit Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit Facilities during the
year ended December 31, 2018 was $423.1 million and the weighted average outstanding balance was
$238.1 million. Letters of credit of $11.3 million were outstanding under the Credit Facilities as of
December 31, 2018.
The Credit Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion
during its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian
dollars and Australian dollars.  Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of
the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined.  The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is June
30, 2021 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option, subject to our
continued compliance with the terms thereof.  The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus
77.5 basis points with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
On February 15, 2018, the Operating Partnership amended and extended the Supplemental
Facility. The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5
billion during its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling,
Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was
extended to June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2023 at our sole
option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the
Supplemental Facility was reduced to LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points from LIBOR plus 80 basis points,
with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program. On November 14,
2018, we amended the Commercial Paper program to increase the initial borrowing capacity of $1.0
billion to $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue
unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes
issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership
and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership.  Notes will be sold under customary terms in the U.S.
and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee
described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior
indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit Facilities and if necessary or
appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts
outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2018, we had
$758.7 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar
denominated notes with a weighted
63
 
Table of Contents
average interest rate of 2.49%.  These borrowings have a weighted average maturity date of February
20, 2019 and reduce amounts otherwise available under the Credit Facilities.
On January 3, 2018, the Operating Partnership redeemed at par $750.0 million of senior
unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 1.50%.
On July 10, 2018, the Operating Partnership repaid Yen-denominated borrowings of $201.3 million
(U.S. dollar equivalent) on the Credit Facility.    
On February 1, 2019, the Operating Partnership repaid at maturity $600.0 million of senior
unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%.
Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $6.8 billion and $6.9 billion at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, we repaid a mortgage loan of $86.6 million with an
interest rate of 7.79%.
On July 30, 2018, Noventa di Piave Designer Outlet, in which we own a 90% interest, refinanced
its €110.0 million, 1.68% variable rate mortgage loan maturing in 2020 with a €260.0 million, 2.00%
fixed rate mortgage loan that matures in 2025.
On September 25, 2018, as discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated financial
statements, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from our joint venture
partner, resulting in the consolidation of the existing fixed rate mortgage loan of $215.0 million. The loan
matures on April 1, 2024 and bears interest at 4.22%.
Covenants
Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non‑financial covenants. If
we were to fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the
debt maturity could be accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender, including
adjustments to the applicable interest rate. As of December 31, 2018, we were in compliance with all
covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2018, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 45 non‑recourse
mortgage notes secured by mortgages on 48 properties, including two separate pools of cross‑defaulted
and cross‑collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross‑default
provisions, a default under any mortgage included in the cross‑defaulted pool may constitute a default
under all mortgages within that pool and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each
property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt instruments contain financial and other
non‑financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as collateral for that debt. If the
applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with these
covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their collateral. At
December 31, 2018, the applicable borrowers under these non‑recourse mortgage notes were in
compliance with all covenants where non‑compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect
to applicable cross‑default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity
or results of operations.
Summary of Financing
Our consolidated debt, adjusted to reflect outstanding derivative instruments, and the effective
weighted average interest rates as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, consisted of the following (dollars
in thousands):
     
           Effective           Effective  
  Adjusted Balance Weighted Adjusted  Weighted 
  as of  Average  Balance as of Average  
Debt Subject to  December 31, 2018 Interest Rate(1) December 31, 2017 Interest Rate(1) 
Fixed Rate  $ 22,461,191  3.37% $ 23,443,152  3.30%  
Variable Rate   844,344  3.17%  1,189,311  2.19%  
  $ 23,305,535  3.35% $ 24,632,463  3.25%  
(1)Effective weighted average interest rate excludes the impact of net discounts and debt issuance
costs.
64
 
Table of Contents
Contractual Obligations and Off-balance Sheet Arrangements
In regards to long‑term debt arrangements, the following table summarizes the material aspects of
these future obligations on our consolidated indebtedness as of December 31, 2018, and subsequent
years thereafter (dollars in thousands) assuming the obligations remain outstanding through initial
maturities:
     2019     2020 - 2021    2022 - 2023    After 2023    Total  
Long Term Debt (1) (5)  $1,416,309  $5,119,313  $5,465,812  $11,365,890  $23,367,324  
Interest Payments (2)   766,903   1,392,182   978,601   2,734,563   5,872,249  
Consolidated Capital Expenditure
Commitments (3)   474,296    —   —   —  474,296  
Lease Commitments (4)   32,417   65,089   65,427   947,886   1,110,819  
(1)Represents principal maturities only and, therefore, excludes net discounts and debt issuance
costs.
(2)Variable rate interest payments are estimated based on the LIBOR or other applicable rate at
December 31, 2018.
(3)Represents contractual commitments for capital projects and services at December 31, 2018. Our
share of estimated 2018 development, redevelopment and expansion activity is further discussed
below under “Development Activity”.
(4)Represents only the minimum non‑cancellable lease period, excluding applicable lease extension
and renewal options, unless reasonably certain of exercise.
(5)The amount due in 2019 includes $758.7 million in Global Commercial Paper-USD and $600.0
million of senior unsecured notes repaid at maturity on February 1, 2019.
Our off‑balance sheet arrangements consist primarily of our investments in joint ventures which
are common in the real estate industry and are described in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated
financial statements. Our joint ventures typically fund their cash needs through secured debt financings
obtained by and in the name of the joint venture entity. The joint venture debt is secured by a first
mortgage, is without recourse to the joint venture partners, and does not represent a liability of the
partners, except to the extent the partners or their affiliates expressly guarantee the joint venture debt.
As of December 31, 2018, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture-related mortgage
indebtedness of $216.1 million (of which we have a right of recovery from our venture partners of
$10.8 million as of December 31, 2018). Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating Partnership are
secured by the property of the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding
obligation and which has an estimated fair value in excess of the guaranteed amount. We may elect to
fund cash needs of a joint venture through equity contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our
ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although such fundings are not required contractually
or otherwise.
Hurricane Impacts
As discussed further in Note 11 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, during the
third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico experienced property
damage and business interruption as a result of the hurricane.
Since the date of the loss, we have received $56.6 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers related to the two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $38.7 million was used for property
restoration and remediation and to reduce the insurance recovery receivable.  In 2018, we recorded
$17.9 million as business interruption proceeds in other income in the accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income.
Subsequent Event
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, we settled a lawsuit with our former insurance broker, Aon
Risk Services Central Inc., related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010.
In accordance with a previous agreement with the prior co-investor in Opry Mills, a portion of the
settlement was remitted to the co-investor.  Our share of the settlement was approximately $68.0
million, which was recorded as other income in the first quarter of 2019.
Acquisitions and Dispositions
Buy‑sell, marketing rights, and other exit mechanisms are common in real estate partnership
agreements. Most of our partners are institutional investors who have a history of direct investment in
retail real estate. We and our partners in our joint venture properties may initiate these provisions
(subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions). If we
65
 
Table of Contents
determine it is in our best interests for us to purchase the joint venture interest and we believe we have
adequate liquidity to execute the purchase without hindering our cash flows, then we may initiate these
provisions or elect to buy our partner’s interest. If we decide to sell any of our joint venture interests, we
expect to use the net proceeds to reduce outstanding indebtedness or to reinvest in development,
redevelopment, or expansion opportunities.
Acquisitions. On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at
Orange from our joint venture partner.  The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or
approximately $84.1 million, as consideration for the acquisition.  The property is subject to a $215.0
million 4.22% fixed rate mortgage loan.
On April 21, 2017, we and our partner, through our European investee acquired a 100% interest in
an outlet center in Roosendaal, Netherlands for cash consideration of $69.8 million and the assumption
of existing mortgage debt of $40.1 million. In May 2017, the assumed loan was refinanced with a $69.0
million mortgage loan due in 2024, after available extension options, with an interest rate of EURIBOR
plus 1.85%.
In February 2016, this European investee, acquired a noncontrolling 75% ownership interest in an
outlet center in Ochtrup, Germany for cash consideration of approximately $38.3 million. On July 25,
2016, this European investee also acquired the remaining 33% interest in two Italian outlet centers in
Naples and Venice as well as the remaining interests in related expansion projects and working capital
for cash consideration of approximately $159.7 million. This resulted in the consolidation of these two
properties on the acquisition date, requiring a remeasurement of our previously held equity interest to
fair value and the recognition of a non-cash gain of $29.3 million in earnings during the third quarter of
2016.
On April 14, 2016, we and our joint venture partner completed the acquisition of The Shops at
Crystals, a 262,000 square foot luxury shopping center on the Las Vegas Strip, for $1.1 billion. The
transaction was funded with a combination of cash on hand, cash from our partner, and a $550.0 million
3.74% fixed-rate mortgage loan that will mature on July 1, 2026. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest
in this joint venture and manage the day-to-day operations.
Dispositions.  We may continue to pursue the disposition of properties that no longer meet our
strategic criteria or that are not a primary retail venue within their trade area.
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which
included the foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and
$80.0 million non-recourse mortgage loans and, as discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated
financial statements, our interest in the German department store properties owned through our
investment in HBS was sold during the fourth quarter of 2018.  Also, as discussed further in Note 7 of
the notes to the consolidated financial statements, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping
centers resulting in a gain of which our share was $20.2 million.
During 2017, we disposed of our interests in one unconsolidated retail property. The loss
recognized on this transaction was approximately $1.3 million. As discussed in Note 7 of the notes to
the consolidated financial statements, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers,
resulting in a gain of which our share was $5.0 million.
During 2016, we disposed of our interests in two unconsolidated multi-family residential
investments, three consolidated retail properties, and four unconsolidated retail properties. Our share of
the gross proceeds from these transactions was $81.8 million. The gain on the consolidated retail
properties was $12.4 million. The gain on the unconsolidated retail properties was $22.6 million. The
aggregate gain of $36.2 million from the sale of the two unconsolidated multi-family residential
investments is included in other income and resulted in an additional $7.2 million in taxes included in
income and other taxes. As discussed in Note 7 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements,
Klépierre disposed of its interest in certain Scandinavian properties during the fourth quarter, resulting in
a gain of which our share was $8.1 million.
Joint Venture Formation Activity
On September 15, 2016, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of
Aéropostale, a retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy.  The interests were acquired
through two separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture.  In April 2018, we
contributed our entire interest in the licensing venture in exchange for additional interests in ABG, a
brand development, marketing, and entertainment company.  As a result, we recognized a $35.6 million
non‑cash gain representing the increase in value of our previously held interest in the licensing venture,
which is included in other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income.  At December 31, 2018, our noncontrolling equity method interests in the
operations venture of Aéropostale and in ABG were 45.0% and 5.4%, respectively.
66
 
Table of Contents
We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in a joint venture with Seritage Growth Properties, or
Seritage, which originally held an interest in ten Sears properties located in our malls. On November 3,
2017, we acquired additional interests in the real estate assets and/or rights to terminate leases related
to twelve Sears stores located at our malls (including five stores previously held in our joint venture with
Seritage), in order to redevelop these properties.  Our cost of this transaction after partner participation
was $149.1 million, which is reflected as investment property.    
Development Activity
We routinely incur costs related to construction for significant redevelopment and expansion
projects at our properties. Redevelopment and expansion projects, including the addition of anchors, big
box tenants, and restaurants are underway at several properties in the United States, Canada, Europe,
and Asia.
Our share of the costs of all new development, redevelopment and expansion projects currently
under construction is approximately $1.3 billion. We expect to fund these capital projects with cash flows
from operations. Our estimated stabilized return on invested capital typically ranges between 6-10% for
all our new development, redevelopment and expansion projects.
Summary of Capital Expenditures.  The following table summarizes total capital expenditures
on consolidated properties on a cash basis (in millions):
     2018    2017    2016 
New Developments  $87 $61 $103 
Redevelopments and Expansions   419  474  487 
Tenant Allowances   144  127  110 
Operational Capital Expenditures   132  70  98 
Total  $782 $732 $798 
 
New Domestic Developments, Redevelopments and Expansions    
On September 25, 2018, we opened Denver Premium Outlets, a 330,000 square foot center in
Thornton (Denver), Colorado. We own a 100% interest in this project. The cost of this project was
$128.6 million.
67
 
Table of Contents
International Development Activity    
We typically reinvest net cash flow from our international joint ventures to fund future international
development activity. We believe this strategy mitigates some of the risk of our initial investment and our
exposure to changes in foreign currencies. We have also funded most of our foreign investments with
local currency‑denominated borrowings that act as a natural hedge against fluctuations in exchange
rates. Our consolidated net income exposure to changes in the volatility of the Euro, Yen, Won, and
other foreign currencies is not material. We expect our share of international development costs for
2019 will be approximately $180 million, primarily funded through reinvested joint venture cash flow and
construction loans.
The following table describes recently completed and new development and expansion projects
as well as our share of the estimated total cost as of December 31, 2018 (in millions):
     
    Gross Our  Our Share of Our Share of Projected
    Leasable Ownership Projected Net Cost Projected Net Cost Opening
Property    Location    Area (sqft)   Percentage   (in Local Currency)   (in USD)  (1)   Date
New Development Projects:               
Premium Outlet Collection - Edmonton
International Airport Edmonton
(Alberta), Canada 424,000 50% CAD 108.2 $ 79.3 Opened
May - 2018
Querétaro Premium Outlets  Querétaro, Mexico 294,000 50% MXN 441.7 $ 22.5 Jul. - 2019
Málaga Designer Outlet  Málaga, Spain  191,000 46% EUR 41.4 $ 47.4 Jul. - 2019
Cannock Designer Outlet  Cannock (West
Midlands), U.K. 197,000 20% GBP 26.5 $ 33.7 May - 2020
Expansions:               
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 3  Shisui (Chiba),
Japan 68,000 40% JPY 1,541 $ 14.0 Opened
Sep. - 2018
Toronto Premium Outlets Phase 2  Toronto (Ontario),
Canada 140,000 50% CAD 66.4 $ 48.7 Opened
Nov. - 2018
Johor Premium Outlets Phase 3  Kulai, Malaysia  45,000 50% MYR 14.4 $ 3.5 Opened
Dec. - 2018
Vancouver Designer Outlet Phase 2  Richmond (British
Columbia), Canada 84,000 46% CAD 26.9 $ 19.8 Jul. - 2019
Paju Premium Outlets Phase 3  Gyeonggi Province,
South Korea 116,000 50% KRW 26,905 $ 24.2 Aug. - 2019
Ashford Designer Outlet Phase 2  Ashford, U.K  98,000 46% GBP 43.0 $ 54.8 Oct. - 2019
Noventa di Piave Designer Outlet
Phase 5 Noventa di Piave
(Venice), Italy  29,000 92% EUR 21.4 $ 24.5 Oct. - 2019
Tosu Premium Outlets Phase 4  Tosu City, Japan 38,000 40% JPY 964 $ 8.8 Nov. - 2019
Gotemba Premium Outlets Phase 4  Gotemba, Japan 178,000 40% JPY 7,476 $ 68.0 Apr. - 2020
(1)USD equivalent based upon December 31, 2018 foreign currency exchange rates.
Dividends, Distributions and Stock Repurchase Program
Simon paid a common stock dividend of $2.00 per share in the fourth quarter of 2018 and $7.90
per share for the year ended December 31, 2018. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit
for the same amounts. In 2017, Simon paid dividends of $1.85 and $7.15 per share for the three and
twelve month periods ended December 31, 2017, respectively. The Operating Partnership paid
distributions per unit for the same amounts. Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash
dividend for the first quarter of 2019 of $2.05 per share of common stock payable on February 28, 2019
to stockholders of record on February 14, 2019. The distribution rate on units is equal to the dividend
rate on common stock. In order to maintain its status as a REIT, Simon must pay a minimum amount of
dividends. Simon’s future dividends and the Operating Partnership’s future distributions will be
determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial
condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner
distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing
covenants, if any, and the amount required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
On April 2, 2015, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized Simon to repurchase up to $2.0 billion of
common stock over a twenty-four month period as market conditions warrant, and on February 13,
2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the program through March 31,
2019.  Simon may repurchase the shares in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions as
market conditions warrant. During the year ended December 31, 2018, Simon repurchased 2,275,194
shares at an average price of $155.64 per share of its common stock as part of this program. 
68
 
Table of Contents
During the year ended December 31, 2017, Simon repurchased 2,468,630 shares at an average price
of $164.87 per share as part of this program.  At December 31, 2018, we had remaining authority to
repurchase approximately $640.6 million of common stock.  As Simon repurchases shares under this
program, the Operating Partnership repurchases an equal number of units from Simon. 
On February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase
plan.  Under the new program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during
the two-year period ending February 11, 2021.
Forward‑Looking Statements
Certain statements made in this section or elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K may be
deemed "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act
of 1995. Although we believe the expectations reflected in any forward-looking statements are based on
reasonable assumptions, we can give no assurance that our expectations will be attained, and it is
possible that our actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these forward-looking
statements due to a variety of risks, uncertainties and other factors. Such factors include, but are not
limited to: changes in economic and market conditions that may adversely affect the general retail
environment; the potential loss of anchor stores or major tenants; the inability to collect rent due to the
bankruptcy or insolvency of tenants or otherwise; decreases in market rental rates; the intensely
competitive market environment in the retail industry; the inability to lease newly developed properties
and renew leases and relet space at existing properties on favorable terms; risks related to international
activities, including, without limitation, the impact, if any, of the United Kingdom’s exit from the European
Union; changes to applicable laws or regulations or the interpretation thereof; risks associated with the
acquisition, development, redevelopment, expansion, leasing and management of properties; general
risks related to real estate investments, including the illiquidity of real estate investments; the impact of
our substantial indebtedness on our future operations; any disruption in the financial markets that may
adversely affect our ability to access capital for growth and satisfy our ongoing debt service
requirements; any change in our credit rating; changes in market rates of interest and foreign exchange
rates for foreign currencies; changes in the value of our investments in foreign entities; our ability to
hedge interest rate and currency risk; our continued ability to maintain our status as a REIT; changes in
tax laws or regulations that result in adverse tax consequences; risks relating to our joint venture
properties; environmental liabilities; changes in insurance costs, the availability of comprehensive
insurance coverage; security breaches that could compromise our information technology or
infrastructure; natural disasters; the potential for terrorist activities; and the loss of key management
personnel. We discussed these and other risks and uncertainties under the heading "Risk Factors" in
Part I, Item1A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. We may update that discussion in subsequent other
periodic reports, but, except as required by law, we undertake no duty or obligation to update or revise
these forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future developments, or
otherwise.
Non‑GAAP Financial Measures
Industry practice is to evaluate real estate properties in part based on performance measures
such as FFO, diluted FFO per share, NOI, portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI. We believe that
these non‑GAAP measures are helpful to investors because they are widely recognized measures of
the performance of REITs and provide a relevant basis for comparison among REITs. We also use these
measures internally to measure the operating performance of our portfolio.
We determine FFO based on the definition set forth by the National Association of Real Estate
Investment Trusts, or NAREIT, as consolidated net income computed in accordance with GAAP:
·excluding real estate related depreciation and amortization,
·excluding gains and losses from extraordinary items and cumulative effects of accounting
changes,
·excluding gains and losses from the sale, disposal or property insurance recoveries of
previously depreciated retail operating properties,
·excluding impairment charges of depreciable real estate,
·plus the allocable portion of FFO of unconsolidated entities accounted for under the equity
method of accounting based upon economic ownership interest, and
·all determined on a consistent basis in accordance with GAAP.
69
 
Table of Contents
We have adopted NAREIT’s clarification of the definition of FFO that requires us to include the
effects of nonrecurring items not classified as extraordinary, cumulative effect of accounting changes, or
a gain or loss resulting from the sale, disposal or property insurance recoveries of, or any impairment
related to, previously depreciated retail operating properties.
We include in FFO gains and losses realized from the sale of land, outlot buildings, equity
instruments, and investment holdings of non‑retail real estate. We also include in FFO the impact of
foreign currency exchange gains and losses, legal expenses, transaction expenses and other items
required by GAAP.
You should understand that our computations of these non‑GAAP measures might not be
comparable to similar measures reported by other REITs and that these non‑GAAP measures:
·do not represent cash flow from operations as defined by GAAP,
·should not be considered as alternatives to consolidated net income determined in accordance
with GAAP as a measure of operating performance, and
·are not alternatives to cash flows as a measure of liquidity.
70
 
Table of Contents
The following schedule reconciles total FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, diluted
net income per share to diluted FFO per share.
    
     2018  2017  2016  
  (in thousands)  
Funds from Operations (A)  $4,324,601 $4,020,505 $3,792,951 
Change in FFO from prior period   7.6%   6.0%   6.2%
Consolidated Net Income  $2,822,343 $2,244,903 $2,134,706 
Adjustments to Arrive at FFO:           
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties   1,270,888  1,260,865  1,236,476 
Our share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated entities,
including Klépierre and HBS   533,595  540,718  527,976 
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery
on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net (B)  (282,211)  (3,647)  (80,154) 
Unrealized change in fair value of equity instruments   15,212   —   — 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest holders in properties   (11,327)  (13)  (7,218) 
Noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization   (18,647)  (17,069)  (13,583) 
Preferred distributions and dividends   (5,252)  (5,252)  (5,252) 
FFO of the Operating Partnership (A)  $4,324,601 $4,020,505 $3,792,951 
FFO allocable to limited partners   568,817  529,595  512,361 
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders (A)  $3,755,784 $3,490,910 $3,280,590 
Diluted net income per share to diluted FFO per share reconciliation:           
Diluted net income per share  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties and our share of
depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated entities, including Klépierre
and HBS, net of noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and
amortization   5.01  4.98  4.84 
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery
on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net (B)  (0.79)  (0.01)  (0.22) 
Unrealized change in fair value of equity instruments   0.04   —   — 
Diluted FFO per share (A)  $ 12.13 $ 11.21 $ 10.49 
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   309,627  311,517  312,691 
Weighted average limited partnership units outstanding   46,893  47,260  48,836 
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares and units outstanding   356,520  358,777  361,527 
(A)Includes FFO of the Operating Partnership related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $128.6
million and $136.8 million for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Includes
Diluted FFO per share/unit related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $0.36 and $0.38 for the
years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Includes Diluted FFO allocable to common
stockholders related to a  loss on extinguishment of debt of $111.7 million and $118.3 million for the
years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
(B)Includes gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net of $288.8 million and $84.6 million for
the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2016, respectively. Noncontrolling interest portion of the
gain was $6.6 million, or $0.02 per diluted share/unit, and $4.4 million, or $0.01 per diluted
share/unit, for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2016, respectively.
71
 
Table of Contents
The following schedule reconciles consolidated net income to NOI and sets forth the computations
of portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI.
  For the Year  
  Ended December 31,  
  2018     2017  
  (in thousands)  
Reconciliation of NOI of consolidated entities:           
Consolidated Net Income  $2,822,343 $2,244,903 
Income and other taxes   36,898  23,343 
Interest expense   815,923  809,393 
Income from unconsolidated entities   (475,250)  (400,270) 
Loss on extinguishment of debt    —  128,618 
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   (288,827)  (3,647) 
Operating Income Before Other Items   2,911,087  2,802,340 
Depreciation and amortization   1,282,454  1,275,452 
Home and regional office costs   136,677  135,150 
General and administrative   46,543  51,972 
NOI of consolidated entities  $4,376,761 $4,264,914 
Reconciliation of NOI of unconsolidated entities:        
Net Income  $ 876,412 $ 839,226 
Interest expense   663,693  593,062 
(Gain) loss on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities, net   (33,367)  2,239 
Operating Income Before Other Items   1,506,738  1,434,527 
Depreciation and amortization   652,968  640,286 
NOI of unconsolidated entities  $2,159,706 $2,074,813 
Add: Our share of NOI from Klépierre, HBS, and other corporate investments   316,155  279,028 
Combined NOI  $6,852,622 $6,618,755 
Less: Corporate and Other NOI Sources (1)   389,092  386,895 
Portfolio NOI  $6,463,530 $6,231,860 
Portfolio NOI Growth   3.7%     
Less: Our share of NOI from Klépierre, HBS, and other corporate investments   316,155  279,028 
Less: International Properties (2)   506,205  427,184 
Less: NOI from New Development, Redevelopment, Expansion and Acquisitions (3)   72,212  79,283 
Comparable Property NOI (4)  $5,568,958 $5,446,365 
Comparable Property NOI Growth   2.3%     
(1)Includes income components excluded from portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI (domestic
lease termination income, interest income, land sale gains, straight line rent, above/below market
lease adjustments), gains on sale of equity instruments, unrealized gains and losses on equity
instruments, Simon management company revenues, and other assets.
(2)Includes International Premium Outlets (except for Canadian International Premium Outlets included
in comparable property NOI), International Designer Outlets and distributions from other
international investments.
(3)Includes total property NOI for properties undergoing redevelopment as well as incremental NOI for
expansion properties not yet included in comparable properties.
(4)Includes Malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills and Lifestyle Centers opened and operating as
comparable for the period.
72
 
Table of Contents
Item 7A.  Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long‑term
debt obligations. We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management
strategy by a combination of interest rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of
variable rate debt. We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of certain foreign
operations. Our intent is to offset gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposures, with gains
and losses on the derivative contracts hedging these exposures. We do not enter into either interest rate
protection or foreign currency rate protection agreements for speculative purposes.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of anticipated issuances of senior notes.
Upon completion of the debt issuance, the cost of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt
agreement.
Our future earnings, cash flows and fair values relating to financial instruments are dependent
upon prevalent market rates of interest, primarily LIBOR. Based upon consolidated indebtedness and
interest rates at December 31, 2018, a 50 basis point increase in the market rates of interest would
decrease future earnings and cash flows by approximately $4.3 million, and would decrease the fair
value of debt by approximately $620.7 million.
73
 
Table of Contents
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework issued by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the
COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon Property Group, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on the
COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and
the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a), and our report dated
February 22, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included
in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based
on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require
that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal
control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting,
assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating
effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as
we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis
for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal
control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or
detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject
to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 /s/ Ernst & Young LLP
  
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 22, 2019  
74
 
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, Inc.
(the Company) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of operations
and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2018, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item
15(a) (collectively referred to as the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated
financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our
report dated February 22, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect
to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards
require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial
statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included
performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether
due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements.
Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that
our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
 /s/ Ernst & Young LLP
  
We have served as the Company’s auditor since
2002.  
  
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 22, 2019  
 
75
 
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, L.P.’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the
COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon Property Group, L.P. (the Partnership) maintained, in all material
respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on the
COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Partnership as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and
the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a), and our report dated
February 22, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Partnership’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over
financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting
included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting based
on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require
that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal
control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting,
assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating
effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as
we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis
for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal
control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or
detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject
to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
 /s/ Ernst & Young LLP
  
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 22, 2019  
 
76
 
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, L.P.
(the Partnership) as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of operations
and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2018 and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item
15(a) (collectively referred to as the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated
financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Partnership at
December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as
of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our
report dated February 22, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Partnership’s management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Partnership’s financial statements based on our audits. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect
to the Partnership in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards
require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial
statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included
performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether
due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements.
Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that
our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
 /s/ Ernst & Young LLP
  
We have served as the Partnership’s auditor since
2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 22, 2019  
 
 
77
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except share amounts)
     
     December 31,     December 31,  
  2018  2017  
ASSETS:        
Investment properties, at cost  $37,092,670 $36,393,464 
Less - accumulated depreciation   12,884,539  11,935,949 
   24,208,131  24,457,515 
Cash and cash equivalents   514,335  1,482,309 
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net   763,815  742,672 
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity   2,220,414  2,266,483 
Investment in Klépierre, at equity   1,769,488  1,934,676 
Deferred costs and other assets   1,210,040  1,373,983 
Total assets  $30,686,223 $32,257,638 
LIABILITIES:        
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness  $23,305,535 $24,632,463 
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues   1,316,861  1,269,190 
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity   1,536,111  1,406,378 
Other liabilities   500,597  520,363 
Total liabilities   26,659,104  27,828,394 
Commitments and contingencies        
Limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties   230,163  190,480 
EQUITY:        
Stockholders’ Equity        
Capital stock (850,000,000 total shares authorized, $0.0001 par value, 238,000,000
shares of excess common stock, 100,000,000 authorized shares of preferred stock):       
Series J 8% cumulative redeemable preferred stock, 1,000,000 shares authorized,
796,948 issued and outstanding with a liquidation value of $39,847   42,748  43,077 
Common stock, $0.0001 par value, 511,990,000 shares authorized, 320,411,571 and
320,322,774 issued and outstanding, respectively   32  32 
Class B common stock, $0.0001 par value, 10,000 shares authorized, 8,000 issued and
outstanding    —   — 
Capital in excess of par value   9,700,418  9,614,748 
Accumulated deficit   (4,893,069)  (4,782,173) 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss   (126,017)  (110,453) 
Common stock held in treasury, at cost, 11,402,103 and 9,163,920 shares, respectively  (1,427,431)  (1,079,063) 
Total stockholders’ equity   3,296,681  3,686,168 
Noncontrolling interests   500,275  552,596 
Total equity   3,796,956  4,238,764 
Total liabilities and equity  $30,686,223 $32,257,638 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
78
 3/8
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per share amounts)
  For the Year  
  Ended December 31,  
  2018     2017     2016  
REVENUE:           
Minimum rent  $3,488,522 $3,440,009 $3,358,498 
Overage rent   162,189  147,471  161,508 
Tenant reimbursements   1,520,340  1,532,923  1,494,804 
Management fees and other revenues   116,286  121,259  143,875 
Other income   370,582  296,978  276,544 
Total revenue   5,657,919  5,538,640  5,435,229 
EXPENSES:           
Property operating   450,636  443,177  432,394 
Depreciation and amortization   1,282,454  1,275,452  1,252,673 
Real estate taxes   457,740  440,003  439,030 
Repairs and maintenance   99,588  96,900  99,723 
Advertising and promotion   151,241  150,865  142,801 
Provision for credit losses   12,631  11,304  7,319 
Home and regional office costs   136,677  135,150  158,406 
General and administrative   46,543  51,972  65,082 
Other   109,322  131,477  116,973 
Total operating expenses   2,746,832  2,736,300  2,714,401 
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS   2,911,087  2,802,340  2,720,828 
Interest expense   (815,923)  (809,393)  (857,554) 
Loss on extinguishment of debt    —  (128,618)  (136,777) 
Income and other taxes   (36,898)  (23,343)  (29,678) 
Income from unconsolidated entities   475,250  400,270  353,334 
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   288,827  3,647  84,553 
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME   2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests   382,285  296,941  295,810 
Preferred dividends   3,337  3,337  3,337 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS  $2,436,721 $1,944,625 $1,835,559 
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE:           
Net income attributable to common stockholders  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 
           
Consolidated Net Income  $2,822,343 $2,244,903 $2,134,706 
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative hedge agreements   21,633  (35,112)  39,472 
Net loss (gain) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings   7,020  (12,122)  149,622 
Currency translation adjustments   (47,038)  45,766  (28,646) 
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other   373  5,733  3,192 
Comprehensive income   2,804,331  2,249,168  2,298,346 
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests   379,837  297,534  320,890 
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders  $2,424,494 $1,951,634 $1,977,456 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
79
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year
Ended December 31, 
2018 2017 2016
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:
Consolidated Net Income $2,822,343 $2,244,903 $ 2,134,706
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided by
operating activities
Depreciation and amortization 1,349,776 1,357,351 1,327,946
Loss on debt extinguishment  — 128,618 136,777
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or
recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net (288,827) (3,647) (84,553)
Pre-development project cost charge  —  — 31,490
Gains on sales of marketable securities  — (21,541)  —
Unrealized change in fair value of equity instruments 15,212  —  —
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 7) (35,621)  —  —
Straight-line rent (18,325) (26,543) (46,656)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities (475,250) (400,270) (353,334)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities 390,137 374,101 331,627
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net (17,518) (26,170) 16,277
Deferred costs and other assets (75,438) (132,945) (43,797)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred revenues
and other liabilities 84,307 99,931 (77,789)
Net cash provided by operating activities 3,750,796 3,593,788 3,372,694
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions (51,060) (264,488) (499,976)
Funding of loans to related parties (4,641) (71,532)  —
Repayments of loans to related parties  —  — 8,207
Capital expenditures, net (781,909) (732,100) (798,465)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties 11,276 7,536 59,994
Net proceeds from sale of assets 183,241 19,944 36,558
Investments in unconsolidated entities (63,397) (157,173) (312,160)
Purchase of marketable and non-marketable securities (21,563) (25,000) (38,809)
Proceeds from sales of marketable and non-marketable securities 25,000 56,268 42,600
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 19,083  —  —
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other 447,464 405,078 533,025
Net cash used in investing activities (236,506) (761,467) (969,026)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Proceeds from sales of common stock and other, net of transaction
costs (329) (328) (328)
Purchase of shares related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings (2,911) (2,789) (4,299)
Redemption of limited partner units (81,506)  —  —
Purchase of treasury stock (354,108) (407,002) (255,267)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties (76,963) (11,295) (9,731)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties 161 382 1,507
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership (1,915) (1,915) (1,915)
Distributions to stockholders and preferred dividends (2,449,071) (2,231,259) (2,037,542)
Distributions to limited partners (370,656) (338,602) (316,428)
Loss on debt extinguishment  — (128,618) (136,777)
Proceeds from issuance of debt, net of transaction costs 7,973,719 11,668,026 14,866,205
Repayments of debt (9,118,685) (10,456,671) (14,650,168)
Net cash used in financing activities (4,482,264) (1,910,071) (2,544,743)
(DECREASE)/INCREASE IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS (967,974) 922,250 (141,075)
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period 1,482,309 560,059 701,134
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 514,335 $1,482,309 $ 560,059
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
80
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
           Accumulated Other                 
        Comprehensive  Capital in     Common Stock        
  Preferred  Common  Income  Excess of Par  Accumulated  Held in  Noncontrolling  Total  
  Stock  Stock  (Loss)  Value  Deficit  Treasury  Interests  Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2015  $43,733  $ 31 $ (252,686)  $ 9,384,450  $(4,266,930)  $ (437,134)  $ 744,905  $5,216,369  
Exchange of limited partner units (5,020,919
common shares, Note 10)       1     73,755         (73,756)    — 
Series J preferred stock premium amortization   (328)                     (328)  
Stock incentive program (63,324 common shares,
net)            (14,139)      14,139       — 
Amortization of stock incentive            12,024            12,024  
Treasury stock purchase (1,409,197 shares)                  (255,267)      (255,267)  
Long-term incentive performance units                     48,324   48,324  
Issuance of unit equivalents and other , net (21,041
common shares repurchased)               6,189   (4,300)   1,506   3,395  
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership            66,996         (66,996)    — 
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests               (2,037,542)      (316,428)   (2,353,970)  
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners                     (2,765)   (2,765)  
Other comprehensive income         138,560            25,080   163,640  
Net income, excluding $1,915 attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating Partnership
and $4,301 attributable to noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties               1,838,896      289,594   2,128,490  
Balance at December 31, 2016  $43,405  $ 32 $ (114,126)  $ 9,523,086  $(4,459,387)  $ (682,562)  $ 649,464  $4,959,912  
Exchange of limited partner units (500,411
common shares, Note 10)            6,005         (6,005)    — 
Series J preferred stock premium amortization   (328)                     (328)  
Stock incentive program (76,660 common shares,
net)            (13,289)      13,289       — 
Amortization of stock incentive            13,911            13,911  
Treasury stock purchase (2,468,630 shares)                  (407,002)      (407,002)  
Long-term incentive performance units                     38,305   38,305  
Issuance of unit equivalents and other , net (16,161
common shares repurchased)            241  (39,489)   (2,788)   383  (41,653)  
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership            84,794         (84,794)    — 
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests               (2,231,259)      (338,602)   (2,569,861)  
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners                     (3,851)   (3,851)  
Other comprehensive income         3,673            592  4,265  
Net income, excluding $1,915 attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating Partnership
and a $2,078 loss attributable to noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties               1,947,962      297,104   2,245,066  
Balance at December 31, 2017  $43,077  $ 32 $ (110,453)  $ 9,614,748  $(4,782,173)  $(1,079,063)  $ 552,596  $4,238,764  
Exchange of limited partner units (92,732 common
shares, Note 10)            1,004         (1,004)    — 
Issuance of limited partner units (475,183 units)                     84,103   84,103  
Series J preferred stock premium amortization   (329)                     (329)  
Stock incentive program (51,756 common shares,
net)            (8,651)      8,651       — 
Redemption of limited partner units (454,704 units)            (76,555)         (4,951)   (81,506)  
Amortization of stock incentive            12,029            12,029  
Treasury stock purchase (2,275,194 shares)                  (354,108)      (354,108)  
Long-term incentive performance units                     26,172   26,172  
Cumulative ef fect of accounting change               7,264         7,264  
Issuance of unit equivalents and other (18,680
common shares repurchased)            1,602   (109,147)   (2,911)   (2,510)   (112,966)  
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership            156,241         (156,241)    — 
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests               (2,449,071)      (370,656)   (2,819,727)  
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners                     (1,741)   (1,741)  
Other comprehensive income         (15,564)            (2,447)   (18,011)  
Net income, excluding $1,915 attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating Partnership
and $3,416 attributable to noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties               2,440,058      376,954   2,817,012  
Balance at December 31, 2018  $42,748  $ 32 $ (126,017)  $ 9,700,418  $(4,893,069)  $(1,427,431)  $ 500,275  $3,796,956  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
81
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except unit amounts)
      
     December 31,     December 31,  
  2018  2017  
ASSETS:        
Investment properties, at cost  $37,092,670 $36,393,464 
Less — accumulated depreciation   12,884,539  11,935,949 
   24,208,131  24,457,515 
Cash and cash equivalents   514,335  1,482,309 
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net   763,815  742,672 
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity   2,220,414  2,266,483 
Investment in Klépierre, at equity   1,769,488  1,934,676 
Deferred costs and other assets   1,210,040  1,373,983 
Total assets  $30,686,223 $32,257,638 
LIABILITIES:        
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness  $23,305,535 $24,632,463 
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues   1,316,861  1,269,190 
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity   1,536,111  1,406,378 
Other liabilities   500,597  520,363 
Total liabilities   26,659,104  27,828,394 
Commitments and contingencies        
Preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests
in properties   230,163  190,480 
EQUITY:        
Partners’ Equity        
Preferred units, 796,948 units outstanding. Liquidation value of $39,847   42,748  43,077 
General Partner, 309,017,468 and 311,166,854 units outstanding, respectively   3,253,933  3,643,091 
Limited Partners, 46,807,372 and 46,879,625 units outstanding, respectively   492,877  548,858 
Total partners’ equity   3,789,558  4,235,026 
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net   7,398  3,738 
Total equity   3,796,956  4,238,764 
Total liabilities and equity  $30,686,223 $32,257,638 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
82
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per unit amounts)
  For the Year  
  Ended December 31,  
  2018  2017  2016  
REVENUE:               
Minimum rent  $3,488,522 $3,440,009 $3,358,498 
Overage rent   162,189  147,471  161,508 
Tenant reimbursements   1,520,340  1,532,923  1,494,804 
Management fees and other revenues   116,286  121,259  143,875 
Other income   370,582  296,978  276,544 
Total revenue   5,657,919  5,538,640  5,435,229 
EXPENSES:           
Property operating   450,636  443,177  432,394 
Depreciation and amortization   1,282,454  1,275,452  1,252,673 
Real estate taxes   457,740  440,003  439,030 
Repairs and maintenance   99,588  96,900  99,723 
Advertising and promotion   151,241  150,865  142,801 
Provision for credit losses   12,631  11,304  7,319 
Home and regional office costs   136,677  135,150  158,406 
General and administrative   46,543  51,972  65,082 
Other   109,322  131,477  116,973 
Total operating expenses   2,746,832  2,736,300  2,714,401 
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS   2,911,087  2,802,340  2,720,828 
Interest expense   (815,923)  (809,393)  (857,554) 
Loss on extinguishment of debt    —  (128,618)  (136,777) 
Income and other taxes   (36,898)  (23,343)  (29,678) 
Income from unconsolidated entities   475,250  400,270  353,334 
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on,
assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   288,827  3,647  84,553 
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME   2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests   11,327  13  7,218 
Preferred unit requirements   5,252  5,252  5,252 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS  $2,805,764 $2,239,638 $2,122,236 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS ATTRIBUTABLE TO:           
General Partner  $2,436,721 $1,944,625 $1,835,559 
Limited Partners   369,043  295,013  286,677 
Net income attributable to unitholders  $2,805,764 $2,239,638 $2,122,236 
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER UNIT:           
Net income attributable to unitholders  $ 7.87 $ 6.24 $ 5.87 
           
Consolidated net income  $2,822,343 $2,244,903 $2,134,706 
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative hedge agreements   21,633  (35,112)  39,472 
Net loss (gain) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings   7,020  (12,122)  149,622 
Currency translation adjustments   (47,038)  45,766  (28,646) 
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other   373  5,733  3,192 
Comprehensive income   2,804,331  2,249,168  2,298,346 
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests   7,911  2,091  2,917 
Comprehensive income attributable to unitholders  $2,796,420 $2,247,077 $2,295,429 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
83
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year
Ended December 31, 
2018 2017 2016
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:
Consolidated Net Income $2,822,343$2,244,903$2,134,706
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided by
operating activities
Depreciation and amortization 1,349,776 1,357,351 1,327,946
Loss on debt extinguishment  — 128,618 136,777
Gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or
recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net (288,827) (3,647) (84,553)
Pre-development project cost charge  —  — 31,490
Gains on sales of marketable securities  — (21,541)  —
Unrealized change in fair value of equity instruments 15,212  —  —
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 7) (35,621)  —  —
Straight-line rent (18,325) (26,543) (46,656)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities (475,250) (400,270) (353,334)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities 390,137 374,101 331,627
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net (17,518) (26,170) 16,277
Deferred costs and other assets (75,438) (132,945) (43,797)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred revenues
and other liabilities 84,307 99,931 (77,789)
Net cash provided by operating activities 3,750,796 3,593,788 3,372,694
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions (51,060) (264,488) (499,976)
Funding of loans to related parties (4,641) (71,532)  —
Repayments of loans to related parties  —  — 8,207
Capital expenditures, net (781,909) (732,100) (798,465)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties 11,276 7,536 59,994
Net proceeds from sale of assets 183,241 19,944 36,558
Investments in unconsolidated entities (63,397) (157,173) (312,160)
Purchase of marketable and non-marketable securities (21,563) (25,000) (38,809)
Proceeds from sales of marketable and non-marketable securities 25,000 56,268 42,600
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 19,083  —  —
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other 447,464 405,078 533,025
Net cash used in investing activities (236,506) (761,467) (969,026)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Issuance of units and other (329) (328) (328)
Purchase of units related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings (2,911) (2,789) (4,299)
Redemption of limited partner units (81,506)  —  —
Purchase of general partner units (354,108) (407,002) (255,267)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties (76,963) (11,295) (9,731)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties 161 382 1,507
Partnership distributions (2,821,642) (2,571,776) (2,355,885)
Loss on debt extinguishment  — (128,618) (136,777)
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness proceeds, net of transaction
costs 7,973,719 11,668,026 14,866,205
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness principal payments (9,118,685) (10,456,671) (14,650,168)
Net cash used in financing activities (4,482,264) (1,910,071) (2,544,743)
(DECREASE)/INCREASE IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS (967,974) 922,250 (141,075)
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period 1,482,309 560,059 701,134
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 514,335$1,482,309$ 560,059
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
84
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
  Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
     Units     General Partner)    Partners     Interests     Equity 
Balance at December 31, 2015  $43,733 $ 4,427,731 $741,449 $ 3,456 $5,216,369 
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization   (328)           (328) 
Limited partner units exchanged to common units (5,020,919
units)      73,756  (73,756)      — 
Stock incentive program (63,324 common shares, net)       —         — 
Amortization of stock incentive      12,024        12,024 
Treasury unit purchase (1,409,197 units)      (255,267)        (255,267) 
Long-term incentive performance units         48,324     48,324 
Issuance of unit equivalents and other (482,779 units and 21,041
common units)      1,889  (2)  1,508  3,395 
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership
in the Operating Partnership      66,996  (66,996)      — 
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests
classified as temporary equity   (3,337)  (2,034,205)  (316,428)  (2,765)  (2,356,735) 
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity
preferred units of $1,915 and $4,301 attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties   3,337  1,835,559  286,677  2,917  2,128,490 
Other comprehensive income      138,560  25,080     163,640 
Balance at December 31, 2016  $43,405 $ 4,267,043 $644,348 $ 5,116 $4,959,912 
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization   (328)           (328) 
Limited partner units exchanged to common units (500,411 units)     6,005  (6,005)      — 
Stock incentive program (76,660 common shares, net)       —         — 
Amortization of stock incentive      13,911        13,911 
Treasury unit purchase (2,468,630 units)      (407,002)        (407,002) 
Long-term incentive performance units         38,305     38,305 
Issuance of unit equivalents and other (103,941 units and 16,161
common units)      (42,036)   1  382  (41,653) 
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership
in the Operating Partnership      84,794  (84,794)      — 
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests
classified as temporary equity   (3,337)  (2,227,922)  (338,602)  (3,851)  (2,573,712) 
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity
preferred units of $1,915 and a $2,078 loss attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties   3,337  1,944,625  295,013  2,091  2,245,066 
Other comprehensive income      3,673  592     4,265 
Balance at December 31, 2017  $43,077 $ 3,643,091 $548,858 $ 3,738 $4,238,764 
Issuance of limited partner units (475,183 units)         84,103     84,103 
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization   (329)           (329) 
Limited partner units exchanged to common units (92,732 units)     1,004  (1,004)      — 
Stock incentive program (51,756 common units, net)       —         — 
Amortization of stock incentive      12,029        12,029 
Redemption of limited partner units (454,704 units)      (76,555)  (4,951)     (81,506) 
Treasury unit purchase (2,275,194 units)      (354,108)        (354,108) 
Long-term incentive performance units         26,172     26,172 
Cumulative effect of accounting change      7,264        7,264 
Issuance of unit equivalents and other (18,680 common units)     (110,456)     (2,510)  (112,966) 
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership
in the Operating Partnership      156,241  (156,241)      — 
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests
classified as temporary equity   (3,337)  (2,445,734)  (370,656)  (1,741)  (2,821,468) 
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity
preferred units of $1,915 and $3,416 attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties   3,337  2,436,721  369,043  7,911  2,817,012 
Other comprehensive income      (15,564)  (2,447)     (18,011) 
Balance at December 31, 2018  $42,748 $ 3,253,933 $492,877 $ 7,398 $3,796,956 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
 
 
85
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1. Organization
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and
self-managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate
income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon
Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires,
references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating Partnership"
mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the
Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the
Operating Partnership. Unless otherwise indicated, these notes to consolidated financial statements
apply to both Simon and the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's
partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use
destinations, which consist primarily ofmalls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®.  As of December 31,
2018, we owned or held an interest in 206 income‑producing properties in the United States, which
consisted of 107 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 12 other retail properties
in 37 states and Puerto Rico. Internationally, as of December 31, 2018, we had ownership interests in
nine Premium Outlets in Japan, four Premium Outlets in South Korea, three Premium Outlets in
Canada, two Premium Outlets in Malaysia and one Premium Outlet in Mexico. We also own an interest
in eight Designer Outlet properties in Europe and one Designer Outlet property in Canada. Of the eight
properties in Europe, two are located in Italy, two are located in the Netherlands and one each is located
in Austria, Germany, France and the United Kingdom. As of December 31, 2018, we also owned a
21.3% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris‑based real estate company
which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 16 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our revenues from leases with retail, dining, entertainment and other
tenants, including:
·base minimum rents,
·overage and percentage rents based on tenants’ sales volume, and
·recoverable expenditures such as property operating, real estate taxes, repair and maintenance,
and advertising and promotional expenditures.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of
management fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
·establishing our properties as leading market resource providers for retailers and other
businesses and consumer‑focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as
handling fees relating to the sales of bank‑issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances,
static and digital media initiatives, business development, sponsorship, and events,
·offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and
facility services, and the provision of energy services,
·selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or
“outparcels,” and
·generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to
related entities.
86
  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
2. Basis of Presentation and Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of all controlled
subsidiaries, and all significant intercompany amounts have been eliminated.
We consolidate properties that are wholly-owned or properties where we own less than 100% but
we control. Control of a property is demonstrated by, among other factors, our ability to refinance debt
and sell the property without the consent of any other partner or owner and the inability of any other
partner or owner to replace us.
We also consolidate a variable interest entity, or VIE, when we are determined to be the primary
beneficiary. Determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE is based on whether an entity has (1) the
power to direct activities that most significantly impact the economic performance of the VIE and (2) the
obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of the VIE that could potentially be significant
to the VIE. Our determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE considers all relationships between us
and the VIE, including management agreements and other contractual arrangements. There have been
no changes during 2018 in previous conclusions about whether an entity qualifies as a VIE or whether
we are the primary beneficiary of any previously identified VIE. During the periods presented, we did not
provide financial or other support to any identified VIE that we were not contractually obligated to
provide.
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures represent our noncontrolling ownership interests in
properties. We account for these unconsolidated entities using the equity method of accounting. We
initially record these investments at cost and we subsequently adjust for net equity in income or loss,
which we allocate in accordance with the provisions of the applicable partnership or joint venture
agreement, cash contributions and distributions, and foreign currency fluctuations, if applicable. The
allocation provisions in the partnership or joint venture agreements are not always consistent with the
legal ownership interests held by each general or limited partner or joint venture investee primarily due
to partner preferences. We separately report investments in joint ventures for which accumulated
distributions have exceeded investments in and our share of net income of the joint ventures within cash
distributions and losses in partnerships and joint ventures, at equity in the consolidated balance sheets.
The net equity of certain joint ventures is less than zero because of financing or operating distributions
that are usually greater than net income, as net income includes non‑cash charges for depreciation and
amortization.
As of December 31, 2018, we consolidated 135 wholly‑owned properties and 18 additional
properties that are less than wholly‑owned, but which we control or for which we are the primary
beneficiary. We account for the remaining 81 properties, or the joint venture properties, as well as our
investment in Klépierre, Aéropostale, Authentic Brands Group LLC, or ABG, and HBS Global Properties,
or HBS, using the equity method of accounting, as we have determined we have significant influence
over their operations. We manage the day‑to‑day operations of 57 of the 81 joint venture properties, but
have determined that our partner or partners have substantive participating rights with respect to the
assets and operations of these joint venture properties. Our investments in joint ventures in Japan,
South Korea, Mexico, Malaysia, Germany, Canada, and the United Kingdom comprise 20 of the
remaining 24 properties. These international properties are managed by joint ventures in which we
share control.
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership are accrued at declaration and represent
distributions on outstanding preferred units of partnership interests, or preferred units, and are included
in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests.  We allocate net operating results of the Operating
Partnership after preferred distributions to limited partners and to us based on the partners’ respective
weighted average ownership interests in the Operating Partnership. Net operating results of the
Operating Partnership attributable to limited partners are reflected in net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests.
Our weighted average ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was as follows:
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
     2018    2017    2016 
Weighted average ownership interest  86.8 %  86.8 %  86.5 %  
 
87
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, our ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was
86.8% and 86.9%, respectively. We adjust the noncontrolling limited partners’ interest at the end of each
period to reflect their interest in the net assets of the Operating Partnership.
Preferred unit requirements in the Operating Partnership’s accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income represent distributions on outstanding preferred
units and are recorded when declared.    
3. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Investment Properties
We record investment properties at cost. Investment properties include costs of acquisitions;
development, predevelopment, and construction (including allocable salaries and related benefits);
tenant allowances and improvements; and interest and real estate taxes incurred during construction.
We capitalize improvements and replacements from repair and maintenance when the repair and
maintenance extends the useful life, increases capacity, or improves the efficiency of the asset. All other
repair and maintenance items are expensed as incurred. We capitalize interest on projects during
periods of construction until the projects are ready for their intended purpose based on interest rates in
place during the construction period. The amount of interest capitalized during each year is as follows:
       
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
      2018     2017     2016 
Capitalized interest  $19,871  $24,754  $31,250  
 
We record depreciation on buildings and improvements utilizing the straight‑line method over an
estimated original useful life, which is generally 10 to 35 years. We review depreciable lives of
investment properties periodically and we make adjustments when necessary to reflect a shorter
economic life. We amortize tenant allowances and tenant improvements utilizing the straight‑line
method over the term of the related lease or occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter. We record
depreciation on equipment and fixtures utilizing the straight‑line method over seven to ten years.
We review investment properties for impairment on a property‑by‑property basis whenever events
or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not be
recoverable. These circumstances include, but are not limited to, declines in a property’s cash flows,
ending occupancy or total sales per square foot. We measure any impairment of investment property
when the estimated undiscounted operating income before depreciation and amortization during the
anticipated holding period plus its residual value is less than the carrying value of the property. To the
extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying value of the property over
its estimated fair value. We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using unobservable data
such as operating income, estimated capitalization rates, or multiples, leasing prospects and local
market information. We may decide to sell properties that are held for use and the sale prices of these
properties may differ from their carrying values. We also review our investments, including investments
in unconsolidated entities, if events or circumstances change indicating that the carrying amount of our
investments may not be recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine that a
decline in the fair value of the investments is other‑than‑temporary. Changes in economic and operating
conditions that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment property and other
investments could impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result in future charges to
earnings if assumptions regarding those investments differ from actual results.
During the fourth quarter of 2016, we determined we would no longer pursue the construction of
the Copley residential tower given a change in property approval dynamics, construction pricing in the
Boston market and the continued increase in residential supply in the market. Accordingly, we recorded
a charge of approximately $31.5 million related to the write-off of pre-development costs, which is
included in other expenses in the accompanying statement of operations and comprehensive income.
88
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Purchase Accounting
We allocate the purchase price of asset acquisitions and any excess investment in unconsolidated
entities to the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each
component which may be derived from various observable or unobservable inputs and assumptions.
Also, we may utilize third party valuation specialists. These components typically include buildings, land
and intangibles related to in‑place leases and we estimate:
·the relative fair value of land and related improvements and buildings on an as‑if‑vacant basis,
·the market value of in‑place leases based upon our best estimate of current market rents and
amortize the resulting market rent adjustment into revenues,
·the value of costs to obtain tenants, including tenant allowances and improvements and leasing
commissions, and
·the value of revenue and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease‑up period, as if
the space was vacant.
The relative fair value of buildings is depreciated over the estimated remaining life of the acquired
building or related improvements. We amortize tenant improvements, in‑place lease assets and other
lease‑related intangibles over the remaining life of the underlying leases. We also estimate the value of
other acquired intangible assets, if any, which are amortized over the remaining life of the underlying
related intangibles.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments purchased with an original maturity of 90 days or less to
be cash and cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at cost, which approximates fair value.
Cash equivalents generally consist of commercial paper, bankers’ acceptances, Eurodollars, repurchase
agreements, and money market deposits or securities. Financial instruments that potentially subject us
to concentrations of credit risk include our cash and cash equivalents and our trade accounts
receivable. We place our cash and cash equivalents with institutions of high credit quality. However, at
certain times, such cash and cash equivalents are in excess of Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
and Securities Investor Protection Corporation insurance limits. See Notes 4 and 10 for disclosures
about non-cash investing and financing transactions.
Equity Instruments and Debt Securities
Equity instruments and debt securities consist primarily of the debt securities of our captive
insurance subsidiary, equity instruments, our deferred compensation plan investments, and certain
investments held to fund the debt service requirements of debt previously secured by investment
properties. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had equity instruments with readily determinable fair
values of $78.1 million and $88.3 million, respectively. Effective January 1, 2018, changes in fair value
of these equity instruments are recorded in earnings. As of December 31, 2018, we have recorded non-
cash mark-to-market adjustments related to these equity securities with readily determinable fair values
of $15.2 million, which is included in other expense in our consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had equity instruments without readily
determinable fair values of $175.7 million and $186.9 million, respectively, for which we have elected the
measurement alternative. We regularly evaluate these investments for any impairment in their estimated
fair value, as well as any observable price changes for an identical or similar equity instrument of the
same issuer, and determined that no material adjustment in the carrying value was required for the year
ended December 31, 2018.
Our deferred compensation plan equity instruments are valued based upon quoted market
prices.  The investments have a matching liability as the amounts are fully payable to the employees
that earned the compensation.  Changes in value of these securities and changes to the matching
liability to employees are both recognized in earnings and, as a result, there is no impact to consolidated
net income.
89
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
On July 26, 2017, we sold our investment in certain equity instruments. The aggregate proceeds
received from the sale were $53.9 million, and we recognized a gain on the sale of $21.5 million, which
is included in other income in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and
comprehensive income for the year ended December 31, 2017.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we held debt securities of $40.1 million and $55.7 million,
respectively, in our captive insurance subsidiary. The types of securities included in the investment
portfolio of our captive insurance subsidiary are typically U.S. Treasury or other U.S. government
securities as well as corporate debt securities with maturities ranging from less than one year to ten
years. These securities are classified as available-for-sale and are valued based upon quoted market
prices or other observable inputs when quoted market prices are not available. The amortized cost of
debt securities, which approximates fair value, held by our captive insurance subsidiary is adjusted for
amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts to maturity. Changes in the values of these
securities are recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) until the gain or loss is
realized or until any unrealized loss is deemed to be other-than-temporary. We review any declines in
value of these securities for other-than-temporary impairment and consider the severity and duration of
any decline in value. To the extent an other-than-temporary impairment is deemed to have occurred, an
impairment is recorded and a new cost basis is established.
Our captive insurance subsidiary is required to maintain statutory minimum capital and surplus as
well as maintain a minimum liquidity ratio. Therefore, our access to these securities may be limited.
Fair Value Measurements
Level 1 fair value inputs are quoted prices for identical items in active, liquid and visible markets
such as stock exchanges. Level 2 fair value inputs are observable information for similar items in active
or inactive markets, and appropriately consider counterparty creditworthiness in the valuations. Level 3
fair value inputs reflect our best estimate of inputs and assumptions market participants would use in
pricing an asset or liability at the measurement date. The inputs are unobservable in the market and
significant to the valuation estimate. We have no investments for which fair value is measured on a
recurring basis using Level 3 inputs.
The equity instruments with readily determinable fair values we held at December 31, 2018 and
2017 were primarily classified as having Level 1 and Level 2 fair value inputs. In addition, we had
derivative instruments which were classified as having Level 2 inputs, which consist primarily of foreign
currency forward contracts and interest rate swap agreements with a gross asset balance of $10.9
million at December 31, 2018 and a gross liability balance of $6.2 million and $18.1 million at December
31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Note 8 includes a discussion of the fair value of debt measured using Level 2 inputs.  Notes 3 and
4 include discussions of the fair values recorded in purchase accounting using Level 2 and Level 3
inputs.  Level 3 inputs to our purchase accounting and impairment analyses include our estimations of
net operating results of the property, capitalization rates and discount rates.
Gains on Issuances of Stock by Equity Method Investees
When one of our equity method investees issues additional shares to third parties, our percentage
ownership interest in the investee may decrease. In the event the issuance price per share is higher or
lower than our average carrying amount per share, we recognize a noncash gain or loss on the
issuance, when appropriate. This noncash gain or loss is recognized in our net income in the period the
change of ownership interest occurs.
Use of Estimates
We prepared the accompanying consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States, or GAAP. GAAP requires us to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets
and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and revenues and expenses during the reported
period. Our actual results could differ from these estimates.
90
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Segment and Geographic Locations
Our primary business is the ownership, development, and management of premier shopping,
dining, entertainment and mixed use real estate. We have aggregated our retail operations, including
malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, and our international investments into one reportable segment
because they have similar economic characteristics and we provide similar products and services to
similar types of, and in many cases, the same, tenants.  As discussed in Note 7, we consolidated
various European assets in 2016.  As of December 31, 2018, approximately 6.1% of our consolidated
long-lived assets and 3.0% of our consolidated total revenues were derived from assets located outside
the United States.  As of December 31, 2017, approximately 6.5% of our consolidated long-lived assets
and 2.6% of our consolidated total revenues were derived from assets located outside the United
States.
Deferred Costs and Other Assets
Deferred costs and other assets include the following as of December 31:
     2018     2017  
Deferred lease costs, net  $ 249,010  $ 250,442  
In-place lease intangibles, net   65,825   96,054  
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net   64,813   92,405  
Marketable securities of our captive insurance companies   40,099   55,664  
Goodwill   20,098   20,098  
Other marketable and non-marketable securities   253,732   275,130  
Prepaids, notes receivable and other assets, net   516,463   584,190  
  $1,210,040  $1,373,983  
 
Deferred Lease Costs
Our deferred leasing costs consist primarily of capitalized salaries and related benefits in
connection with lease originations. We record amortization of deferred leasing costs on a straight‑line
basis over the terms of the related leases. Details of these deferred costs as of December 31 are as
follows:
     2018     2017  
Deferred lease costs  $497,570  $485,977  
Accumulated amortization   (248,560)   (235,535)  
Deferred lease costs, net $249,010 $250,442
 
Amortization of deferred leasing costs is a component of depreciation and amortization expense.
The accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include
amortization of deferred leasing costs as follows:
       
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
     2018     2017     2016  
Amortization of deferred leasing costs $ 56,646 $ 54,323 $ 49,993
Intangibles
The average remaining life of in‑place lease intangibles is approximately 2.5 years and is being
amortized on a straight‑line basis and is included with depreciation and amortization in the consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income. The fair market value of above and below market
leases is amortized into revenue over the remaining lease life as a component of reported minimum
rents. The weighted average remaining life of these intangibles
91
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
is approximately 2.7 years. The unamortized amount of below market leases is included in accounts
payable, accrued expenses, intangibles and deferred revenues in the consolidated balance sheets and
was $66.7 million and $94.1 million as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. The amount of
amortization of above and below market leases, net, which increased revenue for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, was $1.0 million, $2.8 million and $5.4 million, respectively. If a
lease is terminated prior to the original lease termination, any remaining unamortized intangible is
written off to earnings.
Details of intangible assets as of December 31 are as follows:
     2018     2017  
In-place lease intangibles  $291,613  $ 328,811  
Accumulated amortization (225,788) (232,757)
In-place lease intangibles, net  $65,825  $ 96,054  
        
2018 2017
Acquired above market lease intangibles  $253,973  $ 260,398  
Accumulated amortization   (189,160)   (167,993)  
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net  $64,813  $ 92,405  
 
Estimated future amortization and the increasing (decreasing) effect on minimum rents for our
above and below market leases as of December 31, 2018 are as follows:
  Below  Above  Impact to 
  Market Market Minimum 
  Leases Leases Rent, Net 
2019  $21,789  $(19,818)  $1,971  
2020   17,130   (15,767)   1,363  
2021   7,827   (10,414)   (2,587)  
2022   5,395   (7,550)   (2,155)  
2023   4,098   (5,491)   (1,393)  
Thereafter   10,509   (5,773)   4,736  
  $66,748  $(64,813)  $1,935  
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
We record all derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The accounting for
changes in the fair value of derivatives depends on the intended use of the derivative, whether we have
designated a derivative as a hedge and whether the hedging relationship has satisfied the criteria
necessary to apply hedge accounting. We may use a variety of derivative financial instruments in the
normal course of business to selectively manage or hedge a portion of the risks associated with our
indebtedness and interest payments. Our objectives in using interest rate derivatives are to add stability
to interest expense and to manage our exposure to interest rate movements. To accomplish this
objective, we primarily use interest rate swaps and caps. We require that hedging derivative instruments
be highly effective in reducing the risk exposure that they are designated to hedge. We formally
designate any instrument that meets these hedging criteria as a hedge at the inception of the derivative
contract.  We have no credit-risk-related hedging or derivative activities.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had no outstanding interest rate derivatives. We generally
do not apply hedge accounting to interest rate caps, which had a nominal value as of December 31,
2018 and 2017, respectively.
92
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
We are also exposed to fluctuations in foreign exchange rates on financial instruments which are
denominated in foreign currencies, primarily in Yen and Euro.   We use currency forward contracts,
cross currency swap contracts, and foreign currency denominated debt to manage our exposure to
changes in foreign exchange rates on certain Yen and Euro-denominated receivables and net
investments.  Currency forward contracts involve fixing the Yen:USD or Euro:USD exchange rate for
delivery of a specified amount of foreign currency on a specified date. The currency forward contracts
are typically cash settled in U.S. dollars for their fair value at or close to their settlement date.
We had the following Euro:USD forward contracts designated as net investment hedges at
December 31, 2018 and 2017 (in millions):
       
          Liability Value as of
  Maturity/Termination December 31,     December 31, 
Notional Value   Date  2018  2017
€50.0  November 9, 2018  $  — $ (2.4)
€50.0  May 15, 2019   (0.8)  (4.9)
€50.0  May 15, 2020   (1.5)  (5.2)
€50.0  May 14, 2021   (2.0)  (5.5)
Liability balances in the above table are included in other liabilities.
In the first quarter of 2018, we entered into a Euro-denominated cross-currency swap agreement
to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates by swapping $150.0 million of 4.38%
fixed rate U.S. dollar-denominated debt to 1.37% fixed rate Euro-denominated debt of €121.6 million.
The cross-currency swap matures on December 1, 2020. The fair value of our cross‑currency swap
agreement at December 31, 2018 is $10.9 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets. In
the third quarter of 2018, we entered into a Yen-denominated cross-currency swap agreement by
swapping $200.1 million of 4.38% fixed rate U.S. dollar-denominated debt to ¥22.3 billion of 1.19% fixed
rate Yen-denominated debt. Contemporaneously, we repaid Yen-denominated borrowings of $201.3
million (U.S. dollar equivalent) on the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit
facility, or Credit Facility. The cross-currency swap matures on December 1, 2020. The fair value of our
cross-currency swap agreement at December 31, 2018 is $1.9 million and is included in other liabilities.
We have designated the currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps as net investment
hedges. Accordingly, we report the changes in fair value in other comprehensive income (loss).
Changes in the value of these forward contracts are offset by changes in the underlying hedged Euro or
Yen-denominated joint venture investment.
The total gross accumulated other comprehensive income related to the Operating Partnership’s
derivative activities, including our share of the other comprehensive income from unconsolidated
entities, approximated $37.9 million and $9.3 million as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Noncontrolling Interests
Simon
Details of the carrying amount of our noncontrolling interests are as follows as of December 31:
              
        
     2018      2017  
Limited partners’  interests in the Operating Partnership  $492,877  $548,858  
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net   7,398   3,738  
Total noncontrolling interests reflected in equity  $500,275  $552,596  
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and
redeemable noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties, limited partners’ interests in the
Operating Partnership, and preferred distributions
93
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
payable by the Operating Partnership on its outstanding preferred units) is a component of consolidated
net income. In addition, the individual components of other comprehensive income (loss) are presented
in the aggregate for both controlling and noncontrolling interests, with the portion attributable to
noncontrolling interests deducted from comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders.
A rollforward of noncontrolling interests for the years ended December 31 is as follows:
       
     2018     2017     2016
Noncontrolling interests, beginning of period  $552,596  $649,464  $744,905
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests after preferred
distributions and income attributable to redeemable noncontrolling interests
in consolidated properties   376,954   297,104   289,594
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders   (372,397)   (342,453)   (319,193)
Other comprehensive (loss) income allocable to noncontrolling interests:          
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative hedge agreements   2,852   (4,607)   5,444
Net loss (gain) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss
into earnings   923  (1,587)   19,629
Currency translation adjustments   (6,271)   6,040   (209)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other   49  746  216
   (2,447)   592  25,080
Adjustment to limited partners’  interest from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership   (156,241)   (84,794)   (66,996)
Units issued to limited partners   84,103    —   —
Units exchanged for common shares   (1,004)   (6,005)   (73,756)
Units redeemed   (4,951)    —   —
Long-term incentive performance units   26,172   38,305   48,324
Contributions by noncontrolling interests, net, and other   (2,510)   383  1,506
Noncontrolling interests, end of period  $500,275  $552,596  $649,464
The Operating Partnership
Our evaluation of the appropriateness of classifying the Operating Partnership’s common units of
partnership interest, or units, held by Simon and the Operating Partnership's limited partners within
permanent equity considered several significant factors. First, as a limited partnership, all decisions
relating to the Operating Partnership’s operations and distributions are made by Simon, acting as the
Operating Partnership’s sole general partner. The decisions of the general partner are made by Simon's
Board of Directors or management. The Operating Partnership has no other governance structure.
Secondly, the sole asset of Simon is its interest in the Operating Partnership. As a result, a share of
common stock of Simon, or common stock, if owned by the Operating Partnership, is best characterized
as being similar to a treasury share and thus not an asset of the Operating Partnership.
Limited partners of the Operating Partnership have the right under the Operating Partnership’s
partnership agreement to exchange their units for shares of common stock or cash, as selected by
Simon as the sole general partner. Accordingly, we classify units held by limited partners in permanent
equity because Simon may elect to issue shares of common stock to limited partners exercising their
exchange rights rather than using cash. Under the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement, the
Operating Partnership is required to redeem units held by Simon only when Simon has repurchased
shares of common stock. We classify units held by Simon in permanent equity because the decision to
redeem those units would be made by Simon.
94
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and
redeemable noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties) is a component of consolidated net
income.
A rollforward of noncontrolling interests for the years ended December 31 is as follows:
                 
     2018    2017    2016  
Noncontrolling nonredeemable interests in properties, net — beginning of
period  $3,738     $5,116     $3,456  
Net income attributable to noncontrolling nonredeemable interests   7,911   2,091   2,917  
Distributions to noncontrolling nonredeemable interest holders   (1,741)   (3,851)   (2,765)  
Contributions by noncontrolling nonredeemable interests, net, and other   (2,510)   382  1,508  
Noncontrolling nonredeemable interests in properties, net — end of period  $7,398  $3,738  $5,116  
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Simon
The changes in components of our accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of
the following net of noncontrolling interest as of December 31, 2018:
        
        Net unrealized    
  Currency Accumulated losses on    
  translation derivative marketable    
     adjustments    gains, net    securities    Total 
Beginning balance  $(118,138)  $ 8,055  $ (370)  $(110,453)  
Other comprehensive (loss) income before
reclassifications   (40,766)   18,781   324  (21,661)  
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss)    —  6,097    —  6,097  
Net current-period other comprehensive (loss) income   (40,766)   24,878   324  (15,564)  
Ending balance  $(158,904)  $ 32,933  $ (46) $(126,017)  
 
95
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the
following as of December 31:
       
  2018  2017  2016    
     Amount     Amount  Amount    
  reclassified  reclassified  reclassified    
  from  from  from    
  accumulated  accumulated  accumulated    
Details about accumulated other  other  other  other    
comprehensive income (loss)  comprehensive  comprehensive  comprehensive  Affected line item where  
components:     income (loss)     income (loss)     income (loss)     net income is presented  
Currency translation adjustments
 $  — $  — $ (136,806) Gain upon acquisition of
controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  
    —   —  17,948 Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests  
  $  — $  —  (118,858)   
             
             
Accumulated derivative losses, net $ (7,020) $ (9,419) $ (12,230) Interest expense  
    —   —  (586) Gain upon acquisition of
controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  
   923  1,233  1,681 Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests  
  $ (6,097) $ (8,186) $ (11,135)   
             
Realized gain on sale of marketable
securities  $  — $ 21,541 $  — Other income  
    —  (2,820)   — Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests  
  $  — $ 18,721 $  —   
 
96
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
The Operating Partnership
The changes in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) by component consisted of the
following as of December 31, 2018:
      Net unrealized   
  Currency Accumulated losses on    
  translation derivative marketable    
  adjustments gains, net securities  Total 
Beginning balance  $(135,940)  $ 9,263  $ (425)  $(127,102)  
Other comprehensive (loss) income before
reclassifications   (47,038)   21,633   373  (25,032)  
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss)    —  7,020    —  7,020  
Net current-period other comprehensive (loss) income   (47,038)   28,653   373  (18,012)  
Ending balance $(182,978) $ 37,916 $ (52) $(145,114)
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the
following as of December 31:
      
  2018  2017  2016    
     Amount     Amount     Amount     
  reclassified  reclassified  reclassified    
  from  from  from    
  accumulated  accumulated  accumulated    
Details about accumulated other  other  other  other    
comprehensive income (loss)  comprehensive  comprehensive  comprehensive  Affected line item where  
components:  income (loss)  income (loss)  income (loss)  net income is presented  
Currency translation adjustments
 $  — $  — $ (136,806) Gain upon acquisition of
controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  
             
Accumulated derivative losses, net $ (7,020) $ (9,419) $ (12,230) Interest expense  
    —   —  (586) Gain upon acquisition of
controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  
  $ (7,020) $ (9,419) $ (12,816)   
             
Realized gain on sale of marketable
securities  $  — $ 21,541 $  — Other income  
 
97
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Revenue Recognition
We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment
properties and account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue minimum rents on a straight‑line
basis over the terms of their respective leases. Substantially all of our retail tenants are also required to
pay overage rents based on sales over a stated base amount during the lease year. We recognize
overage rents only when each tenant’s sales exceed the applicable sales threshold. We amortize any
tenant inducements as a reduction of revenue utilizing the straight‑line method over the term of the
related lease or occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter.
We structure our leases to allow us to recover a significant portion of our property operating, real
estate taxes, repairs and maintenance, and advertising and promotion expenses from our tenants. A
substantial portion of our leases, other than those for anchor stores, require the tenant to reimburse us
for a substantial portion of our operating expenses, including common area maintenance, or CAM, real
estate taxes and insurance. This significantly reduces our exposure to increases in costs and operating
expenses resulting from inflation or otherwise. Such property operating expenses typically include utility,
insurance, security, janitorial, landscaping, food court and other administrative expenses. As of
December 31, 2018, for substantially all of our leases in the U.S. mall portfolio, we receive a fixed
payment from the tenant for the CAM component which is recognized as revenue when earned. When
not reimbursed by the fixed‑CAM component, CAM expense reimbursements are based on the tenant’s
proportionate share of the allocable operating expenses and CAM capital expenditures for the property.
We accrue reimbursements from tenants for recoverable portions of all of these expenses as revenue in
the period the applicable expenditures are incurred. We recognize differences between estimated
recoveries and the final billed amounts in the subsequent year. These differences were not material in
any period presented. Our advertising and promotional costs are expensed as incurred.  As discussed in
Note 3, upon adoption of Accounting Standards Update (ASU) 2016-02 and its related amendments on
January 1, 2019, fixed CAM reimbursements for new or amended leases are recognized on a straight-
line basis over the term of the respective leases.
Management Fees and Other Revenues
Management fees and other revenues are generally received from our unconsolidated joint
venture properties as well as third parties. Management fee revenue is earned based on a contractual
percentage of joint venture property revenue. Development fee revenue is earned on a contractual
percentage of hard costs to develop a property. Leasing fee revenue is earned on a contractual per
square foot charge based on the square footage of current year leasing activity. We recognize revenue
for these services provided when earned based on the performance criteria.
Revenues from insurance premiums charged to unconsolidated properties are recognized on a
pro‑rata basis over the terms of the policies. Insurance losses on these policies and our self‑insurance
for our consolidated properties are reflected in property operating expenses in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income and include estimates for losses
incurred but not reported as well as losses pending settlement. Estimates for losses are based on
evaluations by third-party actuaries and management’s estimates. Total insurance reserves for our
insurance subsidiaries and other self‑insurance programs as of December 31, 2018 and 2017
approximated $82.5 million and $81.8 million, respectively, and are included in other liabilities in the
consolidated balance sheets. Information related to the securities included in the investment portfolio of
our captive insurance subsidiary is included within the “Equity Instruments and Debt Securities” section
above.
98
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Allowance for Credit Losses
We record a provision for credit losses based on our judgment of a tenant’s creditworthiness,
ability to pay and probability of collection. In addition, we also consider the sector in which the tenant
operates and our historical collection experience in cases of bankruptcy, if applicable. Accounts are
written off when they are deemed to be no longer collectible. Presented below is the activity in the
allowance for credit losses during the following years:
    
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
  2018  2017  2016  
Balance, beginning of period     $23,460     $22,498     $30,094  
Provision for credit losses   12,631   11,304   7,319  
Accounts written of f, net of recoveries   (9,271)   (10,342)   (14,915)  
Balance, end of period  $26,820  $23,460  $22,498  
 
Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs
under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable Treasury regulations
relating to REIT qualification. In order to maintain this REIT status, the regulations require the entity to
distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income to its owners and meet certain other asset and income
tests as well as other requirements. We intend to continue to adhere to these requirements and
maintain Simon’s REIT status and that of the REIT subsidiaries. As REITs, these entities will generally
not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of
their REIT taxable income. Thus, we made no provision for U.S. federal income taxes for these entities
in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. If Simon or any of the REIT subsidiaries fail to
qualify as a REIT, and if available relief provisions do not apply, Simon or that entity will be subject to tax
at regular corporate rates for the years in which it failed to qualify. If Simon or any of the REIT
subsidiaries loses its REIT status it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following
the year during which qualification was lost unless the failure to qualify was due to reasonable cause
and certain other conditions were satisfied.
We have also elected taxable REIT subsidiary, or TRS, status for some of our subsidiaries. This
enables us to provide services that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REITs and
participate in activities that do not qualify as “rents from real property”. For these entities, deferred tax
assets and liabilities are established for temporary differences between the financial reporting basis and
the tax basis of assets and liabilities at the enacted tax rates expected to be in effect when the
temporary differences reverse. A valuation allowance for deferred tax assets is provided if we believe all
or some portion of the deferred tax asset may not be realized. An increase or decrease in the valuation
allowance that results from the change in circumstances that causes a change in our judgment about
the realizability of the related deferred tax asset is included in income.
As a partnership, the allocated share of the Operating Partnership’s income or loss for each year
is included in the income tax returns of the partners; accordingly, no accounting for income taxes is
required in the accompanying consolidated financial statements other than as discussed above for our
TRSs.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had net deferred tax liabilities of $278.3 million and
$301.7 million, respectively, which primarily relate to the temporary differences between the carrying
value of balance sheet assets and liabilities and their tax bases. These differences were primarily
created through the consolidation of various European assets in 2016 as discussed further in Note 7.
Additionally, we have deferred tax liabilities related to our TRSs, consisting of operating losses and other
carryforwards for U.S. federal income tax purposes as well as the timing of the deductibility of losses or
reserves from insurance subsidiaries, though these amounts are not material to the financial
statements. The net deferred tax liability is included in other liabilities in the accompanying consolidated
balance sheets. 
99
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
We are also subject to certain other taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, as well
as income-based and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our international investments,
which are included in income and other taxes in the consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. 
Corporate Expenses
Home and regional office costs primarily include compensation and personnel related costs,
travel, building and office costs, and other expenses for our corporate home office and regional
offices.  General and administrative expense primarily includes executive compensation, benefits and
travel expenses as well as costs of being a public company, including certain legal costs, audit fees,
regulatory fees, and certain other professional fees.
New Accounting Pronouncements
In May 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued ASU 2014‑09, "Revenue
From Contracts With Customers." ASU 2014-09 amends the existing accounting standards for revenue
recognition.  The new standard provides accounting guidance for all revenue arising from contracts with
customers and affects all entities that enter into contracts to provide goods or services to their
customers.  The guidance also provides a model for the measurement and recognition of gains and
losses on the sale of certain nonfinancial assets, such as property, including real estate. 
Our revenues impacted by this standard primarily include management, development, leasing and
financing fee revenues for services performed related to various domestic joint ventures that we
manage, licensing fees earned from various international properties, sales of real estate, including land
parcels and operating properties, and other ancillary income earned at our properties.  The amount and
timing of revenue recognition from our services to joint ventures, licensing fee arrangements, and
ancillary income under the newly effective standard is consistent with the prior measurement and
pattern of recognition.  In addition, we do not actively sell operating properties as part of our core
business strategy and, accordingly, the sale of properties does not generally constitute a significant part
of our revenue and cash flows. We adopted the standard using the modified retrospective approach on
January 1, 2018 and there was no cumulative effect adjustment recognized. Our revenues impacted by
this standard are included in management fees and other revenues and in other income in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
In January 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-01, "Financial Instruments — Overall: Recognition
and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities," which requires entities to recognize
changes in equity investments with readily determinable fair values in net income.  We recognized a
cumulative effect adjustment of $7.3 million as of adoption on January 1, 2018 to reclassify unrealized
gains previously reported in accumulated other comprehensive income for equity instruments with
readily determinable fair values that were previously accounted for as available-for-sale securities and
certain equity instruments previously accounted for using the cost method for which the measurement
alternative described below was not elected.  For those equity instruments that do not have readily
determinable fair values, the ASU permits the application of a measurement alternative using the cost of
the investment, less any impairments, plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes
for an identical or similar investment of the same issuer.  This guidance is applied prospectively upon
the occurrence of an event which establishes fair value to all other equity instruments we account for
using the measurement alternative. 
In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-02, "Leases," which will result in lessees
recognizing most leased assets and corresponding lease liabilities on the balance sheet.  Lessor
accounting will remain substantially similar to the current accounting; however, certain refinements were
made to conform the standard with the recently issued revenue recognition guidance in ASU 2014-09,
specifically related to the allocation and recognition of contract consideration earned from lease and
non-lease revenue components. ASU 2016-02 also limits the capitalization of leasing costs to initial
direct costs, which if applied in 2018, would have reduced our capitalized leasing costs and
correspondingly increased expenses by approximately $45 million.
Substantially all of our revenues and the revenues of our equity method investments are earned
from arrangements that are within the scope of ASU 2016-02. Upon adoption of ASU 2016-02 on
January 1, 2019, consideration related to
100
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
non-lease components identified in our lease arrangements are accounted for using the guidance in
ASU 2014-09, which for new and amended leases we have determined would (i) necessitate that we
reallocate consideration received under many of our lease arrangements between the lease and non-
lease component, (ii) result in recognizing revenue allocated to our primary non-lease component
(consideration received from fixed common area maintenance arrangements) on a straight-line basis
and (iii) require separate presentation of revenue recognized from lease and non-lease components on
our statements of operations and comprehensive income.  However, on July 30, 2018, the FASB issued
ASU 2018-11, which created a practical expedient that provides lessors an option not to separate lease
and non-lease components when certain criteria are met and instead account for those components as
a single lease component.  We determined that our new and amended lease arrangements will meet the
criteria under the practical expedient to account for lease and non-lease components as a single lease
component, which alleviates the requirement upon adoption of ASU 2016-02 that we reallocate or
separately present lease and non-lease components. As a result, we will recognize consideration
received from fixed common area maintenance arrangements on a straight-line basis for new or
amended leases as this consideration is attributed to the lease component. 
Further, ASU 2016-02 requires recognition in our consolidated balance sheets of leases of land
and other arrangements where we are the lessee. Upon adoption on January 1, 2019, we recognized a
right of use asset and corresponding lease liability of $524.0 million representing the present value of
future lease payments required under our lessee arrangements. We utilized lease terms ranging from
2019 to 2090 including periods for which exercising an extension option is reasonably assured and
discount rates from 3.97% to 5.52% when determining the present value of future lease payments. All of
our existing lessee arrangements upon adoption will continue to be classified as operating leases, in
which case the pattern of lease expense recognition will be unchanged.
In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-13, "Financial Instruments - Credit Losses," which
introduced new guidance for an approach based on expected losses to estimate credit losses on certain
types of financial instruments. It also modifies the impairment model for available-for-sale debt securities
and provides for a simplified accounting model for purchased financial assets with credit deterioration
since their origination. Instruments in scope include loans, held-to-maturity debt securities, and net
investments in leases as well as reinsurance and trade receivables. In November 2018, the FASB
issued ASU 2018-19, which clarifies that operating lease receivables are outside the scope of the new
standard. This standard will be effective for us in fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019. We
are currently evaluating the impact that the adoption of the new standard will have on our consolidated
financial statements.
In February 2017, the FASB issued ASU 2017-05, “Other Income - Gains and Losses from the
Derecognition of Nonfinancial Assets,” which clarifies the scope and application of Accounting
Standards Codification 610-20 on the sale or transfer of nonfinancial assets and in substance assets to
noncustomers, including partial sales. The standard generally aligns the measurement of a retained
interest in a nonfinancial asset with that of a retained interest in a business. It also eliminates the use of
the carryover basis for contributions of real estate into a joint venture where control of the real estate is
not retained, which will result in the recognition of a gain or loss upon contribution. We adopted the
standard using the modified retrospective approach on January 1, 2018 and there was no cumulative
effect adjustment to recognize.
In August 2017, the FASB issued ASU 2017-12, "Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted
Improvements to Accounting for Hedging Activities," which introduced amendments to the hedge
accounting model to allow for better alignment with risk management practices in addition to simplifying
the hedge accounting model.  The provisions may permit more risk management strategies to qualify for
hedge accounting, including interest rate hedges and foreign currency hedges.  We early adopted the
ASU on January 1, 2018 as permitted under the standard.  There was no impact on our consolidated
financial statements at adoption.
4. Real Estate Acquisitions and Dispositions
We acquire interests in properties to generate both current income and long-term appreciation in
value. We acquire interests in individual properties or portfolios of retail real estate companies that meet
our investment criteria and sell properties which no longer meet our strategic criteria. Unless otherwise
noted below, gains and losses on these transactions are included in gain upon acquisition of controlling
interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
101
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income. We capitalize asset acquisition costs and expense costs related
to business combinations, as well as disposition related costs as they are incurred. We incurred a
minimal amount of transaction expenses during 2018, 2017, and 2016.
Our consolidated and unconsolidated acquisition and disposition activity for the periods presented
are as follows:
2018 Acquisitions
On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from
our joint venture partner. The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or approximately $84.1
million, as consideration for the acquisition. The property is subject to a $215.0 million 4.22% fixed rate
mortgage loan.  We accounted for this transaction as an asset acquisition and substantially all of our
investment has been determined to relate to investment property.
2017 Acquisitions
On April 21, 2017, our controlled European investee acquired a 100% interest in an outlet center
in Roosendaal, Netherlands for cash consideration of $69.8 million and the assumption of existing
mortgage debt of $40.1 million. In May 2017, the assumed loan was refinanced with a $69.0 million
mortgage loan due in 2024, after available extension options, with an interest rate of EURIBOR plus
1.85%.
2016 Acquisitions
On January 1, 2016, as discussed further in Note 7, we gained control of the European investee
that held our interest in six Designer Outlet properties, requiring a remeasurement of our previously held
equity interest to fair value and a corresponding non-cash gain of $12.1 million and which also resulted
in the consolidation of two of the six properties, which had been previously unconsolidated. In February
2016, we and our partner, through this European investee, acquired a noncontrolling 75.0% ownership
interest in an outlet center in Ochtrup, Germany for cash consideration of approximately $38.3 million.
On July 25, 2016, as further discussed in Note 7, this European investee also acquired the remaining
33% interest in two Italian outlet centers in Naples and Venice. The consolidation of these two
properties resulted in a remeasurement of our previously held equity interest to fair value and a
corresponding non-cash gain of $29.3 million.
On April 14, 2016, as discussed further in Note 7, we acquired a noncontrolling 50% interest in
The Shops at Crystals. 
2018 Dispositions
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which
included the foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and
$80.0 million non-recourse mortgage loans and, as discussed in Note 7, our interest in the German
department store properties owned through our investment in HBS was sold during the fourth quarter of
2018. Also, as discussed further in Note 7, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers
during 2018, resulting in a gain of which our share was $20.2 million.
2017 Dispositions
During 2017, we disposed of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property. The loss
recognized on this transaction was approximately $1.3 million. As discussed in Note 7, Klépierre
disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers during the second quarter, resulting in a gain of
which our share was $5.0 million.
102
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
2016 Dispositions
During 2016, we disposed of our interests in two unconsolidated multi-family residential
investments, three consolidated retail properties, and four unconsolidated retail properties.  Our share of
the gross proceeds from these transactions was $81.8 million.  The gain on the consolidated retail
properties was $12.4 million. The gain on the unconsolidated retail properties was $22.6 million.  The
aggregate gain of $36.2 million from the sale of the two unconsolidated multi-family residential
investments is included in other income and resulted in an additional $7.2 million in taxes included in
income and other taxes. As discussed in Note 7, Klépierre disposed of its interest in certain
Scandinavian properties during the fourth quarter, resulting in a gain of which our share was $8.1
million.
5. Per Share and Per Unit Data
We determine basic earnings per share and basic earnings per unit based on the weighted
average number of shares of common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding during the period and
we consider any participating securities for purposes of applying the two-class method. We determine
diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit based on the weighted average number of
shares of common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding combined with the incremental weighted
average number of shares or units, as applicable, that would have been outstanding assuming all
potentially dilutive securities were converted into shares of common stock or units, as applicable, at the
earliest date possible. The following tables set forth the computation of basic and diluted earnings per
share and basic and diluted earnings per unit.
Simon
For the Year Ended December 31, 
2018 2017 2016
Net Income attributable to Common
Stockholders — Basic and Diluted $ 2,436,721 $ 1,944,625 $ 1,835,559
Weighted Average Shares Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted 309,627,178 311,517,345 312,690,756
 
For the year ended December 31, 2018, potentially dilutive securities include units that are
exchangeable for common stock and long-term incentive performance units, or LTIP units, granted
under our long-term incentive performance programs that are convertible into units and exchangeable
for common stock. No securities had a material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017, and 2016. We have not adjusted net income attributable to common stockholders and weighted
average shares outstanding for income allocable to limited partners or units, respectively, as doing so
would have no dilutive impact. We accrue dividends when they are declared.
The Operating Partnership
For the Year Ended December 31, 
2018 2017 2016
Net Income attributable to Unitholders —
Basic and Diluted $ 2,805,764 $ 2,239,638 $ 2,122,236
Weighted Average Units Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted 356,520,452 358,776,632 361,526,633
For the year ended December 31, 2018, potentially dilutive securities include LTIP units. No
securities had a material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016. We
accrue distributions when they are declared.
103
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
The taxable nature of the dividends declared and Operating Partnership distributions declared for
each of the years ended as indicated is summarized as follows:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
2018 2017 2016
Total dividends/distributions paid per common share/unit     $7.90     $7.15     $6.50  
Percent taxable as ordinary income   96.20 %   100.00 %   99.70 %
Percent taxable as long-term capital gains   3.80 %   0.00 %   0.30 %
   100.00 %   100.00 %   100.00 %
In the first quarter of 2019, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $2.05
per share of common stock payable on February 28, 2019 to stockholders of record on February 14,
2019. The Operating Partnership’s distribution rate on our units is equal to the dividend rate on Simon’s
common stock.
6. Investment Properties
Investment properties consist of the following as of December 31:
     2018     2017  
Land $3,673,023 $3,635,316
Buildings and improvements 32,994,937 32,379,190
Total land, buildings and improvements 36,667,960 36,014,506
Furniture, fixtures and equipment 424,710 378,958
Investment properties at cost 37,092,670 36,393,464
Less — accumulated depreciation 12,884,539 11,935,949
Investment properties at cost, net $24,208,131 $24,457,515
Construction in progress included above $ 561,556 $ 503,692
  
7. Investments in Unconsolidated Entities and International Investments
Real Estate Joint Ventures and Investments
Joint ventures are common in the real estate industry. We use joint ventures to finance properties,
develop new properties, and diversify our risk in a particular property or portfolio of properties.  As
discussed in Note 2, we held joint venture interests in 81 properties as of December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy‑sell
provisions, put and call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real
estate joint venture agreements and the industry. We and our partners in these joint ventures may
initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions), which may result in
either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or borrowings, or the use of limited partnership
interests in the Operating Partnership, to acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
We may provide financing to joint ventures primarily in the form of interest bearing construction
loans. As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had construction loans and other advances to related
parties totaling $85.8 million and $87.0 million, respectively, which are included in deferred costs and
other assets in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
104
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Unconsolidated Property Transactions
On September 25, 2018, as discussed in Note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The
Outlets at Orange from our joint venture partner.  The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units at a
price of $176.99 to acquire this remaining interest.  As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of
this property.
On June 7, 2018, Aventura Mall, a property in which we own a 33.3% interest, refinanced its $1.2
billion mortgage loan and its $200.8 million construction loan with a $1.75 billion mortgage loan at a
fixed interest rate of 4.12% that matures on July 1, 2028.  An early repayment charge of $30.9 million
was incurred at the property, which along with the write-off of deferred debt issuance costs of $6.5
million, is included in interest expense in the accompanying combined joint venture statements of
operations.  Our $12.5 million share of the charge associated with the repayment is included in income
from unconsolidated entities in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income.  Excess proceeds from the financing were distributed to the venture partners.
We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in a joint venture with Seritage Growth Properties, or
Seritage, which originally held an interest in ten Sears properties located in our malls. On November 3,
2017, we acquired additional interests in the real estate assets and/or rights to terminate leases related
to twelve Sears stores located at our malls (including five stores previously held in our joint venture with
Seritage), in order to redevelop these properties.  Our cost of this transaction after partner participation
was $149.1 million, which is reflected as investment property. 
In May 2017, Colorado Mills, a property in which we have a 37.5% interest, sustained significant
hail damage.  During the second quarter of 2017, the property recorded an impairment charge of
approximately $32.5 million based on the net carrying value of the assets damaged, which was fully
offset by anticipated insurance recoveries.  As of December 31, 2018, the property had received
business interruption proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $65.9 million, which resulted in
the property recording a $33.4 million gain in 2018.  Our $12.5 million share of the gain is reflected
within the gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income.
On September 15, 2016, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of
Aéropostale, a retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy.  The interests were acquired
through two separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture.  In April 2018, we
contributed our entire interest in the licensing venture in exchange for additional interests in ABG, a
brand development, marketing, and entertainment company.  As a result, we recognized a $35.6 million
non‑cash gain representing the increase in value of our previously held interest in the licensing venture,
which is included in other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income.  At December 31, 2018, our noncontrolling equity method interests in the
operations venture of Aéropostale and in ABG was 44.95% and 5.40%, respectively.
On April 14, 2016, we and a joint venture partner completed the acquisition of The Shops at
Crystals, a luxury shopping center on the Las Vegas Strip, for $1.1 billion. The transaction was funded
with a combination of cash on hand, cash from our partner, and a $550.0 million, 3.74% fixed-rate
mortgage loan that will mature on July 1, 2026. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this joint
venture and manage the day-to-day operations. Substantially all of our investment has been determined
to relate to investment property based on estimated fair values at the acquisition date.
On April 5, 2016, Quaker Bridge Mall, in which we own a 50% noncontrolling interest, completed a
$180.0 million mortgage financing with a fixed interest rate of 4.50% that matures on May 1, 2026.
Proceeds of approximately $180.0 million from the financing were distributed to the joint venture
partners in April 2016.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had an 11.7% noncontrolling equity interest in HBS, a
joint venture we formed with Hudson’s Bay Company. As of December 31, 2017, HBS had 42 properties
in the U.S. and 41 properties in Germany.  During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the German
department store properties was sold to Hudson’s Bay Company and SIGNA Retail Holdings resulting in
a gain of $91.1 million. As of December 31, 2018, HBS continues to own 42 U.S. properties.  Our share
of net income, net of amortization of our excess investment, was $15.1 million and $16.1 million for the
year ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively.  Total assets and total liabilities of HBS as of
December 31, 2018 were $1.7 billion and $834.1 million, respectively.  Total revenues, operating income
and consolidated net income were approximately $326.3 million, $196.3 million and $105.9 million,
respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2018 and $351.0 million, $313.8 million, and $220.2
million, respectively for the year ended December 31, 2017.
105
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
International Investments
We conduct our international operations primarily through joint venture arrangements and account
for the majority of these international joint venture investments using the equity method of accounting.
European Investments    
At December 31, 2018, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 21.3%, of Klépierre,
which had a quoted market price of $30.86 per share.  Our share of net income, net of amortization of
our excess investment, was $98.8 million, $50.0 million and $41.5 million for the years ended December
31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Based on applicable Euro:USD exchange rates and after our
conversion of Klépierre’s results to GAAP, Klépierre’s total assets, total liabilities, and noncontrolling
interests were $20.0 billion, $12.7 billion, and $1.4 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2018 and
$21.8 billion, $13.7 billion, and $1.6 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2017. Klépierre’s total
revenues, operating income and consolidated net income were approximately $1.6 billion, $670.4 million
and $693.0 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2018, $1.5 billion, $545.7 million and
$381.3 million, for the year ended December 31, 2017, and $1.5 billion, $449.9 million and $310.9
million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2016.
During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, Klépierre completed the disposal of
its interests in certain shopping centers. In connection with these disposals, we recorded gains of $20.2
million, $5.0 million and $8.1 million, respectively, representing our share of the gains recognized by
Klépierre, which is included in gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or disposal of, or
recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
We had an interest in a European investee that had interests in nine Designer Outlet properties as
of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and seven Designer Outlet properties at December 31, 2016.  On
January 1, 2016, we gained control of the entity through terms of the underlying venture agreement,
requiring a remeasurement of our previously held equity interest to fair value resulting in a non-cash
gain of $12.1 million in earnings during the first quarter of 2016, including amounts reclassified from
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to the currency translation adjustment
previously recorded on our investment. The gain is included in gain upon acquisition of controlling
interests, sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income.  As a result of the change in control, we consolidated two of the outlet properties on January 1,
2016. The consolidation required us to recognize the entity's identifiable assets and liabilities at fair
value in our consolidated financial statements along with the fair value of the related redeemable
noncontrolling interest representing our partners' share. The fair value of the consolidated assets and
liabilities relates primarily to investment property, investments in unconsolidated entities and assumed
mortgage debt.  Due to certain redemption rights held by our venture partner, the noncontrolling interest
is presented (i) in the accompanying Simon consolidated balance sheets outside of equity in limited
partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties and (ii) in the accompanying Operating Partnership consolidated balance sheets within
preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties. 
In February 2016, we and our partner, through this European investee, acquired a noncontrolling
75.0% ownership interest in an outlet center in Ochtrup, Germany for cash consideration of
approximately $38.3 million.
On July 25, 2016, this European investee also acquired the remaining 33% interest in two Italian
outlet centers in Naples and Venice, as well as the remaining interests in related expansion projects and
working capital for cash consideration of $159.7 million. This resulted in the consolidation of these two
properties on the acquisition date, requiring a remeasurement of our previously held equity interest to
fair value and the recognition of a non-cash gain of $29.3 million in earnings during the third quarter of
2016.  Substantially all of our investment has been determined to relate to investment property based on
estimated fair value at the acquisition date.
On April 7, 2017, this European investee acquired an additional 15.7% investment in the
Roermond Designer Outlets Phase 4 expansion for cash consideration of approximately $17.9 million,
bringing its total noncontrolling interest in the expansion to 51.3%.
106
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
On April 21, 2017, this European investee acquired a 100% interest in an outlet center in
Roosendaal, Netherlands for cash consideration of $69.8 million and the assumption of existing
mortgage debt of $40.1 million. In May, the assumed loan was refinanced with a $69.0 million mortgage
loan due in 2024, after available extension options, with an interest rate of EURIBOR plus 1.85%.
Substantially all of our investment has been determined to relate to investment property based on
estimated fair value at the acquisition date.
In addition, we have a 50.0% noncontrolling interest in a European property management and
development company that provides services to the Designer Outlet properties and third parties.
As of December 31, 2018, our legal percentage ownership interests in these properties ranged
from 45% to 94%.
We also have minority interests in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own or have
interests in and operate nine luxury outlets located throughout Europe and we have a direct minority
ownership in three of those outlets. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the carrying value of these equity
instruments was $140.8 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets.
Asian Joint Ventures    
We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in Japan through a joint venture with
Mitsubishi Estate Co., Ltd. We have a 40% noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The
carrying amount of our investment in this joint venture was $232.1 million and $230.3 million as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, including all related components of accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss). We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in South Korea
through a joint venture with Shinsegae International Co. We have a 50% noncontrolling ownership
interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our investment in this joint venture was
$166.3 million and $149.1 million as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively, including all related
components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Summary Financial Information
A summary of our equity method investments and share of income from such investments,
excluding Klépierre, Aéropostale, ABG, and HBS, follows. During 2017, we disposed of our interest in
one retail property.  During 2016, we disposed of our interests in four retail properties and our
investments in two multi-family residential assets.
107
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
COMBINED BALANCE SHEETS
     December 31,     December 31,  
  2018  2017  
Assets:        
Investment properties, at cost  $ 18,807,449  $18,328,747  
Less - accumulated depreciation   6,834,633   6,371,363  
   11,972,816   11,957,384  
Cash and cash equivalents   1,076,398   956,084  
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net   445,148   403,125  
Deferred costs and other assets   390,818   355,585  
Total assets  $ 13,885,180  $13,672,178  
Liabilities and Partners’  Deficit:        
Mortgages  $ 15,235,415  $14,784,310  
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenue   976,311   1,033,674  
Other liabilities   344,205   365,857  
Total liabilities   16,555,931   16,183,841  
Preferred units   67,450   67,450  
Partners’  deficit   (2,738,201)   (2,579,113)  
Total liabilities and partners’  deficit  $ 13,885,180  $13,672,178  
Our Share of:        
Partners’  deficit  $ (1,168,216)  $(1,144,620)  
Add: Excess Investment   1,594,198   1,733,063  
Our net Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity  $ 425,982  $ 588,443  
 
“Excess Investment” represents the unamortized difference of our investment over our share of
the equity in the underlying net assets of the joint ventures or other investments acquired and has been
determined to relate to the fair value of the investment property, lease related intangibles, and debt
premiums and discounts. We amortize excess investment over the life of the related depreciable
components of investment properties, typically no greater than 40 years, the terms of the applicable
leases and the applicable debt maturity, respectively. The amortization is included in the reported
amount of income from unconsolidated entities.
108
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
As of December 31, 2018, scheduled principal repayments on joint venture properties’ mortgage
indebtedness are as follows:
   
2019     $ 552,914  
2020   1,114,394  
2021   2,272,043  
2022   1,831,834  
2023   1,138,416  
Thereafter   8,367,996  
Total principal maturities   15,277,597  
Net unamortized debt premium   2,225  
Debt issuance costs   (44,407)  
Total mortgages and unsecured indebtedness  $15,235,415  
This debt becomes due in installments over various terms extending through 2035 with interest
rates ranging from 0.31% to 11.59% and a weighted average interest rate of 4.05% at December 31,
2018.
109
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
COMBINED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
       
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
  2018     2017     2016  
REVENUE:                          
Minimum rent  $1,949,523  $1,868,613  $1,823,674  
Overage rent   230,145   210,909   200,638  
Tenant reimbursements   880,042   860,778   862,155  
Other income   326,575   290,515   237,782  
Total revenue   3,386,285   3,230,815   3,124,249  
OPERA TING EXPENSES:           
Property operating   590,921   551,885   538,002  
Depreciation and amortization   652,968   640,286   588,666  
Real estate taxes   259,567   245,646   239,917  
Repairs and maintenance   87,408   81,309   76,380  
Advertising and promotion   87,349   86,480   88,956  
Provision for credit losses   14,042   6,645   7,603  
Other   187,292   184,037   183,435  
Total operating expenses   1,879,547   1,796,288   1,722,959  
Operating Income Before Other Items   1,506,738   1,434,527   1,401,290  
Interest expense   (663,693)   (593,062)   (585,958)  
Gain (loss) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests
in unconsolidated entities, net   33,367   (2,239)   101,051  
Net Income  $876,412  $839,226  $916,383  
Third-Party Investors’  Share of Net Income  $436,767  $424,533  $452,844  
Our Share of Net Income  $439,645  $414,693  $463,539  
Amortization of Excess Investment   (85,252)   (89,804)   (94,213)  
Our Share of (Gain) Loss on Sale or Disposal of, or Recovery on,
Assets and Interests in Unconsolidated Entities, net   (12,513)   1,342   (22,636)  
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of, or Recovery on, Assets
and Interests Included in Other Income in the Consolidated
Financial Statements    —   —  (36,153)  
Income from Unconsolidated Entities  $341,880  $326,231  $310,537  
 
Our share of income from unconsolidated entities in the above table, aggregated with our share of
results of Klépierre, Aéropostale, ABG, and HBS, is presented in income from unconsolidated entities in
the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Unless
otherwise noted, our share of the gain or loss on sale or disposal of assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities, net is reflected within gain upon acquisition of controlling interests, sale or
disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
110
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
8. Indebtedness and Derivative Financial Instruments
Our mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding the impact of derivative instruments,
consist of the following as of December 31:
     2018     2017  
Fixed-Rate Debt:        
Mortgage notes, including $11,822 and $16,869 of net premiums and $14,522
and $16,106 of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest
and maturity of 3.91% and 5.6 years at December 31, 2018.  $6,099,787  $6,020,552  
Unsecured notes, including $44,691 and $51,657 of net discounts and $58,822
and $68,535 of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest
and maturity of 3.18% and 7.2 years at December 31, 2018.   15,535,468   16,375,713  
Commercial Paper (see below)   758,681   978,467  
Total Fixed-Rate Debt   22,393,936   23,374,732  
Variable-Rate Debt:        
Mortgages notes, including $5,901 and $8,988 of debt issuance costs,
respectively . Weighted average interest and maturity of 3.15% and 3.1 years at
December 31, 2018.   736,274   883,781  
Credit Facility (see below), including $16,930 and $17,106 of debt issuance costs,
respectively , at December 31, 2018.   108,070   305,530  
Total V ariable-Rate Debt   844,344   1,189,311  
Other Debt Obligations   67,255   68,420  
Total Mortgages and Unsecured Indebtedness  $23,305,535  $24,632,463  
 
General.  Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non‑financial
covenants. If we were to fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure
periods, the debt maturity could be accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender,
including adjustments to the applicable interest rate. As of December 31, 2018, we were in compliance
with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2018, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 45 non‑recourse
mortgage notes secured by mortgages on 48 properties, including two separate pools of cross‑defaulted
and cross‑collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross‑default
provisions, a default under any mortgage included in the cross‑defaulted pool may constitute a default
under all mortgages within that pool and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each
property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt instruments contain financial and other
non‑financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as collateral for that debt. If the
applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with these
covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their collateral. At
December 31, 2018, the applicable borrowers under these non‑recourse mortgage notes were in
compliance with all covenants where non‑compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect
to applicable cross‑default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity
or results of operations.
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2018, our unsecured debt consisted of $15.6 billion of senior unsecured notes of
the Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Credit Facility, and $758.7 million
outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper program, or
Commercial Paper program. 
On December 31, 2018, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.6 billion under
the Credit Facility and the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or
Supplemental Facility, and together with
111
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
the Credit Facility, the Credit Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit
Facilities during the year ended December 31, 2018 was $423.1 million and the weighted average
outstanding balance was $238.1 million. Letters of credit of $11.3 million were outstanding under the
Credit Facilities as of December 31, 2018.
The Credit Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion
during its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian
dollars and Australian dollars.  Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of
the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined.  The initial maturity date of the Credit Facility is June
30, 2021 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option, subject to our
continued compliance with the terms thereof.  The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus
77.5 basis points with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
On February 15, 2018, the Operating Partnership amended and extended the Supplemental
Facility. The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5
billion during its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling,
Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was
extended to June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2023 at our sole
option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the
Supplemental Facility was reduced to LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points from LIBOR plus 80 basis points,
with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program. On November 14,
2018, we amended the Commercial Paper program to increase the initial borrowing capacity of $1.0
billion to $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue
unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes
issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership
and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership.  Notes will be sold under customary terms in the U.S.
and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee
described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior
indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit Facilities and if necessary or
appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts
outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2018, we had
$758.7 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar
denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of 2.49%.  These borrowings have a weighted
average maturity date of February 20, 2019 and reduce amounts otherwise available under the Credit
Facilities.
On January 3, 2018, the Operating Partnership redeemed at par $750.0 million of senior
unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 1.50%.
On July 10, 2018, the Operating Partnership repaid Yen-denominated borrowings of $201.3 million
(U.S. dollar equivalent) on the Credit Facility.    
On February 1, 2019, the Operating Partnership repaid at maturity $600.0 million of senior
unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%.
Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $6.8 billion and $6.9 billion at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, we repaid a mortgage loan of $86.6 million with an
interest rate of 7.79%.
On July 30, 2018, Noventa di Piave Designer Outlet, in which we own a 90% interest, refinanced
its €110.0 million, 1.68% variable rate mortgage loan maturing in 2020 with a €260.0 million, 2.00%
fixed rate mortgage loan that matures in 2025.
On September 25, 2018, as discussed in Note 7, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The
Outlets at Orange from our joint venture partner, resulting in the consolidation of the existing fixed rate
mortgage loan of $215.0 million. The loan matures on April 1, 2024 and bears interest at 4.22%.
112
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Debt Maturity and Other
Our scheduled principal repayments on indebtedness as of December 31, 2018 are as follows:
   
2019  $1,416,309 (1)
2020   1,972,316  
2021   3,146,997  
2022   3,596,138  
2023   1,869,674  
Thereafter   11,365,890  
Total principal maturities   23,367,324  
Net unamortized debt premium   (32,869)  
Debt issuance costs, net   (96,175)  
Other Debt Obligations   67,255  
Total mortgages and unsecured indebtedness  $23,305,535  
 
(1) Includes $600.0 million aggregate principal amount of 2.20% senior unsecured notes repaid at
maturity on February 1, 2019 and $758.7 million in Global Commercial Paper - USD.
Our cash paid for interest in each period, net of any amounts capitalized, was as follows:
  For the Year Ended December 31,  
     2018     2017     2016  
Cash paid for interest  $811,971  $814,729  $887,118  
Derivative Financial Instruments
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long‑term
debt obligations. We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management
strategy by a combination of interest rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of
variable rate debt. We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of certain foreign
operations. Our intent is to offset gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposures, with gains
and losses on the derivative contracts hedging these exposures. We do not enter into either interest rate
protection or foreign currency rate protection agreements for speculative purposes.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of an anticipated debt issuance. Upon
completion of the debt issuance, the fair value of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt
agreement.
The unamortized loss on our treasury locks and terminated hedges recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) was $3.0 million and $10.1 million as of December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.  Within the next year, we expect to reclassify to earnings approximately $4.3 million of
losses related to terminated interest rate swaps from the current balance held in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss).
113
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Debt Issuance Costs
Our debt issuance costs consist primarily of financing fees we incurred in order to obtain long-
term financing. We record amortization of debt issuance costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of
the respective loans or agreements. Details of those debt issuance costs as of December 31 are as
follows:
     2018     2017
Debt issuance costs  $204,189  $200,646
Accumulated amortization   (108,014)   (89,912)
Debt issuance costs, net  $ 96,175  $110,734
We report amortization of debt issuance costs, amortization of premiums, and accretion of
discounts as part of interest expense. We amortize debt premiums and discounts, which are included in
mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, over the remaining terms of the related debt instruments.
These debt premiums or discounts arise either at the time of the debt issuance or as part of purchase
accounting for the fair value of debt assumed in acquisitions. The accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income include amortization as follows:
   For the Year Ended December 31,
     2018    2017    2016
Amortization of debt issuance costs  $21,445  $21,707  $21,703
Amortization of debt discounts/(premiums)   1,618   1,357   (14,583)
Fair Value of Debt
The carrying value of our variable‑rate mortgages and other loans approximates their fair values.
We estimate the fair values of consolidated fixed‑rate mortgages using cash flows discounted at current
borrowing rates and other indebtedness using cash flows discounted at current market rates. We
estimate the fair values of consolidated fixed‑rate unsecured notes using quoted market prices, or, if no
quoted market prices are available, we use quoted market prices for securities with similar terms and
maturities. The book value of our consolidated fixed‑rate mortgages and unsecured indebtedness
including commercial paper was $22.4 billion and $23.4 billion as of December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively. The fair values of these financial instruments and the related discount rate assumptions as
of December 31 are summarized as follows:
  December 31,  December 31,   
     2018     2017      
Fair value of fixed rate mortgages and unsecured
indebtedness     $ 22,323  $ 24,003         
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for fixed rate mortgages   4.55 % 4.25 % 
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for unsecured
indebtedness   4.50 % 4.10 % 
 
114
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
9. Rentals under Operating Leases
Future minimum rentals to be received under non‑cancelable tenant operating leases for each of
the next five years and thereafter, excluding tenant reimbursements of operating expenses and
percentage rent based on tenant sales volume as of December 31, 2018 are as follows:
  
2019     $2,864,804
2020   2,596,538
2021   2,300,681
2022   1,989,319
2023   1,609,389
Thereafter   3,791,543
  $15,152,274
 
10. Equity
Simon’s Board of Directors is authorized to reclassify excess common stock into one or more
additional classes and series of capital stock, to establish the number of shares in each class or series
and to fix the preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to
dividends, and qualifications and terms and conditions of redemption of such class or series, without
any further vote or action by the stockholders. The issuance of additional classes or series of capital
stock may have the effect of delaying, deferring or preventing a change in control of us without further
action of the stockholders. The ability to issue additional classes or series of capital stock, while
providing flexibility in connection with possible acquisitions and other corporate purposes, could have
the effect of making it more difficult for a third party to acquire, or of discouraging a third party from
acquiring, a majority of Simon’s outstanding voting stock.
Holders of common stock are entitled to one vote for each share held of record on all matters
submitted to a vote of stockholders, other than for the election of directors. The holders of Simon’s
Class B common stock have the right to elect up to four members of Simon’s Board of Directors. All
8,000 outstanding shares of the Class B common stock are subject to two voting trusts as to which
Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares of Class B common stock convert
automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the occurrence of certain events
and can be converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Common Stock and Unit Issuances and Repurchases
In 2018, Simon issued 92,732 shares of common stock to two limited partners of the Operating
Partnership in exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the
Operating Partnership. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Operating Partnership redeemed
454,704 units from eight limited partners for $81.5 million in cash.  These transactions increased
Simon’s ownership interest in the Operating Partnership.
On September 25, 2018, the Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units in connection with the
acquisition of the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange, as discussed in Note 4.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the
previously authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February
11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the new
program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period
ending February 11, 2021.  Simon may repurchase the shares in the open market or in privately
negotiated transactions as market conditions warrant.  During the year ended December 31, 2018,
Simon repurchased 2,275,194 shares at an average price of $155.64 per share as part of this
program.  During the year ended December 31, 2017, Simon repurchased 2,468,630 shares at an
average price of $164.87 per share as part of this program.  As Simon repurchases shares under this
program, the Operating Partnership repurchases an equal number of units from Simon.
115
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Temporary Equity
Simon
Simon classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that Simon
could be required to redeem the security for cash irrespective of the probability of such a possibility. As
a result, Simon classifies one series of preferred units in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties in temporary equity. Each of these securities is discussed further
below.
Limited Partners’ Preferred Interest in the Operating Partnership and Noncontrolling
Redeemable Interests in Properties.  The redemption features of the preferred units in the Operating
Partnership contain provisions which could require the Operating Partnership to settle the redemption in
cash. As a result, this series of preferred units in the Operating Partnership remains classified outside
permanent equity.
The remaining interests in a property or portfolio of properties which are redeemable at the option
of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside Simon’s control, are accounted for as temporary
equity. The carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount
assuming the instrument is redeemable at the balance sheet date. Changes in the redemption value of
the underlying noncontrolling interest are recorded and presented within accumulated deficit in the
consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit equivalents and other. There were no
noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of December 31, 2018 and
2017.  The following table summarizes the preferred units in the Operating Partnership and the amount
of the noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.
     2018     2017  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000 units authorized, 255,373
issued and outstanding  $25,537  $25,537  
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties   204,626   164,943  
Limited partners’  preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties  $230,163  $190,480  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.  This series of preferred units accrues
cumulative quarterly distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually. The preferred units are redeemable by the
Operating Partnership upon the death of the survivor of the original holders, or the transfer of any
preferred units to any person or entity other than the persons or entities entitled to the benefits of the
original holder. The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus accrued
and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully registered shares of common stock at our
election. In the event of the death of a holder of the preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax
triggering events applicable to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the
Operating Partnership to redeem the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the option
of the Operating Partnership in either cash or shares of common stock.  These preferred units have a
carrying value of $25.5 million and are included in limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating
Partnership in the consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
The Operating Partnership
The Operating Partnership classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the
possibility that the Operating Partnership could be required to redeem the security for cash, irrespective
of the probability of such a possibility.  As a result, the Operating Partnership classifies one series of
preferred units and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties in temporary equity.  Each of these
securities is discussed further below.
116
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Noncontrolling Redeemable Interests in Properties   Redeemable instruments, which
typically represent the remaining interest in a property or portfolio of properties, and which are
redeemable at the option of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside our control, are
accounted for as temporary equity.  The carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the
redemption amount assuming the instrument is redeemable at the balance sheet date.  Changes in the
redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest are recorded within equity and are presented
in the consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit equivalents and other.  There are no
noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of December 31, 2018 and
2017.  The following table summarizes the preferred units and the amount of the noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.    
     2018     2017  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000 units authorized, 255,373
issued and outstanding  $25,537  $25,537  
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties   204,626   164,943  
Total preferred units, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties  $230,163  $190,480  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units   The 7.50% preferred units accrue cumulative
quarterly distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually.  We may redeem the preferred units upon the death of
the survivor of the original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other
than the persons or entities entitled to the benefits of the original holder.  The redemption price is the
liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in
cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon at our election.  In the event of the death of a
holder of the 7.5% preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax triggering events applicable to the
holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the Operating Partnership to redeem
the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the Operating Partnership’s option in either
cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon.  These preferred units have a carrying value
of $25.5 million and are included in preferred units, at liquidation value in the consolidated balance
sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017.  
Permanent Equity
Simon
Preferred Stock.  Dividends on all series of preferred stock are calculated based upon the
preferred stock’s preferred return multiplied by the preferred stock’s corresponding liquidation value. The
Operating Partnership pays preferred distributions to Simon equal to the dividends Simon pays on the
preferred stock issued.
Series J 8/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock.  Dividends accrue quarterly at an
annual rate of 8/8% per share. Simon can redeem this series, in whole or in part, on or after
October 15, 2027 at a redemption price of $50.00 per share, plus accumulated and unpaid dividends.
This preferred stock was issued at a premium of $7.5 million. The unamortized premium included in the
carrying value of the preferred stock at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $2.9 million and $3.2 million,
respectively.
The Operating Partnership
Series J 8/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.     Distributions accrue quarterly at an
annual rate of 8/8% per unit on the Series J 8/8% preferred units, or Series J preferred units.  Simon
owns all of the Series J preferred units which have the same economic rights and preferences of an
outstanding series of Simon preferred stock.  The Operating Partnership can redeem this series, in
whole or in part, when Simon can redeem the related preferred stock, on and after October 15, 2027 at
a redemption price of $50.00 per unit, plus accumulated and unpaid distributions. The Series J preferred
units were issued at a premium of $7.5 million.  The unamortized premium included in the carrying value
of the preferred units at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $2.9 million and $3.2 million,
respectively.  There are 1,000,000 Series J preferred units authorized and 796,948 Series J preferred
units issued and outstanding.
117
 3
3
3
3 3
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Other Equity Activity
The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended.  This plan, or the 1998
plan, provides for the grant of equity‑based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of
options to purchase shares, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock grants and performance‑based
unit awards. Options may be granted which are qualified as “incentive stock options” within the meaning
of Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code and options which are not so qualified. An aggregate of
16,300,000 shares of common stock have been reserved for issuance under the 1998 plan.
The 1998 plan is administered by the Compensation Committee of Simon’s Board of Directors, or
the Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee determines which eligible individuals may
participate and the type, extent and terms of the awards to be granted to them. In addition, the
Compensation Committee interprets the 1998 plan and makes all other determinations deemed
advisable for its administration. Options granted to employees become exercisable over the period
determined by the Compensation Committee. The exercise price of an employee option may not be less
than the fair market value of the shares on the date of grant. Employee options generally vest over a
three‑year period and expire ten years from the date of grant.
Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive
awards under the 1998 plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000,
and an annual restricted stock award with a grant date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive
annual retainers for the Company’s Audit, Compensation, and Governance and Nominating Committees
of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000, respectively.  Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service on
the Audit, Compensation and Governance and Nominating Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and
$10,000, respectively. The Lead Director receives an annual retainer of $50,000.  These retainers are
paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of
restricted stock (including reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation
Plan until the director retires, dies or becomes disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The
directors may vote and are entitled to receive dividends on the underlying shares; however, any
dividends on the shares of restricted stock must be reinvested in shares of common stock and held in
the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the shares of restricted stock are delivered to the former
director.
Stock Based Compensation
Awards under our stock based compensation plans primarily take the form of LTIP units and
restricted stock grants. Restricted stock and awards under the LTIP programs are either market or
performance-based and are based on various individual, corporate and business unit performance
measures as further described below. The expense related to these programs, net of amounts
capitalized, is included within home and regional office costs and general and administrative costs in the
accompanying statements of operations and comprehensive income.
LTIP Programs.    The Compensation Committee has approved long‑term, performance based
incentive compensation programs, or the LTIP programs, for certain senior executive officers. Awards
under the LTIP programs take the form of LTIP units, a form of limited partnership interest issued by the
Operating Partnership, which are subject to the participant maintaining employment with us through
certain dates and other conditions as described in the applicable award agreements. Awarded LTIP
units not earned in accordance with the conditions set forth in the applicable award agreements are
forfeited. Earned and fully vested LTIP units are equivalent to units of the Operating Partnership. During
the performance period, participants are entitled to receive distributions on the LTIP units awarded to
them equal to 10% of the regular quarterly distributions paid on a unit of the Operating Partnership. As a
result, we account for these LTIP units as participating securities under the two‑class method of
computing earnings per share.
Awards under the LTIP program for 2016 will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to
which, applicable total shareholder return, or TSR, performance measures, as defined in the applicable
award agreements, are achieved during the applicable performance periods. Once earned, LTIP units
are subject to a two-year vesting period. One‑half of
118
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
the earned LTIP units will vest on January 1 of each of the second and third years following the end of
the applicable performance period. 
In 2018, the Compensation Committee established and granted awards under a redesigned LTIP
program, or the 2018 LTIP program.  Awards under the 2018 LTIP program were granted in two
tranches, Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP units.  Each of the Tranche A LTIP units and the
Tranche B LTIP units will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to which, the respective goals
based on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share or Relative TSR Goal performance criteria, as
defined in the applicable award agreements, are achieved during the applicable two-year and three-year
performance periods of the Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP units, respectively.  One‑half of the
earned Tranche A LTIP units will vest on January 1, 2021 with the other one-half vesting on January 1,
2022. All of the earned Tranche B LTIP units will vest on January 1, 2022.
The grant date fair value of the portion of the LTIP units based on achieving the target FFO
performance criteria is $6.1 million for the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units, for a total
of $12.1 million.  The 2018 LTIP program provides that the value of the FFO-based award may be
adjusted up or down based on the Company’s performance compared to the target FFO performance
criteria and has a maximum potential fair value of $18.2 million.  The value of the FFO-based award is
recorded as expense over the period from the grant date to the date at which the awards, if earned,
would become vested, based on our assessment as to whether it is probable that the performance
criteria will be achieved during the applicable performance periods.
The grant date fair values of any LTIP units based on TSR performance are estimated using a
Monte Carlo model, and the resulting fixed expense is recorded regardless of whether the TSR
performance criteria are achieved if the required service is delivered. The grant date fair values are
being amortized into expense over the period from the grant date to the date at which the awards, if
earned, would become vested.
The Compensation Committee approved LTIP unit grants as shown in the table below. The extent
to which LTIP units were earned, and the aggregate grant date fair value, are as follows:
LTIP Program LTIP Units EarnedGrant Date Fair Value of
TSR AwardGrant Date Target
Value of FFO-
Based Award
2013-2015 L TIP program 466,405 $28.5 million  —
2014-2016 L TIP program 120,314 $27.5 million  —
2015-2017 L TIP program  — $21.6 million  —
2016-2018 L TIP program To be determined in 2019 $22.7 million  —
2018 L TIP program - Tranche A To be determined in 2020 $6.1 million $6.1 million
2018 L TIP program - Tranche B To be determined in 2021 $6.1 million $6.1 million
 
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization and forfeitures, related to these LTIP
programs of approximately $12.0 million, $14.0 million, and $31.0 million for the years ended December
31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Restricted Stock.  The 1998 plan also provides for shares of restricted stock to be granted to
certain employees at no cost to those employees, subject to achievement of individual performance and
certain financial and return‑based performance measures established by the Compensation Committee
related to the most recent year’s performance. Once granted, the shares of restricted stock then vest
annually over a three‑year or a four‑year period (as defined in the award). The cost of restricted stock
grants, which is based upon the stock’s fair market value on the grant date, is recognized as expense
ratably over the vesting period. Through December 31, 2018 a total of 5,786,423 shares of restricted
stock, net of
119
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
forfeitures, have been awarded under the 1998 plan. Information regarding restricted stock awards is
summarized in the following table for each of the years presented:
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
  2018  2017  2016  
Shares of restricted stock awarded during the year , net
of forfeitures   51,756   76,660   63,324  
Weighted average fair value of shares granted during
the year  $153.24  $170.81  $209.16  
Annual amortization  $12,029  $13,911  $12,024  
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization, related to restricted stock for
employees and non-employee directors of approximately $7.8 million, $9.0 million, and $9.1 million for
the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Other Compensation Arrangements.  On July 6, 2011, in connection with the execution of an
employment agreement, the Compensation Committee granted David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief
Executive Officer and President, a retention award in the form of 1,000,000 LTIP units, or the Award, for
his continued service through July 5, 2019. Effective December 31, 2013, the Award was modified, or
the Current Award, and as a result the LTIP units would become earned and eligible to vest based on
the attainment of Company‑based performance goals, in addition to the service‑based vesting
requirement included in the original Award. The Current Award does not contain an opportunity for
Mr. Simon to receive additional LTIP units above and beyond the original Award should our performance
exceed the higher end of the performance criteria. The performance criteria of the Current Award are
based on the attainment of specific FFO per share.  Because the performance criteria has been met, a
maximum of  360,000 LTIP units, or the A units, 360,000 LTIP units, or the B units, and 280,000 LTIP
units, or the C units, became earned on December 31, 2015, December 31, 2016 and December 31,
2017, respectively.  If the relevant performance criteria had not been achieved, all or a portion of the
Current Award would have been forfeited. The earned A units vested on January 1, 2018, earned B units
vested on January 1, 2019 and earned C units will vest on June 30, 2019, subject to Mr. Simon’s
continued employment through such applicable date. The grant date fair value of the retention award of
$120.3 million is being recognized as expense over the eight‑year term of his employment agreement
on a straight‑line basis based on the applicable vesting periods of the A units, B units and C units. 
We also maintain a tax‑qualified retirement 401(k) savings plan and offer no other post‑retirement
or post‑employment benefits to our employees.
Exchange Rights
Simon
Limited partners in the Operating Partnership have the right to exchange all or any portion of their
units for shares of common stock on a one‑for‑one basis or cash, as determined by Simon’s Board of
Directors. The amount of cash to be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is
selected will be based on the trading price of Simon’s common stock at that time. At December 31,
2018, Simon had reserved 50,643,747 shares of common stock for possible issuance upon the
exchange of units, stock options and Class B common stock.
The Operating Partnership
Limited partners have the right under the partnership agreement to exchange all or any portion of
their units for shares of Simon common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon
in its sole discretion. If Simon selects cash, Simon cannot cause the Operating Partnership to redeem
the exchanged units for cash without contributing cash to the Operating Partnership as partners’ equity
sufficient to effect the redemption.  If sufficient cash is not contributed, Simon will be deemed to have
elected to exchange the units for shares of Simon common stock.  The amount of cash to
120
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading
price of Simon’s common stock at that time. The number of shares of Simon’s common stock issued
pursuant to the exercise of the exchange right will be the same as the number of units exchanged.
11. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation
We are involved from time‑to‑time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the
ordinary course of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental
matters, and litigation in connection with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe
that current proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity, or
results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is considered probable and the amount can be
reasonably estimated.
Subsequent to December 31, 2018, we settled a lawsuit with our former insurance broker, Aon
Risk Services Central Inc., related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010.
In accordance with a previous agreement with the prior co-investor in Opry Mills, a portion of the
settlement was remitted to the co-investor.  Our share of the settlement was approximately $68.0
million, which was recorded as other income in the first quarter of 2019.
Lease Commitments
As of December 31, 2018, a total of 23 of the consolidated properties are subject to ground
leases. The termination dates of these ground leases range from 2019 to 2090. These ground leases
generally require us to make fixed annual rental payments, or a fixed annual rental payment plus a
percentage rent component based upon the revenues or total sales of the property. In addition, we have
several regional office locations that are subject to leases with termination dates ranging from 2019 to
2028. These office leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental payments plus pay our share
of common area, real estate and utility expenses. Some of our ground and office leases include
escalation clauses and renewal options. We incurred ground lease expense and office lease expense,
which are included in other expense and home office and regional expense, respectively, as follows:
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
  2018  2017  2016 
Ground lease expense     $42,670  $40,864  $38,764  
Office lease expense   4,650   4,481   4,105  
Future minimum lease payments due under these leases for years ending December 31,
excluding applicable extension options and renewal options unless reasonably certain of exercise and
any sublease income, are as follows:
  
2019    $ 32,417
2020   32,403
2021   32,686
2022   32,698
2023   32,729
Thereafter   947,886
  $1,110,819
 
121
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
Insurance
We maintain insurance coverage with third party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for
specific layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage
and rental loss insurance on all of our properties in the United States. The initial portion of coverage not
provided by third party carriers is either insured through our wholly‑owned captive insurance company,
Bridgewood Insurance Company, Ltd., or other financial arrangements controlled by us. If required, a
third party carrier has, in turn, agreed to provide evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the
terms and conditions of the carrier’s policy. A similar policy written either through our captive insurance
company or other financial arrangements controlled by us also provides initial coverage for property
insurance and certain windstorm risks at the properties located in coastal windstorm locations.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the
United States on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this
insurance coverage, any threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could adversely affect
our property values, revenues, consumer traffic and tenant sales.
Hurricane Impacts
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico
sustained significant damage as a result of Hurricane Maria.  Due to the conditions on the island, we
were unable to determine a reliable estimate or a range of reliable estimates of the extent of the
damages at these properties at the end of the third quarter of 2017.  During the fourth quarter of 2017,
as additional information became available, we recorded an impairment of approximately $19.0 million
related to damages at these properties, which was offset by an insurance recovery receivable. 
Since the date of the loss, we have received $56.6 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers related to the two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $38.7 million was used for property
restoration and remediation and to reduce the insurance recovery receivable.  In 2018, we recorded
$17.9 million as business interruption proceeds in other income in the accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income.
Guarantees of Indebtedness
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by the joint venture
property, which is non‑recourse to us. As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Operating Partnership
guaranteed joint venture related mortgage indebtedness of $216.1 million and $211.6 million,
respectively (of which we have a right of recovery from our venture partners of $10.8 million). Mortgages
guaranteed by the Operating Partnership are secured by the property of the joint venture which could be
sold in order to satisfy the outstanding obligation and which have estimated fair values in excess of the
guaranteed amount.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Our U.S. Malls, Premium Outlets and The Mills rely heavily upon anchor tenants to attract
customers; however, anchor retailers do not contribute materially to our financial results as many anchor
retailers own their spaces. All material operations are within the United States and no customer or
tenant accounts for 5% or more of our consolidated revenues.
 
122
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
12. Related Party Transactions
Our management company provides management, insurance, and other services to Melvin
Simon & Associates, Inc., a related party, unconsolidated joint ventures, and other non‑owned related
party properties. Amounts for services provided by our management company and its affiliates to our
unconsolidated joint ventures and other related parties were as follows:
   
  For the Year Ended  
  December 31,  
2018 2017 2016
Amounts charged to unconsolidated joint ventures $111,476 $116,447 $138,496
Amounts charged to properties owned by related
parties   4,810   4,812   5,384  
During 2018, 2017 and 2016, we recorded development, royalty and other fee income, net of
elimination, related to our international investments of $16.0 million, $15.5 million and $14.4 million,
respectively. Also during 2018, 2017 and 2016, we received fees related to financing services, net of
elimination, provided to unconsolidated joint ventures of $0.5 million, $1.6 million and $9.1 million,
respectively. The fees related to our international investments and financing activities are included in
other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
123
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
13. Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Quarterly 2018 and 2017 data is summarized in the table below. Quarterly amounts may not sum
to annual amounts due to rounding.
        
     First     Second     Third     Fourth  
  Quarter  Quarter  Quarter  Quarter  
2018              
Total revenue  $1,399,814  $1,388,358  $1,409,005  $1,460,743  
Operating income before other items   701,933   737,675   717,391   754,089  
Consolidated net income   715,524   631,414   642,212   833,192  
Simon Property Group, Inc.              
Net income attributable to common
stockholders  $ 620,654  $ 547,004  $ 556,267  $ 712,796  
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted  $ 2.00  $ 1.77  $ 1.80  $ 2.30  
Weighted average shares outstanding —
Basic and Diluted   310,583,643   309,355,154   309,294,045   309,293,708  
Simon Property Group, L.P .              
Net income attributable to unitholders  $ 714,303  $ 629,822  $ 640,402  $ 821,237  
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted  $ 2.00  $ 1.77  $ 1.80  $ 2.30  
Weighted average units outstanding —
Basic and Diluted   357,446,988   356,181,817   356,073,080   356,396,387  
2017              
Total revenue  $1,345,763  $1,361,548  $1,403,638  $1,427,692  
Operating income before other items   676,671   686,149   690,068   749,452  
Consolidated net income   551,075   441,373   592,635   659,821  
Simon Property Group, Inc.              
Net income attributable to common
stockholders  $ 477,736  $ 381,990  $ 513,783  $ 571,116  
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted  $ 1.53  $ 1.23  $ 1.65  $ 1.84  
Weighted average shares outstanding —
Basic and Diluted   312,809,981   311,579,301   310,853,299   310,855,573  
Simon Property Group, L.P .              
Net income attributable to unitholders  $ 550,006  $ 439,986  $ 591,872  $ 657,774  
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted  $ 1.53  $ 1.23  $ 1.65  $ 1.84 
Weighted average units outstanding —
Basic and Diluted   360,130,442   358,865,806   358,115,572   358,025,108  
 
 
 
124
 
Table of Contents
Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Simon
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Simon maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) that are designed to provide
reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed in the reports that we file or submit
under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods
specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to
Simon’s management, including its Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to
allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Because of inherent limitations, disclosure
controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, and
not absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of Simon’s disclosure controls and
procedures as of December 31, 2018. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and
Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2018, Simon’s disclosure controls and
procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Simon is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as
a process designed by, or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial
officers and effected by Simon’s Board of Directors, management and other personnel, to provide
reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and
includes those policies and procedures that:
·Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
·Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles, and that our receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with
authorizations of our management and directors; and
·Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
acquisition, use or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial
statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or
detect misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the
risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of Simon’s internal control over financial reporting as of December
31, 2018. In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013).
Based on that assessment and criteria, we believe that, as of December 31, 2018, Simon’s internal
control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of Simon's internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2018 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in Simon's internal control over financial reporting (as defined
in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2018 that
have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, Simon's internal control over
financial reporting.
125
 
Table of Contents
The Operating Partnership
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Operating Partnership maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-
15(e) under the Exchange Act) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that information
required to be disclosed in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded,
processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms,
and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our management, including Simon’s
Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding
required disclosures. Because of inherent limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no matter how
well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the
objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of the Operating Partnership’s
disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2018. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2018, the Operating
Partnership’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Operating Partnership is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal
control over financial reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under
the Exchange Act as a process designed by, or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive
and principal financial officers and effected by Simon’s Board of Directors, management and other
personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the
preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
·Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
·Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles, and that our receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with
authorizations of our management and directors; and
·Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
acquisition, use or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial
statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or
detect misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the
risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2018. In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-
Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that assessment and criteria, we believe that, as of December
31, 2018, the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of the Operating Partnership’s internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial
reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended
December 31, 2018 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the
Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting.
126
 
Table of Contents
Item 9B.    Other Information
During the fourth quarter of the year covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, the Audit
Committee of Simon’s Board of Directors approved certain audit, audit-related and non-audit tax
compliance and tax consulting services to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP, our independent
registered public accounting firm. This disclosure is made pursuant to Section 10A(i)(2) of the Exchange
Act as added by Section 202 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Part III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy
statement for Simon’s 2019 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A and the information included under the caption "Executive Officers of the Registrant" in
Part I hereof.
Item 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy
statement for Simon’s 2019 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy
statement for Simon’s 2019 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A.
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy
statement for Simon’s 2019 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A.
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy
statement for Simon’s 2019 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to
Regulation 14A.
The Audit Committee of Simon's Board of Directors pre-approves all audit and permissible non-
audit services to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP, or Ernst & Young, Simon’s and the Operating
Partnership’s independent registered public accounting firm, prior to commencement of services. The
Audit Committee has delegated to the Chairman of the Audit Committee the authority to pre-approve
specific services up to specified individual and aggregate fee amounts. These pre-approval decisions
are presented to the full Audit Committee at the next scheduled meeting after such approvals are
made.  We have incurred fees as shown below for services from Ernst & Young as Simon’s and the
Operating Partnership’s independent registered public accounting firm and for services provided to our
managed consolidated and joint venture properties and our consolidated non-managed properties.
Ernst & Young has advised us that it has billed or will bill these indicated amounts for the following
categories of services for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively:
   2018     2017
Audit Fees (1)  $3,941,000 $3,959,000
Audit Related Fees (2)   5,024,000  5,124,000
Tax Fees (3)   191,000  336,000
All Other Fees    —   —
(1)Audit Fees include fees for the audits of the financial statements and the effectiveness of internal
control over financial reporting for Simon and the Operating Partnership and services associated
with the related SEC registration statements, periodic reports, and other documents issued in
connection with securities offerings.
(2)Audit‑Related Fees include audits of individual or portfolios of properties and schedules to comply
with lender, joint venture partner or contract requirements and due diligence services.  Our share of
these Audit-Related Fees was approximately 60% and 59% for the years ended 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
(3)Tax Fees include fees for international and other tax consulting services and tax return compliance
services associated with the tax returns for certain joint ventures as well as other miscellaneous tax
compliance services.  Our share of these Tax Fees was approximately 59% and 79% for 2018 and
2017, respectively.
127
 
Table of Contents
Part IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
   Page No.
(a) (1) Financial Statements  
  The following consolidated financial statements of Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon
Property Group, L.P . are set forth in Part II, item 8.  
  Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 74
  Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 78
  Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 79
  Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018,
 2017 and 2016 80
  Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2018,  2017
and 2016 81
  Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, L.P .
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 82
  Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 83
  Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018,
 2017 and 2016 84
  Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2018,  2017
and 2016 85
  Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 86
 (2) Financial Statement Schedule  
  Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P . Schedule III — Schedule of
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 136
  Notes to Schedule III 142
  Other financial statement schedules are omitted because they are not applicable or the
required information is shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.  
 (3) Exhibits  
  The Exhibit Index attached hereto is hereby incorporated by reference to this Item. 129
  
  
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
None.
 
128
 
Table of Contents
EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits  
2.1 Separation and Distribution Agreement by and among Simon Property Group, Inc., Simon Property Group, L.P.,
Washington Prime Group Inc. and Washington Prime Group, L.P., dated as of May 27, 2014 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2.1 of the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed May 29, 2014).
   
3.1 Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Simon Property Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Appendix A of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed March 27, 2009).
   
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of Simon Property Group, Inc. as adopted on March 20, 2017 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 24, 2017).
   
3.3 Certificate of Powers, Designations, Preferences and Rights of the 8/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 Par Value (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8‑K filed October 20, 2004).
   
3.4 Certificate of Designation of Series A Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Stock (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed May 15, 2014).
   
3.5 Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Limited Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
   
3.6 Eighth Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Simon Property Group, L.P. dated as of May 8,
2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed
May 9, 2008).
   
3.7 Certificate of Designation of Series B Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Units of Simon Property
Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed August 8, 2014).
   
3.8 Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated March 7, 2007, but effective
as of August 27, 1999, regarding a prior agreement filed under an exhibit 99.1 to Form S-3/A of Simon Property
Group, L.P. on November 20, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed March 16, 2007).
   
3.9 Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated April 29, 2009, but effective
as of October 14, 2004, regarding redemption of the Registrant's Series I Preferred Units (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2009).
   
4.1(a)Indenture, dated as of November 26, 1996, by and among Simon Property Group, L.P. and The Chase Manhattan
Bank, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Registration Statement on
Form S-3 filed October 21, 1996 (Reg. No. 333-11491)).
   
9.1 Second Amended and Restated Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004
between Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., on the one hand and Melvin Simon, Herbert Simon and David Simon on
the other hand (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10‑Q filed May 10, 2004).
   
9.2 Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004 between David Simon, Melvin
Simon and Herbert Simon (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report
on Form 10‑Q filed May 10, 2004).
   
10.1 Form of the Indemnity Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and its directors and officers (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.7 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Form S‑4 filed August 13, 1998 (Reg. No. 333‑61399)).
   
10.2 Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of September 24, 1998, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and the
persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8‑K filed October 9, 1998).
   
129
 3
Table of Contents
Exhibits  
10.3 Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of August 27, 1999, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and the
persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Registration Statement on Form S‑3 filed
March 24, 2004 (Reg. No. 333‑113884)).
   
10.4 Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of November 14, 1997, by and between O’Connor Retail Partners, L.P. and
Simon DeBartolo Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 of the Registration Statement on Form S‑3
filed December 7, 2001 (Reg. No. 333‑74722)).
   
10.5* Simon Property Group, L.P. Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 10, 2014).
   
10.6* Form of Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock Incentive
Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10‑K filed
March 16, 2005).
   
10.7* Form of Performance‑Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on
Form 10‑K filed February 28, 2007).
   
10.8* Form of Non-Employee Director Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K filed March 16, 2005).
   
10.9* Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon effective as of July 6, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed July 7,
2011).
   
10.10* First Amendment to Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon, dated as of
March 29, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8‑K filed April 4, 2013).
   
10.11* Non‑Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan dated as of December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q filed November 5, 2009).
   
10.12* Amendment — 2008 Performance Based‑Restricted Stock Agreement dated as of March 6, 2009 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q filed November 5, 2009).
   
10.13* Certificate of Designation of Series 2010 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
   
10.14* Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Three Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8‑K filed March 19, 2010).
   
10.15* Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Two Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8‑K filed March 19, 2010).
   
10.16* Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (One Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8‑K filed March 19, 2010).
   
10.17* Certificate of Designation of Series CEO LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
   
10.18* Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of Simon
Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed July 7, 2011).
   
130
 
Table of Contents
Exhibits  
10.19* First Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement dated as of December 22, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.24 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10‑K filed
February 28, 2012).
   
10.20* Second Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of March 29, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 4,
2013).
   
10.21* Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of December 31,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed
January 2, 2014).
 
10.22* Certificate of Designation of Series 2011 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
   
10.23* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2011 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed July 7, 2011).
   
10.24* Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 11, 2012).
   
10.25* Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
May 7, 2014).
   
10.26* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q filed May 8, 2012).
   
10.27* Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 28, 2014).
   
10.28* Certificate of Designation of Series 2013 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2013).
   
10.29* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2013 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 4, 2013).
   
10.30* Form of Simon Property Group Executive Officer LTIP Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 28, 2014).
   
10.31* Simon Property Group CEO LTIP Unit Adjustment Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed April 28, 2014).
   
10.32* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2014 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
   
10.33* Certificate of Designation of Series 2014 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
   
10.34 Amended and Restated $2,750,000,000 Credit Agreement dated as of March 2, 2015 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8‑K filed March 3, 2015).
   
10.35* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2015 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q/A for the quarter ended March 31, 2015 filed on
January 13, 2016).
   
131
 
Table of Contents
Exhibits  
10.36* Certificate of Designation of Series 2015 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended March 31, 2015
filed on January 13, 2016).
   
10.37* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2016 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
   
10.38* Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2016 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10‑Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
   
10.39 Amendment No. 1 to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 6, 2016 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 7, 2016).
   
10.40 Amended and Restated $4,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 17, 2017 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 20, 2017).
   
10.41 Amended and Restated $3,500,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of February 15, 2018 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
   
10.42* Form of Simon Property Group Series 2018 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10‑Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
   
10.43* Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2018 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on
Form 10‑Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
   
21.1 List of Subsidiaries of Simon Property Group Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P.
   
23.1 Simon Property Group, Inc. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
   
23.2 Simon Property Group, L.P. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
   
31.1 Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a‑14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
31.2 Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a‑14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
31.3 Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a‑14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
31.4 Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a‑14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
32.1 Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
32.2 Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes‑Oxley Act of 2002.
   
101.INS XBRL Instance Document
   
101.SCH XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
   
101.CAL XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
   
132
 
Table of Contents
Exhibits  
101.LAB XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
   
101.PRE XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
   
101.DEF XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
(a)    Does not include supplemental indentures that authorize the issuance of debt securities series,
none of which exceeds 10% of the total assets of Simon Property Group, L.P. on a consolidated
basis. Simon Property Group, L.P. agrees to file copies of any such supplemental indentures upon
the request of the Commission.
*        Represents a management contract, or compensatory plan, contract or arrangement required to
be filed pursuant to Regulation S‑K.
 
 
133
 
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each
Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly
authorized.
  
 SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
   
 By/s/ DAVID SIMON
  David Simon
  Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
  Executive Officer and President
  Date: February 22, 2019
   
  SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
   
  /s/ DAVID SIMON
  David Simon
  Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Officer and President of Simon
Property Group, Inc., General Partner
  Date: February 22, 2019
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed
below by the following persons on behalf of Simon Property Group, Inc., for itself and in its capacity as
General Partner of Simon Property Group, L.P., and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature  Capacity  Date
     
/s/ DA VID SIMON  Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Of ficer (Principal Executive
Officer) and President February 22, 2019
David Simon  
     
/s/ HERBER T SIMON  Chairman Emeritus and Director  February 22, 2019Herbert Simon  
     
/s/ RICHARD S. SOKOLOV  Vice Chairman and Director  February 22, 2019Richard S. Sokolov  
     
/s/ LARR Y C. GLASSCOCK  Director  February 22, 2019Larry C. Glasscock  
     
/s/ REUBEN S. LEIBOWITZ  Director  February 22, 2019Reuben S. Leibowitz  
     
/s/ J. ALBER T SMITH, JR.  Director  February 22, 2019J. Albert Smith, Jr .  
     
/s/ KAREN N. HORN  Director  February 22, 2019Karen N. Horn  
     
/s/ ALLAN HUBBARD  Director  February 22, 2019Allan Hubbard  
     
/s/ DANIEL  C. SMITH  Director  February 22, 2019Daniel C. Smith  
     
134
 
Table of Contents
Signature  Capacity  Date
     
/s/ GAR Y M. RODKIN  Director  February 22, 2019Gary M. Rodkin  
     
/s/ GL YN F . AEPPEL  Director  February 22, 2019Glyn F . Aeppel  
     
/s/ STEF AN M. SELIG  Director  February 22, 2019Stefan M. Selig  
     
/s/ MAR TA R. STEW ART  Director  February 22, 2019Marta R. Stewart  
     
/s/ BRIAN J. MCDADE  Executive V ice President, Chief Financial
Officer (Principal Financial Of ficer) and
Treasurer February 22, 2019
Brian J. McDade  
     
/s/ ADAM J. REUILLE  Senior V ice President and Chief
Accounting Of ficer (Principal Accounting
Officer) February 22, 2019
Adam J. Reuille  
     
  
 
 
135
 
Table of Contents
SCHEDULE III
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
 Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
             Cost Capitalized                
             Subsequent to  Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
       Initial Cost (3)  Acquisition (3)  Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
          Buildings and     Buildings and     Buildings and     Accumulated  or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)     Land  Improvements  Land  Improvements  Land  Improvements  Total (1)  Depreciation (2)   Acquisition  
Malls                                 
Barton Creek
Square  Austin, TX  $  — $2,903  $ 20,929  $7,983  $ 74,248  $10,886  $ 95,177  $106,063  $ 60,183  1981  
Battlefield Mall  Springfield, MO   117,500   3,919   27,231   3,000   66,714   6,919   93,945   100,864   70,821  1970  
Bay Park Square  Green Bay , WI    —  6,358   25,623   4,106   26,528   10,464   52,151   62,615   32,956  1980  
Brea Mall  Brea (Los
Angeles), CA    —  39,500   209,202   2,993   71,244   42,493   280,446   322,939   141,980  1998 (4)
Broadway Square  Tyler, TX    —  11,306   32,431    —  34,660   11,306   67,091   78,397   36,959  1994 (4)
Burlington Mall  Burlington
(Boston), MA    —  46,600   303,618   27,458   163,037   74,058   466,655   540,713   224,029  1998 (4)
Castleton Square  Indianapolis, IN    —  26,250   98,287   7,434   79,746   33,684   178,033   211,717   110,241  1972  
Cielo V ista Mall  El Paso, TX    —  1,005   15,262   608  55,602   1,613   70,864   72,477   47,039  1974  
College Mall  Bloomington, IN    —  1,003   16,245   720  71,898   1,723   88,143   89,866   43,238  1965  
Columbia Center  Kennewick, W A    —  17,441   66,580    —  33,367   17,441   99,947   117,388   58,618  1987  
Copley Place  Boston, MA    —   —  378,045    —  193,429    —  571,474   571,474   222,354  2002 (4)
Coral Square  Coral Springs
(Miami), FL    —  13,556   93,630    —  20,734   13,556   114,364   127,920   87,184  1984  
Cordova Mall  Pensacola, FL    —  18,626   73,091   7,321   68,923   25,947   142,014   167,961   71,696  1998 (4)
Domain, The  Austin, TX   184,739   40,436   197,010    —  149,273   40,436   346,283   386,719   150,030  2005  
Empire Mall  Sioux Falls, SD   190,000   35,998   192,186    —  27,742   35,998   219,928   255,926   53,845  1998 (5)
Fashion Mall at
Keystone, The  Indianapolis, IN    —   —  120,579   29,145   101,035   29,145   221,614   250,759   117,915  1997 (4)
Firewheel Town
Center  Garland (Dallas),
TX    —  8,438   82,716    —  28,593   8,438   111,309   119,747   60,730  2004  
Forum Shops at
Caesars, The  Las V egas, NV    —   —  276,567    —  265,368    —  541,935   541,935   260,765  1992  
Greenwood Park
Mall  Greenwood
(Indianapolis), IN    —  2,423   23,445   5,253   119,671   7,676   143,116   150,792   84,288  1979  
Haywood Mall  Greenville, SC    —  11,585   133,893    6  41,791   11,591   175,684   187,275   106,328  1998 (4)
Ingram Park Mall  San Antonio, TX   128,060   733  16,972   37  39,964   770  56,936   57,706   30,283  1979  
King of Prussia  King of Prussia
(Philadelphia), P A   —  175,063   1,128,200    —  356,883   175,063   1,485,083   1,660,146   351,350  2003 (5)
La Plaza Mall  McAllen, TX    —  87,912   9,828   6,569   172,054   94,481   181,882   276,363   41,344  1976  
Lakeline Mall  Cedar Park
(Austin), TX    —  10,088   81,568   14  26,260   10,102   107,828   117,930   60,355  1995  
Lenox Square  Atlanta, GA    —  38,058   492,411    —  129,085   38,058   621,496   659,554   336,512  1998 (4)
Livingston Mall  Livingston (New
York), NJ    —  22,214   105,250    —  47,205   22,214   152,455   174,669   83,004  1998 (4)
Mall of Georgia  Buford (Atlanta),
GA    —  47,492   326,633    —  13,987   47,492   340,620   388,112   173,568  1999 (5)
 
136
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
 Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
                   
              Cost Capitalized                
              Subsequent to   Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
        Initial Cost (3)   Acquisition (3)   Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
                       Buildings and            Buildings and            Buildings and            Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Total (1)      Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
McCain Mall     N. Little Rock,
AR  $  —    $  —    $ 9,515     $10,530     $ 28,402     $10,530     $ 37,917     $48,447     $ 14,607     1973 
Menlo Park
Mall  Edison (New
York), NJ    —  65,684   223,252    —  76,405   65,684   299,657   365,341   171,764  1997(4)
Midland
Park Mall  Midland, TX   75,464   687  9,213   2,121   31,348   2,808   40,561   43,369   21,607  1980 
Miller Hill
Mall  Duluth, MN    —  2,965   18,092   1,811   43,807   4,776   61,899   66,675   42,841  1973 
Montgomery
Mall  North W ales
(Philadelphia),
PA   100,000   27,105   86,915    —  64,352   27,105   151,267   178,372   66,982  2004
(5)
North East
Mall  Hurst (Dallas),
TX    —  128  12,966   19,010   147,128   19,138   160,094   179,232   110,442  1971 
Northgate  Seattle, W A   —  23,610   115,992    —  125,856   23,610   241,848   265,458   128,076  1987  
Ocean
County Mall  Toms River
(New York),
NJ    —  20,404   124,945   3,277   54,058   23,681   179,003   202,684   91,058  1998
(4)
Orland
Square  Orland Park
(Chicago), IL    —  35,514   129,906    —  76,956   35,514   206,862   242,376   103,986  1997(4)
Oxford
Valley Mall  Langhorne
(Philadelphia),
PA   61,076   24,544   100,287    —  20,195   24,544   120,482   145,026   79,717  2003
(4)
Penn
Square Mall  Oklahoma
City, OK   310,000   2,043   155,958    —  59,474   2,043   215,432   217,475   122,459  2002(4)
Pheasant
Lane Mall  Nashua, NH    —  3,902   155,068   550  50,241   4,452   205,309   209,761   105,301  2004(5)
Phipps
Plaza  Atlanta, GA    —  15,005   210,610    —  109,206   15,005   319,816   334,821   150,091  1998(4)
Plaza
Carolina  Carolina (San
Juan), PR   225,000   15,493   279,560    —  71,902   15,493   351,462   366,955   152,228  2004(4)
Prien Lake
Mall  Lake Charles,
LA    —  1,842   2,813   3,053   58,570   4,895   61,383   66,278   29,576  1972 
Rockaway
Townsquare  Rockaway
(New York),
NJ    —  41,918   212,257    —  52,808   41,918   265,065   306,983   143,714  1998
(4)
Roosevelt
Field  Garden City
(New York),
NY    —  163,160   702,008   1,246   354,520   164,406   1,056,528   1,220,934   465,477  1998
(4)
Ross Park
Mall  Pittsburgh, P A   —  23,541   90,203   5,815   113,912   29,356   204,115   233,471   120,441  1986 
Santa Rosa
Plaza  Santa Rosa,
CA    —  10,400   87,864    —  28,488   10,400   116,352   126,752   62,941  1998(4)
Shops at
Chestnut
Hill, The  Chestnut Hill
(Boston), MA   120,000   449  25,102   38,864   104,339   39,313   129,441   168,754   32,417  2002
(5)
Shops at
Nanuet, The Nanuet, NY    —  28,125   142,860    —  10,582   28,125   153,442   181,567   32,667  2013 
Shops at
Riverside,
The  Hackensack
(New York),
NJ   130,000   13,521   238,746    —  167,109   13,521   405,855   419,376   66,445  2007 (4)
(5)
South Hills
Village  Pittsburgh, P A   —  23,445   125,840   1,472   77,461   24,917   203,301   228,218   97,896  1997(4)
South Shore
Plaza  Braintree
(Boston), MA    —  101,200   301,495    —  163,860   101,200   465,355   566,555   239,269  1998(4)
Southdale
Mall  Edina
(Minneapolis),
MN   144,514   41,430   184,967    —  103,704   41,430   288,671   330,101   56,075  2007 (4)
(5)
SouthPark  Charlotte, NC    —  42,092   188,055   100  194,303   42,192   382,358   424,550   202,385  2002 (4)
Southridge
Mall  Greendale
(Milwaukee),
WI   116,968   12,359   130,111   1,939   19,905   14,298   150,016   164,314   47,949  2007 (4)
(5)
St. Charles
Towne
Center  Waldorf
(Washington,
DC), MD    —  7,710   52,934   1,180   28,363   8,890   81,297   90,187   57,442  1990
 
 
137
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
                  
              Cost Capitalized                
              Subsequent to   Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
        Initial Cost (3)   Acquisition (3)   Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
                    Buildings and            Buildings and            Buildings and            Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Total (1)      Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
Stanford
Shopping
Center  Palo Alto (San
Jose), CA  $  — $  — $ 339,537  $  — $ 156,919  $  — $ 496,456  $496,456  $ 180,196  2003
(4)
Summit
Mall  Akron, OH   85,000   15,374   51,137    —  56,286   15,374   107,423   122,797   60,869  1965 
Tacoma
Mall  Tacoma
(Seattle), W A   —  37,113   125,826    —  130,010   37,113   255,836   292,949   129,641  1987 
Tippecanoe
Mall  Lafayette, IN    —  2,897   8,439   5,517   48,513   8,414   56,952   65,366   42,488  1973 
Town
Center at
Boca Raton  Boca Raton
(Miami), FL    —  64,200   307,317    —  227,545   64,200   534,862   599,062   275,246  1998
(4)
Town
Center at
Cobb  Kennesaw
(Atlanta), GA   185,305   32,355   158,225    —  23,534   32,355   181,759   214,114   116,310  1998
(5)
Towne East
Square  Wichita, KS    —  8,525   18,479   4,108   48,773   12,633   67,252   79,885   46,725  1975 
Treasure
Coast
Square  Jensen
Beach, FL    —  11,124   72,990   3,067   40,629   14,191   113,619   127,810   71,016  1987
 
Tyrone
Square  St. Petersburg
(Tampa), FL    —  15,638   120,962   1,459   51,700   17,097   172,662   189,759   101,515  1972 
University
Park Mall  Mishawaka,
IN    —  10,762   118,164   7,000   59,439   17,762   177,603   195,365   144,655  1996(4)
Walt
Whitman
Shops  Huntington
Station (New
York), NY    —  51,700   111,258   3,789   126,664   55,489   237,922   293,411   114,751  1998
(4)
White Oaks
Mall  Springfield, IL   49,500   3,024   35,692   2,102   63,451   5,126   99,143   104,269   53,418  1977 
Wolfchase
Galleria  Memphis, TN  159,157   16,407   128,276    —  18,036   16,407   146,312   162,719   90,260  2002(4)
Woodland
Hills Mall  Tulsa, OK    —  34,211   187,123    —  29,732   34,211   216,855   251,066   129,540  2004(5)
                                 
Premium
Outlets                                 
Albertville
Premium
Outlets  Albertville
(Minneapolis),
MN    —  3,900   97,059    —  9,810   3,900   106,869   110,769   49,034  2004
(4)
Allen
Premium
Outlets  Allen (Dallas),
TX    —  20,932   69,788    —  44,420   20,932   114,208   135,140   30,989  2004
(4)
Aurora
Farms
Premium
Outlets  Aurora
(Cleveland),
OH    —  2,370   24,326    —  8,441   2,370   32,767   35,137   22,781  2004
(4)
Birch Run
Premium
Outlets  Birch Run
(Detroit), MI   123,000   11,477   77,856    —  8,129   11,477   85,985   97,462   31,239  2010
(4)
Camarillo
Premium
Outlets  Camarillo
(Los Angeles),
CA    —  16,670   224,721   395  69,778   17,065   294,499   311,564   131,826  2004
(4)
Carlsbad
Premium
Outlets  Carlsbad (San
Diego), CA    —  12,890   184,990   96  8,476   12,986   193,466   206,452   79,085  2004
(4)
Carolina
Premium
Outlets  Smithfield
(Raleigh), NC   44,169   3,175   59,863   5,311   7,341   8,486   67,204   75,690   35,141  2004
(4)
Chicago
Premium
Outlets  Aurora
(Chicago), IL    —  659  118,005   13,050   102,843   13,709   220,848   234,557   73,145  2004
(4)
Cincinnati
Premium
Outlets  Monroe
(Cincinnati),
OH    —  14,117   71,520    —  4,991   14,117   76,511   90,628   33,752  2008
 
Clinton
Crossing
Premium
Outlets  Clinton, CT    —  2,060   107,556   1,532   5,201   3,592   112,757   116,349   54,256  2004
(4)
Denver
Premium
Outlets  Thornton
(Denver), CO    —  12,875   45,335   10  78,668   12,885   124,003   136,888   1,785  2018
 
Desert Hills
Premium
Outlets  Cabazon
(Palm
Springs), CA    —  3,440   338,679    —  108,510   3,440   447,189   450,629   160,549  2004
(4)
Edinburgh
Premium
OutletsEdinburgh
(Indianapolis),
IN  — 2,857 47,309  — 17,406 2,857 64,715 67,572 32,847 2004 (4)
138
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
              Cost Capitalized                
              Subsequent to   Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
        Initial Cost (3)   Acquisition (3)   Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
                       Buildings and            Buildings and            Buildings and            Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Total (1)      Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
Ellenton
Premium
Outlets  Ellenton (T ampa), FL  $ 178,000  $15,807  $ 182,412  $  — $ 7,174  $15,807  $ 189,586  $205,393  $ 86,680  2010 (4)
Folsom
Premium
Outlets  Folsom (Sacramento),
CA    —  9,060   50,281    —  5,073   9,060   55,354   64,414   29,159  2004 (4)
Gilroy
Premium
Outlets  Gilroy (San Jose), CA    —  9,630   194,122    —  13,992   9,630   208,114   217,744   95,334  2004 (4)
Grand
Prairie
Premium
Outlets  Grand Prairie (Dallas),
TX   114,013   9,497   194,245    —  1,274   9,497   195,519   205,016   42,516  2012  
Grove City
Premium
Outlets  Grove City
(Pittsburgh), P A   140,000   6,421   121,880    —  7,510   6,421   129,390   135,811   59,332  2010 (4)
Gulfport
Premium
Outlets  Gulfport, MS   50,000    —  27,949    —  7,315    —  35,264   35,264   13,730  2010 (4)
Hagerstown
Premium
Outlets  Hagerstown
(Baltimore/W ashington,
DC), MD   75,951   3,576   85,883    —  3,086   3,576   88,969   92,545   33,195  2010 (4)
Houston
Premium
Outlets  Cypress (Houston), TX   —  8,695   69,350    —  44,459   8,695   113,809   122,504   46,806  2007  
Jackson
Premium
Outlets  Jackson (New York),
NJ    —  6,413   104,013    3  8,473   6,416   112,486   118,902   46,963  2004 (4)
Jersey
Shore
Premium
Outlets  Tinton Falls (New
York), NJ    —  15,390   50,979    —  76,170   15,390   127,149   142,539   56,150  2007  
Johnson
Creek
Premium
Outlets  Johnson Creek, WI    —  2,800   39,546    —  7,078   2,800   46,624   49,424   20,882  2004 (4)
Kittery
Premium
Outlets  Kittery , ME    —  11,832   94,994    —  10,289   11,832   105,283   117,115   41,505  2004 (4)
Las
Americas
Premium
Outlets  San Diego, CA    —  45,168   251,878    —  9,369   45,168   261,247   306,415   86,814  2007 (4)
Las V egas
North
Premium
Outlets  Las V egas, NV    —  25,435   134,973   16,536   150,374   41,971   285,347   327,318   112,688  2004 (4)
Las V egas
South
Premium
Outlets  Las V egas, NV    —  13,085   160,777    —  31,774   13,085   192,551   205,636   76,452  2004 (4)
Lee
Premium
Outlets  Lee, MA   51,701   9,167   52,212    —  3,487   9,167   55,699   64,866   24,893  2010 (4)
Leesburg
Corner
Premium
Outlets  Leesburg (W ashington,
DC), V A    —  7,190   162,023    —  8,146   7,190   170,169   177,359   80,158  2004 (4)
Lighthouse
Place
Premium
Outlets  Michigan City
(Chicago, IL), IN    —  6,630   94,138    —  10,169   6,630   104,307   110,937   53,431  2004 (4)
Merrimack
Premium
Outlets  Merrimack, NH   121,753   14,975   118,428    —  3,129   14,975   121,557   136,532   34,503  2012  
Napa
Premium
Outlets  Napa, CA    —  11,400   45,023    —  7,769   11,400   52,792   64,192   24,479  2004 (4)
North Bend
Premium
Outlets  North Bend (Seattle),
WA    —  2,143   36,197    —  5,609   2,143   41,806   43,949   17,534  2004 (4)
North
Georgia
Premium
Outlets  Dawsonville (Atlanta),
GA    —  4,300   137,020    —  1,414   4,300   138,434   142,734   61,019  2004 (4)
Orlando
International
Premium
Outlets  Orlando, FL    —  31,998   472,815    —  11,836   31,998   484,651   516,649   149,916  2010 (4)
Orlando
Vineland
Premium
Outlets  Orlando, FL    —  14,040   382,949   36,023   2,193   50,063   385,142   435,205   154,691  2004 (4)
Petaluma
Village
Premium
Outlets  Petaluma (San
Francisco), CA    —  13,322   13,710    —  4,038   13,322   17,748   31,070   10,652  2004 (4)
Philadelphia
Premium
Outlets  Limerick
(Philadelphia), P A    —  16,676   105,249    —  21,889   16,676   127,138   143,814   63,823  2006  
Phoenix
Premium
Outlets  Chandler (Phoenix),
AZ    —   —  63,082    —   —   —  63,082   63,082   19,033  2013  
Pismo
Beach
Premium
Outlets  Pismo Beach, CA   35,360   4,317   19,044    —  2,967   4,317   22,011   26,328   11,157  2010 (4)
139
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
             
              Cost Capitalized                
              Subsequent to   Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
        Initial Cost (3)   Acquisition (3)   Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
                       Buildings and            Buildings and            Buildings and            Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Land      Improvements      Total (1)      Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
Pleasant
Prairie
Premium
Outlets  Pleasant
Prairie
(Chicago,
IL/Milwaukee),
WI  $ 145,000  $16,823  $ 126,686  $  — $ 6,685  $16,823  $ 133,371  $150,194  $ 45,896  2010
(4)
Puerto Rico
Premium
Outlets  Barceloneta,
PR   160,000   20,586   114,021    —  6,590   20,586   120,611   141,197   41,964  2010
(4)
Queenstown
Premium
Outlets  Queenstown
(Baltimore),
MD   62,119   8,129   61,950    —  5,149   8,129   67,099   75,228   24,600  2010
(4)
Rio Grande
Valley
Premium
Outlets  Mercedes
(McAllen), TX   —  12,229   41,547    —  31,748   12,229   73,295   85,524   39,351  2005
 
Round Rock
Premium
Outlets  Round Rock
(Austin), TX    —  14,706   82,252    —  6,543   14,706   88,795   103,501   47,625  2005
 
San
Francisco
Premium
Outlets  Livermore
(San
Francisco),
CA    —  21,925   308,694   46,177   75,685   68,102   384,379   452,481   72,985  2012
 
San Marcos
Premium
Outlets  San Marcos
(Austin/San
Antonio), TX    —  13,180   287,179    —  12,120   13,180   299,299   312,479   94,558  2010
(4)
Seattle
Premium
Outlets  Tulalip
(Seattle), W A   —   —  103,722    —  55,069    —  158,791   158,791   68,934  2004
(4)
St.
Augustine
Premium
Outlets  St. Augustine
(Jacksonville),
FL    —  6,090   57,670    2  11,192   6,092   68,862   74,954   34,709  2004
(4)
Tampa
Premium
Outlets  Lutz (T ampa),
FL    —  14,298   97,188   121  4,947   14,419   102,135   116,554   14,617  2015
 
The
Crossings
Premium
Outlets  Tannersville,
PA   108,225   7,720   172,931    —  18,388   7,720   191,319   199,039   79,224  2004
(4)
Tucson
Premium
Outlets  Marana
(Tucson), AZ   —  12,508   69,677    —  5,573   12,508   75,250   87,758   11,011  2015
 
Vacaville
Premium
Outlets  Vacaville, CA    —  9,420   84,850    —  17,665   9,420   102,515   111,935   51,798  2004
(4)
Waikele
Premium
Outlets  Waipahu
(Honolulu), HI    —  22,630   77,316    —  20,655   22,630   97,971   120,601   42,505  2004
(4)
Waterloo
Premium
Outlets  Waterloo, NY    —  3,230   75,277    —  13,857   3,230   89,134   92,364   43,169  2004
(4)
Williamsburg
Premium
Outlets  Williamsburg,
VA   185,000   10,323   223,789    —  7,445   10,323   231,234   241,557   72,356  2010
(4)
Woodburn
Premium
Outlets  Woodburn
(Portland), OR    —  9,414   150,414    —  2,556   9,414   152,970   162,384   35,847  2013
(4)
Woodbury
Common
Premium
Outlets  Central V alley
(New York),
NY    —  11,110   862,559   1,658   242,457   12,768   1,105,016   1,117,784   386,969  2004
(4)
Wrentham
Village
Premium
Outlets  Wrentham
(Boston), MA    —  4,900   282,031    —  16,054   4,900   298,085   302,985   129,941  2004
(4)
                                 
The Mills                                 
Arizona Mills  Tempe
(Phoenix), AZ  152,911   41,936   297,289    —  13,233   41,936   310,522   352,458   53,789  2007(4)
(5)
Great Mall  Milpitas (San
Jose), CA    —  69,853   463,101    —  53,937   69,853   517,038   586,891   118,149  2007(4)
(5)
Gurnee Mills  Gurnee
(Chicago), IL   264,582   41,133   297,911    —  27,761   41,133   325,672   366,805   77,680  2007(4)
(5)
Mills at
Jersey
Gardens,
The  Elizabeth, NJ   350,000   120,417   865,605    —  16,258   120,417   881,863   1,002,280   133,622  2015
(4)
Opry Mills  Nashville, TN  375,000   51,000   327,503    —  16,256   51,000   343,759   394,759   80,730  2007(4)
(5)
Outlets at
Orange, The Orange (Los
Angeles), CA   215,000   65,516   211,322    —  1,393   65,516   212,715   278,231   2,028  2007(4)
(5)
Potomac
Mills  Woodbridge
(Washington,
DC), V A   416,000   61,755   425,370    —  36,909   61,755   462,279   524,034   115,348  2007 (4)
(5)
Sawgrass
Mills  Sunrise
(Miami), FL    —  194,002   1,641,153   5,395   178,168   199,397   1,819,321   2,018,718   402,390  2007(4)
(5)
                                 
 
140
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
                  
             Cost Capitalized                
             Subsequent to  Gross Amounts At Which     Date of  
        Initial Cost (3)  Acquisition (3)  Carried At Close of Period     Construction  
                         Buildings and           Buildings and           Buildings and           Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)      Land     Improvements     Land     Improvements     Land     Improvements     Total (1)     Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
Designer
Outlets                                 
La Reggia
Designer
Outlet  Marcianise (Naples),
Italy  $ 148,133  $ 37,220  $ 233,179  $  — $ 5,742  $ 37,220  $ 238,921  $ 276,141  $ 27,147  2013(4)
(5)
(7)
Noventa Di
Piave
Designer
Outlet  Venice, Italy   297,566   38,793   309,284    —  40,462   38,793   349,746   388,539   34,041  2013(4)
(5)
(7)
Parndorf
Designer
Outlet  Vienna, Austria   105,293   14,903   221,442    —  3,918   14,903   225,360   240,263   31,851  2013(4)
(5)
(7)
Provence
Designer
Outlet  Provence, France   93,020   38,467   75,102    —   —  38,467   75,102   113,569   9,983  2017(4)
(5)
(7)
Roermond
Designer
Outlet  Roermond,
Netherlands   263,232   15,035   400,094    —  3,735   15,035   403,829   418,864   54,243  2013(4)
(5)
(7)
Rosada
Designer
Outlet  Roosendaal,
Netherlands   66,523   22,191   108,069    —  1,672   22,191   109,741   131,932   8,980  2017(4)
(5)
(7)
                                 
Community
Centers                                 
ABQ
Uptown  Albuquerque, NM    —  6,374   75,333   4,054   7,087   10,428   82,420   92,848   23,653  2011(4)
University
Park V illage  Fort W orth, TX   55,000   18,031   100,523    —  4,827   18,031   105,350   123,381   14,774  2015(4)
                                 
Other
Properties                                 
Calhoun
Marketplace  Calhoun, GA   18,670   1,745   12,529    —  2,325   1,745   14,854   16,599   8,976  2010(4)
Florida Keys
Outlet
Center  Florida City , FL   17,000   1,112   1,748    —  3,992   1,112   5,740   6,852   2,974  2010
(4)
Gaffney
Marketplace  Gaffney
(Greenville/Charlotte),
SC   30,159   4,056   32,371    —  6,103   4,056   38,474   42,530   17,356  2010
(4)
Lebanon
Marketplace  Lebanon (Nashville),
TN    —  1,758   10,189    —  271  1,758   10,460   12,218   7,011  2010(4)
Liberty
Village
Marketplace  Flemington (New
York), NJ    —  5,670   28,904    —  2,345   5,670   31,249   36,919   30,373  2004
(4)
Lincoln
Plaza  King of Prussia
(Philadelphia), P A    —   —  21,299    —  10,999    —  32,298   32,298   15,234  2003(4)
Orlando
Outlet
Marketplace  Orlando, FL    —  3,367   1,557    —  2,990   3,367   4,547   7,914   2,229  2010
(4)
Osage
Beach
Marketplace  Osage Beach, MO    —  9,460   85,804    —  8,595   9,460   94,399   103,859   49,744  2004
(4)
                                 
                                 
Other pre-
development
costs      —  80,718   80,172   959   —  81,677   80,172   161,849   78  
 
Other      —  2,615   7,103    —   —  2,615   7,103   9,718   7,151    
Currency
Translation
Adjustment      —  7,794   24,126    —  29,580   7,794   53,706   61,500   (14,925)   
 
    $ 6,844,662  $3,321,044  $25,018,405  $351,979  $7,976,532  $3,673,023  $32,994,937  $36,667,960  $12,632,690    
 
 
141
 
Table of Contents
 
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Schedule III as of December 31, 2018
(Dollars in thousands)
(1)Reconciliation of Real Estate Properties:
The changes in real estate assets for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 are
as follows:
   
     2018     2017     2016  
Balance, beginning of year  $36,014,506  $34,897,942  $33,132,885  
Acquisitions and consolidations (7)   328,265   328,621   1,331,511  
Improvements   758,135   731,863   658,734  
Disposals and deconsolidations   (357,622)   (125,499)   (180,433)  
Currency Translation Adjustment   (75,324)   181,579   (44,755)  
Balance, close of year  $36,667,960  $36,014,506  $34,897,942  
The unaudited aggregate cost of domestic consolidated real estate assets for U.S. federal income
tax purposes as of December 31, 2018 was $20,963,919.
(2)Reconciliation of Accumulated Depreciation:
The changes in accumulated depreciation for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and
2016 are as follows:
     2018     2017     2016  
Balance, beginning of year  $11,704,223  $10,664,738  $9,696,420  
Depreciation expense (7)   1,106,053   1,121,863   1,089,347  
Disposals and deconsolidations   (190,241)   (81,187)   (117,568)  
Currency Translation Adjustment   12,655   (1,191)   (3,461)  
Balance, close of year  $12,632,690  $11,704,223  $10,664,738  
Depreciation of our investment in buildings and improvements reflected in the consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income is calculated over the estimated original lives of
the assets as noted below.
·Buildings and Improvements — typically 10‑35 years for the structure, 15 years for landscaping
and parking lot, and 10 years for HVAC equipment.
·Tenant Allowances and Improvements — shorter of lease term or useful life.
(3)Initial cost generally represents net book value at December 20, 1993, except for acquired
properties and new developments after December 20, 1993. Initial cost also includes any new
developments that are opened during the current year. Costs of disposals and impairments of
property are first reflected as a reduction to cost capitalized subsequent to acquisition.
(4)Not developed/constructed by us or our predecessors. The date of construction represents the
initial acquisition date for assets in which we have acquired multiple interests.
(5)Initial cost for these properties is the cost at the date of consolidation for properties previously
accounted for under the equity method of accounting.
(6)Encumbrances represent face amount of mortgage debt and exclude any premiums or discounts
and deferred financing costs.
(7)Represents the original cost and does not include subsequent currency translation adjustments.
 
142
